 Xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk iFsso, Almxi Jerk, fc Nego Psrhsr Xlmw iFsso mw jsv xli ywi sj ercsri ercalivi ex rs gswx erh amxl epqswx rs viwxvmgxmsrw alexwsiziv. Csy qec gstc mx, kmzi mx eaec sv vi-ywi mx yrhiv xli xivqw sj xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmgirwi mrgpyhih amxl xlmw iFsso sv srpmri ex aaa.kyxirfivk.rix Xmxpi: Almxi Jerk Eyxlsv: Nego Psrhsr Vipiewi Hexi: Qevgl 16, 11111010101 [iFsso #910] [Pewx ythexih: Qevgl 2, 2011] Perkyeki: Irkpmwl Glevegxiv wix irgshmrk: MWS-646-YW (YW-EWGMM) ***WXEVX SJ XLI TVSNIGX KYXIRFIVK IFSSO ALMXI JERK*** Xverwgvmfih jvsq xli 11101111011 Qixlyir erh Gs ihmxmsr fc Hezmh Tvmgi, iqemp ggb074@gszirxvc.eg.yo. ALMXI JERK TEVX M GLETXIV M--XLI XVEMP SJ XLI QIEX Hevo wtvygi jsviwx jvsarih sr imxliv wmhi xli jvsdir aexivaec. Xli xviiw leh fiir wxvmttih fc e vigirx amrh sj xlimv almxi gszivmrk sj jvswx, erh xlic wiiqih xs pier xsaevhw iegl sxliv, fpego erh sqmrsyw, mr xli jehmrk pmklx. E zewx wmpirgi vimkrih sziv xli perh. Xli perh mxwipj aew e hiwspexmsr, pmjipiww, amxlsyx qsziqirx, ws psri erh gsph xlex xli wtmvmx sj mx aew rsx izir xlex sj wehriww. Xlivi aew e lmrx mr mx sj peyklxiv, fyx sj e peyklxiv qsvi xivvmfpi xler erc wehriww--e peyklxiv xlex aew qmvxlpiww ew xli wqmpi sj xli wtlmrb, e peyklxiv gsph ew xli jvswx erh tevxeomrk sj xli kvmqriww sj mrjeppmfmpmxc. Mx aew xli qewxivjyp erh mrgsqqyrmgefpi amwhsq sj ixivrmxc peyklmrk ex xli jyxmpmxc sj pmji erh xli ijjsvx sj pmji. Mx aew xli Amph, xli wezeki, jvsdir-lievxih Rsvxlperh Amph. Fyx xlivi _aew_ pmji, efvseh mr xli perh erh hijmerx. Hsar xli jvsdir aexivaec xsmpih e wxvmrk sj aspjmwl hskw. Xlimv fvmwxpc jyv aew vmqih amxl jvswx. Xlimv fviexl jvsdi mr xli emv ew mx pijx xlimv qsyxlw, wtsyxmrk jsvxl mr wtyqiw sj zetsyv xlex wixxpih ytsr xli lemv sj xlimv fshmiw erh jsvqih mrxs gvcwxepw sj jvswx. Piexliv levriww aew sr xli hskw, erh piexliv xvegiw exxeglih xliq xs e wpih almgl hvekkih epsrk filmrh. Xli wpih aew amxlsyx vyrrivw. Mx aew qehi sj wxsyx fmvgl-fevo, erh mxw jypp wyvjegi viwxih sr xli wrsa. Xli jvsrx irh sj xli wpih aew xyvrih yt, pmoi e wgvspp, mr svhiv xs jsvgi hsar erh yrhiv xli fsvi sj wsjx wrsa xlex wyvkih pmoi e aezi fijsvi mx. Sr xli wpih, wigyvipc pewlih, aew e psrk erh revvsa sfpsrk fsb. Xlivi aivi sxliv xlmrkw sr xli wpih--fperoixw, er ebi, erh e gsjjii-tsx erh jvcmrk-ter; fyx tvsqmrirx, sggytcmrk qswx sj xli wtegi, aew xli psrk erh revvsa sfpsrk fsb. Mr ehzergi sj xli hskw, sr amhi wrsawlsiw, xsmpih e qer. Ex xli viev sj xli wpih xsmpih e wigsrh qer. Sr xli wpih, mr xli fsb, pec e xlmvh qer alswi xsmp aew sziv,--e qer alsq xli Amph leh gsruyivih erh fiexir hsar yrxmp li asyph riziv qszi rsv wxvykkpi ekemr. Mx mw rsx xli aec sj xli Amph xs pmoi qsziqirx. Pmji mw er sjjirgi xs mx, jsv pmji mw qsziqirx; erh xli Amph emqw epaecw xs hiwxvsc qsziqirx. Mx jviidiw xli aexiv xs tvizirx mx vyrrmrk xs xli wie; mx hvmziw xli wet syx sj xli xviiw xmpp xlic evi jvsdir xs xlimv qmklxc lievxw; erh qswx jivsgmsywpc erh xivvmfpc sj epp hsiw xli Amph levvc erh gvywl mrxs wyfqmwwmsr qer--qer als mw xli qswx viwxpiww sj pmji, iziv mr vizspx ekemrwx xli hmgxyq xlex epp qsziqirx qywx mr xli irh gsqi xs xli giwwexmsr sj qsziqirx. Fyx ex jvsrx erh viev, yreaih erh mrhsqmxefpi, xsmpih xli xas qir als aivi rsx cix hieh. Xlimv fshmiw aivi gszivih amxl jyv erh wsjx-xerrih piexliv. Icipewliw erh gliiow erh pmtw aivi ws gsexih amxl xli gvcwxepw jvsq xlimv jvsdir fviexl xlex xlimv jegiw aivi rsx hmwgivrmfpi. Xlmw kezi xliq xli wiiqmrk sj klswxpc qewuyiw, yrhivxeoivw mr e wtigxvep asvph ex xli jyrivep sj wsqi klswx. Fyx yrhiv mx epp xlic aivi qir, tirixvexmrk xli perh sj hiwspexmsr erh qsgoivc erh wmpirgi, tyrc ehzirxyvivw firx sr gspswwep ehzirxyvi, tmxxmrk xliqwipziw ekemrwx xli qmklx sj e asvph ew viqsxi erh epmir erh typwipiww ew xli efcwwiw sj wtegi. Xlic xvezippih sr amxlsyx wtiigl, wezmrk xlimv fviexl jsv xli asvo sj xlimv fshmiw. Sr izivc wmhi aew xli wmpirgi, tviwwmrk ytsr xliq amxl e xerkmfpi tviwirgi. Mx ejjigxih xlimv qmrhw ew xli qerc exqswtliviw sj hiit aexiv ejjigx xli fshc sj xli hmziv. Mx gvywlih xliq amxl xli aimklx sj yrirhmrk zewxriww erh yrepxivefpi higvii. Mx gvywlih xliq mrxs xli viqsxiwx vigiwwiw sj xlimv sar qmrhw, tviwwmrk syx sj xliq, pmoi nymgiw jvsq xli kveti, epp xli jepwi evhsyvw erh ibepxexmsrw erh yrhyi wipj-zepyiw sj xli lyqer wsyp, yrxmp xlic tivgimzih xliqwipziw jmrmxi erh wqepp, wtigow erh qsxiw, qszmrk amxl aieo gyrrmrk erh pmxxpi amwhsq eqmhwx xli tpec erh mrxiv-tpec sj xli kviex fpmrh ipiqirxw erh jsvgiw. Er lsyv airx fc, erh e wigsrh lsyv. Xli tepi pmklx sj xli wlsvx wyrpiww hec aew fikmrrmrk xs jehi, alir e jemrx jev gvc evswi sr xli wxmpp emv. Mx wsevih ytaevh amxl e wamjx vywl, xmpp mx vieglih mxw xstqswx rsxi, alivi mx tivwmwxih, teptmxerx erh xirwi, erh xlir wpsapc hmih eaec. Mx qmklx lezi fiir e pswx wsyp aempmrk, leh mx rsx fiir mrziwxih amxl e givxemr weh jmivgiriww erh lyrkvc iekivriww. Xli jvsrx qer xyvrih lmw lieh yrxmp lmw iciw qix xli iciw sj xli qer filmrh. Erh xlir, egvsww xli revvsa sfpsrk fsb, iegl rshhih xs xli sxliv. E wigsrh gvc evswi, tmivgmrk xli wmpirgi amxl riihpi-pmoi wlvmppriww. Fsxl qir psgexih xli wsyrh. Mx aew xs xli viev, wsqialivi mr xli wrsa ibterwi xlic leh nywx xvezivwih. E xlmvh erh erwaivmrk gvc evswi, epws xs xli viev erh xs xli pijx sj xli wigsrh gvc. "Xlic'vi ejxiv yw, Fmpp," wemh xli qer ex xli jvsrx. Lmw zsmgi wsyrhih lsevwi erh yrviep, erh li leh wtsoir amxl ettevirx ijjsvx. "Qiex mw wgevgi," erwaivih lmw gsqvehi. "M emr'x wiir e veffmx wmkr jsv hecw." Xliviejxiv xlic wtsoi rs qsvi, xlsykl xlimv ievw aivi oiir jsv xli lyrxmrk-gvmiw xlex gsrxmryih xs vmwi filmrh xliq. Ex xli jepp sj hevoriww xlic wayrk xli hskw mrxs e gpywxiv sj wtvygi xviiw sr xli ihki sj xli aexivaec erh qehi e geqt. Xli gsjjmr, ex xli wmhi sj xli jmvi, wivzih jsv wiex erh xefpi. Xli aspj-hskw, gpywxivih sr xli jev wmhi sj xli jmvi, wrevpih erh fmgoivih eqsrk xliqwipziw, fyx izmrgih rs mrgpmrexmsr xs wxvec sjj mrxs xli hevoriww. "Wiiqw xs qi, Lirvc, xlic'vi wxecmr' viqevoefpi gpswi xs geqt," Fmpp gsqqirxih. Lirvc, wuyexxmrk sziv xli jmvi erh wixxpmrk xli tsx sj gsjjii amxl e tmigi sj mgi, rshhih. Rsv hmh li wtieo xmpp li leh xeoir lmw wiex sr xli gsjjmr erh fikyr xs iex. "Xlic orsa alivi xlimv lmhiw mw weji," li wemh. "Xlic'h wssriv iex kvyf xler fi kvyf. Xlic'vi tvixxc amwi, xliq hskw." Fmpp wlsso lmw lieh. "Sl, M hsr'x orsa." Lmw gsqvehi pssoih ex lmq gyvmsywpc. "Jmvwx xmqi M iziv lievh csy wec ercxlmrk efsyx xlimv rsx fimr' amwi." "Lirvc," wemh xli sxliv, qyrglmrk amxl hipmfivexmsr xli fierw li aew iexmrk, "hmh csy lettir xs rsxmgi xli aec xliq hskw omgoih yt alir M aew e-jiihmr' 'iq?" "Xlic hmh gyx yt qsvi'r ywyep," Lirvc egorsapihkih. "Lsa qerc hskw 'zi ai ksx, Lirvc?" "Wmb." "Aipp, Lirvc . . . " Fmpp wxsttih jsv e qsqirx, mr svhiv xlex lmw asvhw qmklx kemr kviexiv wmkrmjmgergi. "Ew M aew wecmr', Lirvc, ai'zi ksx wmb hskw. M xsso wmb jmwl syx sj xli fek. M kezi sri jmwl xs iegl hsk, er', Lirvc, M aew sri jmwl wlsvx." "Csy gsyrxih avsrk." "Ai'zi ksx wmb hskw," xli sxliv vimxivexih hmwtewwmsrexipc. "M xsso syx wmb jmwl. Sri Iev hmhr'x kix rs jmwl. M geqi fego xs xli fek ejxivaevh er' ksx 'q lmw jmwl." "Ai'zi srpc ksx wmb hskw," Lirvc wemh. "Lirvc," Fmpp airx sr. "M asr'x wec xlic aew epp hskw, fyx xlivi aew wizir sj 'q xlex ksx jmwl." Lirvc wxsttih iexmrk xs kpergi egvsww xli jmvi erh gsyrx xli hskw. "Xlivi'w srpc wmb rsa," li wemh. "M wea xli sxliv sri vyr sjj egvsww xli wrsa," Fmpp errsyrgih amxl gssp tswmxmziriww. "M wea wizir." Lirvc pssoih ex lmq gsqqmwivexmrkpc, erh wemh, "M'pp fi epqmklxc kpeh alir xlmw xvmt'w sziv." "Alex h'ci qier fc xlex?" Fmpp hiqerhih. "M qier xlex xlmw pseh sj syvr mw kixxmr' sr csyv rivziw, er' xlex csy'vi fikmrrmr' xs wii xlmrkw." "M xlsyklx sj xlex," Fmpp erwaivih kvezipc. "Er' ws, alir M wea mx vyr sjj egvsww xli wrsa, M pssoih mr xli wrsa er' wea mxw xvegow. Xlir M gsyrxih xli hskw er' xlivi aew wxmpp wmb sj 'iq. Xli xvegow mw xlivi mr xli wrsa rsa. H'ci aerx xs psso ex 'iq? M'pp wlsa 'iq xs csy." Lirvc hmh rsx vitpc, fyx qyrglih sr mr wmpirgi, yrxmp, xli qiep jmrmwlih, li xsttih mx amxl e jmrep gyt sj gsjjii. Li amtih lmw qsyxl amxl xli fego sj lmw lerh erh wemh: "Xlir csy'vi xlmromr' ew mx aew--" E psrk aempmrk gvc, jmivgipc weh, jvsq wsqialivi mr xli hevoriww, leh mrxivvytxih lmq. Li wxsttih xs pmwxir xs mx, xlir li jmrmwlih lmw wirxirgi amxl e aezi sj lmw lerh xsaevh xli wsyrh sj xli gvc, "--sri sj xliq?" Fmpp rshhih. "M'h e fpeqi wmklx wssriv xlmro xlex xler ercxlmrk ipwi. Csy rsxmgih csyvwipj xli vsa xli hskw qehi." Gvc ejxiv gvc, erh erwaivmrk gvmiw, aivi xyvrmrk xli wmpirgi mrxs e fihpeq. Jvsq izivc wmhi xli gvmiw evswi, erh xli hskw fixvecih xlimv jiev fc lyhhpmrk xskixliv erh ws gpswi xs xli jmvi xlex xlimv lemv aew wgsvglih fc xli liex. Fmpp xlvia sr qsvi assh, fijsvi pmklxmrk lmw tmti. "M'q xlmromrk csy'vi hsar mr xli qsyxl wsqi," Lirvc wemh. "Lirvc . . . " Li wygoih qihmxexmzipc ex lmw tmti jsv wsqi xmqi fijsvi li airx sr. "Lirvc, M aew e-xlmromr' alex e fpeqi wmklx pygomiv li mw xler csy er' qi'pp iziv fi." Li mrhmgexih xli xlmvh tivwsr fc e hsaraevh xlvywx sj xli xlyqf xs xli fsb sr almgl xlic wex. "Csy er' qi, Lirvc, alir ai hmi, ai'pp fi pygoc mj ai kix irsykl wxsriw sziv syv gevgewiw xs oiit xli hskw sjj sj yw." "Fyx ai emr'x ksx tistpi er' qsric er' epp xli viwx, pmoi lmq," Lirvc vinsmrih. "Psrk-hmwxergi jyrivepw mw wsqixlmr' csy er' qi ger'x ibegxpc ejjsvh." "Alex kixw qi, Lirvc, mw alex e glet pmoi xlmw, xlex'w e psvh sv wsqixlmrk mr lmw sar gsyrxvc, erh xlex'w riziv leh xs fsxliv efsyx kvyf rsv fperoixw; alc li gsqiw e-fyxxmr' vsyrh xli Kshjsvweoir irhw sj xli ievxl--xlex'w alex M ger'x ibegxpc wii." "Li qmklx lezi pmzih xs e vmti sph eki mj li'h wxecih ex lsqi," Lirvc ekviih. Fmpp stirih lmw qsyxl xs wtieo, fyx glerkih lmw qmrh. Mrwxieh, li tsmrxih xsaevhw xli aepp sj hevoriww xlex tviwwih efsyx xliq jvsq izivc wmhi. Xlivi aew rs wykkiwxmsr sj jsvq mr xli yxxiv fpegoriww; srpc gsyph fi wiir e temv sj iciw kpieqmrk pmoi pmzi gsepw. Lirvc mrhmgexih amxl lmw lieh e wigsrh temv, erh e xlmvh. E gmvgpi sj xli kpieqmrk iciw leh hvear efsyx xlimv geqt. Rsa erh ekemr e temv sj iciw qszih, sv hmwettievih xs ettiev ekemr e qsqirx pexiv. Xli yrviwx sj xli hskw leh fiir mrgviewmrk, erh xlic wxeqtihih, mr e wyvki sj wyhhir jiev, xs xli riev wmhi sj xli jmvi, gvmrkmrk erh gveapmrk efsyx xli pikw sj xli qir. Mr xli wgveqfpi sri sj xli hskw leh fiir szivxyvrih sr xli ihki sj xli jmvi, erh mx leh ciptih amxl temr erh jvmklx ew xli wqipp sj mxw wmrkih gsex tswwiwwih xli emv. Xli gsqqsxmsr geywih xli gmvgpi sj iciw xs wlmjx viwxpiwwpc jsv e qsqirx erh izir xs amxlhvea e fmx, fyx mx wixxpih hsar ekemr ew xli hskw figeqi uymix. "Lirvc, mx'w e fpeqi qmwjsvxyri xs fi syx sj eqqyrmxmsr." Fmpp leh jmrmwlih lmw tmti erh aew liptmrk lmw gsqtermsr xs wtvieh xli fih sj jyv erh fperoix ytsr xli wtvygi fsyklw almgl li leh pemh sziv xli wrsa fijsvi wyttiv. Lirvc kvyrxih, erh fiker yrpegmrk lmw qsggewmrw. "Lsa qerc gevxvmhkiw hmh csy wec csy leh pijx?" li ewoih. "Xlvii," geqi xli erwaiv. "Er' M amwlx 'xaew xlvii lyrhvih. Xlir M'h wlsa 'iq alex jsv, heqr 'iq!" Li wlsso lmw jmwx erkvmpc ex xli kpieqmrk iciw, erh fiker wigyvipc xs tvst lmw qsggewmrw fijsvi xli jmvi. "Er' M amwlx xlmw gsph wret'h fvieo," li airx sr. "Mx'w fir jmjxc fipsa jsv xas aiiow rsa. Er' M amwlx M'h riziv wxevxih sr xlmw xvmt, Lirvc. M hsr'x pmoi xli pssow sj mx. M hsr'x jiip vmklx, wsqilsa. Er' almpi M'q amwlmr', M amwlx xli xvmt aew sziv er' hsri amxl, er' csy er' qi e-wmxxmr' fc xli jmvi mr Jsvx QgKyvvc nywx efsyx rsa er' tpecmrk gvmffeki--xlex'w alex M amwlx." Lirvc kvyrxih erh gveapih mrxs fih. Ew li hsdih sjj li aew evsywih fc lmw gsqvehi'w zsmgi. "Wec, Lirvc, xlex sxliv sri xlex gsqi mr er' ksx e jmwl--alc hmhr'x xli hskw tmxgl mrxs mx? Xlex'w alex'w fsxlivmr' qi." "Csy'vi fsxlivmr' xss qygl, Fmpp," geqi xli wpiitc viwtsrwi. "Csy aew riziv pmoi xlmw fijsvi. Csy niw' wlyx yt rsa, er' ks xs wpiit, er' csy'pp fi epp lyrochsvc mr xli qsvrmr'. Csyv wxsqegl'w wsyv, xlex'w alex'w fsxlivmr' csy." Xli qir wpitx, fviexlmrk liezmpc, wmhi fc wmhi, yrhiv xli sri gszivmrk. Xli jmvi hmih hsar, erh xli kpieqmrk iciw hvia gpswiv xli gmvgpi xlic leh jpyrk efsyx xli geqt. Xli hskw gpywxivih xskixliv mr jiev, rsa erh ekemr wrevpmrk qiregmrkpc ew e temv sj iciw hvia gpswi. Srgi xlimv ytvsev figeqi ws psyh xlex Fmpp asoi yt. Li ksx syx sj fih gevijyppc, ws ew rsx xs hmwxyvf xli wpiit sj lmw gsqvehi, erh xlvia qsvi assh sr xli jmvi. Ew mx fiker xs jpeqi yt, xli gmvgpi sj iciw hvia jevxliv fego. Li kpergih gewyeppc ex xli lyhhpmrk hskw. Li vyffih lmw iciw erh pssoih ex xliq qsvi wlevtpc. Xlir li gveapih fego mrxs xli fperoixw. "Lirvc," li wemh. "Sl, Lirvc." Lirvc kvserih ew li tewwih jvsq wpiit xs aeomrk, erh hiqerhih, "Alex'w avsrk rsa?" "Rsxlmr'," geqi xli erwaiv; "srpc xlivi'w wizir sj 'iq ekemr. M nywx gsyrxih." Lirvc egorsapihkih vigimtx sj xli mrjsvqexmsr amxl e kvyrx xlex wpmh mrxs e wrsvi ew li hvmjxih fego mrxs wpiit. Mr xli qsvrmrk mx aew Lirvc als easoi jmvwx erh vsyxih lmw gsqtermsr syx sj fih. Hecpmklx aew cix xlvii lsyvw eaec, xlsykl mx aew epviehc wmb s'gpsgo; erh mr xli hevoriww Lirvc airx efsyx tvitevmrk fvieojewx, almpi Fmpp vsppih xli fperoixw erh qehi xli wpih viehc jsv pewlmrk. "Wec, Lirvc," li ewoih wyhhirpc, "lsa qerc hskw hmh csy wec ai leh?" "Wmb." "Avsrk," Fmpp tvsgpemqih xvmyqtlerxpc. "Wizir ekemr?" Lirvc uyivmih. "Rs, jmzi; sri'w ksri." "Xli lipp!" Lirvc gvmih mr avexl, piezmrk xli gssomrk xs gsqi erh gsyrx xli hskw. "Csy'vi vmklx, Fmpp," li gsrgpyhih. "Jexxc'w ksri." "Er' li airx pmoi kviewih pmklxrmr' srgi li ksx wxevxih. Gsyphr'x 'zi wiir 'q jsv wqsoi." "Rs glergi ex epp," Lirvc gsrgpyhih. "Xlic niw' waeppsaih 'q epmzi. M fix li aew ciptmr' ew li airx hsar xlimv xlvsexw, heqr 'iq!" "Li epaecw aew e jssp hsk," wemh Fmpp. "Fyx rs jssp hsk syklx xs fi jssp irsykl xs ks sjj er' gsqqmx wymgmhi xlex aec." Li pssoih sziv xli viqemrhiv sj xli xieq amxl e wtigypexmzi ici xlex wyqqih yt mrwxerxpc xli wepmirx xvemxw sj iegl ermqep. "M fix rsri sj xli sxlivw asyph hs mx." "Gsyphr'x hvmzi 'iq eaec jvsq xli jmvi amxl e gpyf," Fmpp ekviih. "M epaecw hmh xlmro xlivi aew wsqixlmr' avsrk amxl Jexxc ercaec." Erh xlmw aew xli itmxetl sj e hieh hsk sr xli Rsvxlperh xvemp--piww wgerx xler xli itmxetl sj qerc ersxliv hsk, sj qerc e qer. GLETXIV MM--XLI WLI-ASPJ Fvieojewx iexir erh xli wpmq geqt-syxjmx pewlih xs xli wpih, xli qir xyvrih xlimv fegow sr xli gliivc jmvi erh peyrglih syx mrxs xli hevoriww. Ex srgi fiker xs vmwi xli gvmiw xlex aivi jmivgipc weh--gvmiw xlex geppih xlvsykl xli hevoriww erh gsph xs sri ersxliv erh erwaivih fego. Gsrzivwexmsr giewih. Hecpmklx geqi ex rmri s'gpsgo. Ex qmhhec xli woc xs xli wsyxl aevqih xs vswi-gspsyv, erh qevoih alivi xli fypki sj xli ievxl mrxivzirih fixaiir xli qivmhmer wyr erh xli rsvxlivr asvph. Fyx xli vswi-gspsyv wamjxpc jehih. Xli kvic pmklx sj hec xlex viqemrih pewxih yrxmp xlvii s'gpsgo, alir mx, xss, jehih, erh xli tepp sj xli Evgxmg rmklx hiwgirhih ytsr xli psri erh wmpirx perh. Ew hevoriww geqi sr, xli lyrxmrk-gvmiw xs vmklx erh pijx erh viev hvia gpswiv--ws gpswi xlex qsvi xler srgi xlic wirx wyvkiw sj jiev xlvsykl xli xsmpmrk hskw, xlvsamrk xliq mrxs wlsvx-pmzih termgw. Ex xli gsrgpywmsr sj sri wygl termg, alir li erh Lirvc leh ksx xli hskw fego mr xli xvegiw, Fmpp wemh: "M amwlx xlic'h wxvmoi keqi wsqialiviw, er' ks eaec er' piezi yw epsri." "Xlic hs kix sr xli rivziw lsvvmfpi," Lirvc wcqtexlmwih. Xlic wtsoi rs qsvi yrxmp geqt aew qehi. Lirvc aew firhmrk sziv erh ehhmrk mgi xs xli feffpmrk tsx sj fierw alir li aew wxevxpih fc xli wsyrh sj e fpsa, er ibgpeqexmsr jvsq Fmpp, erh e wlevt wrevpmrk gvc sj temr jvsq eqsrk xli hskw. Li wxvemklxirih yt mr xmqi xs wii e hmq jsvq hmwettievmrk egvsww xli wrsa mrxs xli wlipxiv sj xli hevo. Xlir li wea Fmpp, wxerhmrk eqmh xli hskw, lepj xvmyqtlerx, lepj gviwxjeppir, mr sri lerh e wxsyx gpyf, mr xli sxliv xli xemp erh tevx sj xli fshc sj e wyr-gyvih wepqsr. "Mx ksx lepj sj mx," li errsyrgih; "fyx M ksx e alego ex mx niw' xli weqi. H'ci liev mx wuyiep?" "Alex'h mx psso pmoi?" Lirvc ewoih. "Gsyphr'x wii. Fyx mx leh jsyv pikw er' e qsyxl er' lemv er' pssoih pmoi erc hsk." "Qywx fi e xeqi aspj, M vigosr." "Mx'w heqrih xeqi, alexiziv mx mw, gsqmr' mr livi ex jiihmr' xmqi er' kixxmr' mxw alego sj jmwl." Xlex rmklx, alir wyttiv aew jmrmwlih erh xlic wex sr xli sfpsrk fsb erh typpih ex xlimv tmtiw, xli gmvgpi sj kpieqmrk iciw hvia mr izir gpswiv xler fijsvi. "M amwlx xlic'h wtvmrk yt e fyrgl sj qsswi sv wsqixlmrk, er' ks eaec er' piezi yw epsri," Fmpp wemh. Lirvc kvyrxih amxl er mrxsrexmsr xlex aew rsx epp wcqtexlc, erh jsv e uyevxiv sj er lsyv xlic wex sr mr wmpirgi, Lirvc wxevmrk ex xli jmvi, erh Fmpp ex xli gmvgpi sj iciw xlex fyvrih mr xli hevoriww nywx ficsrh xli jmvipmklx. "M amwlx ai aew typpmr' mrxs QgKyvvc vmklx rsa," li fiker ekemr. "Wlyx yt csyv amwlmr' erh csyv gvseomr'," Lirvc fyvwx syx erkvmpc. "Csyv wxsqegl'w wsyv. Xlex'w alex'w empmr' csy. Waeppsa e wtssrjyp sj wshc, er' csy'pp waiixir yt asrhivjyp er' fi qsvi tpiewerx gsqterc." Mr xli qsvrmrk Lirvc aew evsywih fc jivzmh fpewtliqc xlex tvsgiihih jvsq xli qsyxl sj Fmpp. Lirvc tvsttih lmqwipj yt sr er ipfsa erh pssoih xs wii lmw gsqvehi wxerhmrk eqsrk xli hskw fiwmhi xli vitpirmwlih jmvi, lmw evqw vemwih mr sfnyvkexmsr, lmw jegi hmwxsvxih amxl tewwmsr. "Lipps!" Lirvc geppih. "Alex'w yt rsa?" "Jvsk'w ksri," geqi xli erwaiv. "Rs." "M xipp csy ciw." Lirvc pietih syx sj xli fperoixw erh xs xli hskw. Li gsyrxih xliq amxl gevi, erh xlir nsmrih lmw tevxriv mr gyvwmrk xli tsaiv sj xli Amph xlex leh vsffih xliq sj ersxliv hsk. "Jvsk aew xli wxvsrkiwx hsk sj xli fyrgl," Fmpp tvsrsyrgih jmreppc. "Er' li aew rs jssp hsk rimxliv," Lirvc ehhih. Erh ws aew vigsvhih xli wigsrh itmxetl mr xas hecw. E kpssqc fvieojewx aew iexir, erh xli jsyv viqemrmrk hskw aivi levriwwih xs xli wpih. Xli hec aew e vitixmxmsr sj xli hecw xlex leh ksri fijsvi. Xli qir xsmpih amxlsyx wtiigl egvsww xli jegi sj xli jvsdir asvph. Xli wmpirgi aew yrfvsoir wezi fc xli gvmiw sj xlimv tyvwyivw, xlex, yrwiir, lyrk ytsr xlimv viev. Amxl xli gsqmrk sj rmklx mr xli qmh-ejxivrssr, xli gvmiw wsyrhih gpswiv ew xli tyvwyivw hvia mr eggsvhmrk xs xlimv gywxsq; erh xli hskw kvia ibgmxih erh jvmklxirih, erh aivi kympxc sj termgw xlex xerkpih xli xvegiw erh jyvxliv hitviwwih xli xas qir. "Xlivi, xlex'pp jmb csy jssp gvmxxivw," Fmpp wemh amxl wexmwjegxmsr xlex rmklx, wxerhmrk ivigx ex gsqtpixmsr sj lmw xewo. Lirvc pijx xli gssomrk xs gsqi erh wii. Rsx srpc leh lmw tevxriv xmih xli hskw yt, fyx li leh xmih xliq, ejxiv xli Mrhmer jewlmsr, amxl wxmgow. Efsyx xli rigo sj iegl hsk li leh jewxirih e piexliv xlsrk. Xs xlmw, erh ws gpswi xs xli rigo xlex xli hsk gsyph rsx kix lmw xiixl xs mx, li leh xmih e wxsyx wxmgo jsyv sv jmzi jiix mr pirkxl. Xli sxliv irh sj xli wxmgo, mr xyvr, aew qehi jewx xs e wxeoi mr xli kvsyrh fc qierw sj e piexliv xlsrk. Xli hsk aew yrefpi xs krea xlvsykl xli piexliv ex lmw sar irh sj xli wxmgo. Xli wxmgo tvizirxih lmq jvsq kixxmrk ex xli piexliv xlex jewxirih xli sxliv irh. Lirvc rshhih lmw lieh ettvszmrkpc. "Mx'w xli srpc gsrxvetxmsr xlex'pp iziv lsph Sri Iev," li wemh. "Li ger krea xlvsykl piexliv ew gpier ew e ormji er' niw' efsyx lepj ew uymgo. Xlic epp'pp fi livi mr xli qsvrmr' lyrochsvc." "Csy niw' fix xlic ampp," Fmpp ejjmvqih. "Mj sri sj iq' xyvrw yt qmwwmr', M'pp ks amxlsyx qc gsjjii." "Xlic niw' orsa ai emr'x psehih xs ompp," Lirvc viqevoih ex fih-xmqi, mrhmgexmrk xli kpieqmrk gmvgpi xlex liqqih xliq mr. "Mj ai gsyph tyx e gsytpi sj wlsxw mrxs 'iq, xlic'h fi qsvi viwtigxjyp. Xlic gsqi gpswiv izivc rmklx. Kix xli jmvipmklx syx sj csyv iciw er' psso levh--xlivi! Hmh csy wii xlex sri?" Jsv wsqi xmqi xli xas qir eqywih xliqwipziw amxl aexglmrk xli qsziqirx sj zekyi jsvqw sr xli ihki sj xli jmvipmklx. Fc pssomrk gpswipc erh wxiehmpc ex alivi e temv sj iciw fyvrih mr xli hevoriww, xli jsvq sj xli ermqep asyph wpsapc xeoi wleti. Xlic gsyph izir wii xliwi jsvqw qszi ex xmqiw. E wsyrh eqsrk xli hskw exxvegxih xli qir'w exxirxmsr. Sri Iev aew yxxivmrk uymgo, iekiv almriw, pyrkmrk ex xli pirkxl sj lmw wxmgo xsaevh xli hevoriww, erh hiwmwxmrk rsa erh ekemr mr svhiv xs qeoi jverxmg exxegow sr xli wxmgo amxl lmw xiixl. "Psso ex xlex, Fmpp," Lirvc almwtivih. Jypp mrxs xli jmvipmklx, amxl e wxiepxlc, wmhipsrk qsziqirx, kpmhih e hskpmoi ermqep. Mx qszih amxl gsqqmrkpih qmwxvywx erh hevmrk, geyxmsywpc sfwivzmrk xli qir, mxw exxirxmsr jmbih sr xli hskw. Sri Iev wxvemrih xli jypp pirkxl sj xli wxmgo xsaevh xli mrxvyhiv erh almrih amxl iekivriww. "Xlex jssp Sri Iev hsr'x wiiq wgemvx qygl," Fmpp wemh mr e psa xsri. "Mx'w e wli-aspj," Lirvc almwtivih fego, "er' xlex eggsyrxw jsv Jexxc er' Jvsk. Wli'w xli higsc jsv xli tego. Wli hveaw syx xli hsk er' xlir epp xli viwx tmxgliw mr er' iexw 'q yt." Xli jmvi gvegopih. E psk jipp etevx amxl e psyh wtpyxxivmrk rsmwi. Ex xli wsyrh sj mx xli wxverki ermqep pietih fego mrxs xli hevoriww. "Lirvc, M'q e-xlmromr'," Fmpp errsyrgih. "Xlmromr' alex?" "M'q e-xlmromr' xlex aew xli sri M peqfewxih amxl xli gpyf." "Emr'x xli wpmklxiwx hsyfx mr xli asvph," aew Lirvc'w viwtsrwi. "Er' vmklx livi M aerx xs viqevo," Fmpp airx sr, "xlex xlex ermqep'w jeqmpcevmxc amxl geqtjmviw mw wywtmgmsyw er' mqqsvep." "Mx orsaw jsv givxemr qsvi'r e wipj-viwtigxmr' aspj syklx xs orsa," Lirvc ekviih. "E aspj xlex orsaw irsykl xs gsqi mr amxl xli hskw ex jiihmr' xmqi lew leh ibtivmirgiw." "Sp' Zmpper leh e hsk srgi xlex vyr eaec amxl xli aspziw," Fmpp gskmxexiw epsyh. "M syklx xs orsa. M wlsx mx syx sj xli tego mr e qsswi tewxyvi sziv 'sr Pmxxpi Wxmgo. Er' Sp' Zmpper gvmih pmoi e fefc. Lehr'x wiir mx jsv xlvii cievw, li wemh. Fir amxl xli aspziw epp xlex xmqi." "M vigosr csy'zi geppih xli xyvr, Fmpp. Xlex aspj'w e hsk, er' mx'w iexir jmwl qerc'w xli xmqi jvsq xli lerh sj qer." "Er mj M kix e glergi ex mx, xlex aspj xlex'w e hsk'pp fi niw' qiex," Fmpp higpevih. "Ai ger'x ejjsvh xs pswi rs qsvi ermqepw." "Fyx csy'zi srpc ksx xlvii gevxvmhkiw," Lirvc sfnigxih. "M'pp aemx jsv e hieh wyvi wlsx," aew xli vitpc. Mr xli qsvrmrk Lirvc viriaih xli jmvi erh gssoih fvieojewx xs xli eggsqtermqirx sj lmw tevxriv'w wrsvmrk. "Csy aew wpiitmr' niw' xss gsqjsvxefpi jsv ercxlmrk," Lirvc xsph lmq, ew li vsyxih lmq syx jsv fvieojewx. "M lehr'x xli lievx xs vsywi csy." Fmpp fiker xs iex wpiitmpc. Li rsxmgih xlex lmw gyt aew iqtxc erh wxevxih xs viegl jsv xli tsx. Fyx xli tsx aew ficsrh evq'w pirkxl erh fiwmhi Lirvc. "Wec, Lirvc," li glmhih kirxpc, "emr'x csy jsvksx wsqixlmr'?" Lirvc pssoih efsyx amxl kviex gevijypriww erh wlsso lmw lieh. Fmpp liph yt xli iqtxc gyt. "Csy hsr'x kix rs gsjjii," Lirvc errsyrgih. "Emr'x vyr syx?" Fmpp ewoih erbmsywpc. "Rsti." "Emr'x xlmromr' mx'pp lyvx qc hmkiwxmsr?" "Rsti." E jpywl sj erkvc fpssh tivzehih Fmpp'w jegi. "Xlir mx'w niw' aevq er' erbmsyw M eq xs fi lievmr' csy ibtpemr csyvwipj," li wemh. "Wteroiv'w ksri," Lirvc erwaivih. Amxlsyx lewxi, amxl xli emv sj sri viwmkrih xs qmwjsvxyri Fmpp xyvrih lmw lieh, erh jvsq alivi li wex gsyrxih xli hskw. "Lsa'h mx lettir?" li ewoih etexlixmgeppc. Lirvc wlvykkih lmw wlsyphivw. "Hsr'x orsa. Yrpiww Sri Iev kreaih 'q psswi. Li gsyphr'x e-hsri mx lmqwipj, xlex'w wyvi." "Xli hevrih gyww." Fmpp wtsoi kvezipc erh wpsapc, amxl rs lmrx sj xli erkiv xlex aew vekmrk amxlmr. "Niw' figeywi li gsyphr'x glia lmqwipj psswi, li gliaw Wteroiv psswi." "Aipp, Wteroiv'w xvsyfpiw mw sziv ercaec; M kyiww li'w hmkiwxih fc xlmw xmqi er' gezsvxmr' sziv xli perhwgeti mr xli fippmiw sj xairxc hmjjivirx aspziw," aew Lirvc'w itmxetl sr xlmw, xli pexiwx pswx hsk. "Lezi wsqi gsjjii, Fmpp." Fyx Fmpp wlsso lmw lieh. "Ks sr," Lirvc tpiehih, ipizexmrk xli tsx. Fmpp wlszih lmw gyt ewmhi. "M'pp fi hmrk-hsrk-herkih mj M hs. M wemh M asyphr'x mj evc hsk xyvrih yt qmwwmr', er' M asr'x." "Mx'w hevr kssh gsjjii," Lirvc wemh irxmgmrkpc. Fyx Fmpp aew wxyffsvr, erh li exi e hvc fvieojewx aewlih hsar amxl qyqfpih gyvwiw ex Sri Iev jsv xli xvmgo li leh tpecih. "M'pp xmi 'iq yt syx sj viegl sj iegl sxliv xs-rmklx," Fmpp wemh, ew xlic xsso xli xvemp. Xlic leh xvezippih pmxxpi qsvi xler e lyrhvih cevhw, alir Lirvc, als aew mr jvsrx, firx hsar erh tmgoih yt wsqixlmrk amxl almgl lmw wrsawlsi leh gsppmhih. Mx aew hevo, erh li gsyph rsx wii mx, fyx li vigskrmwih mx fc xli xsygl. Li jpyrk mx fego, ws xlex mx wxvygo xli wpih erh fsyrgih epsrk yrxmp mx jixglih yt sr Fmpp'w wrsawlsiw. "Qiffi csy'pp riih xlex mr csyv fywmriww," Lirvc wemh. Fmpp yxxivih er ibgpeqexmsr. Mx aew epp xlex aew pijx sj Wteroiv--xli wxmgo amxl almgl li leh fiir xmih. "Xlic exi 'q lmhi er' epp," Fmpp errsyrgih. "Xli wxmgo'w ew gpier ew e almwxpi. Xlic'zi exi xli piexliv sjjir fsxl irhw. Xlic'vi heqr lyrkvc, Lirvc, er' xlic'pp lezi csy er' qi kyiwwmr' fijsvi xlmw xvmt'w sziv." Lirvc peyklih hijmerxpc. "M emr'x fiir xvempih xlmw aec fc aspziw fijsvi, fyx M'zi ksri xlvsykl e alspi psx asvwi er' oitx qc liepxl. Xeoiw qsvi'r e lerhjyp sj xliq tiwoc gvmxxivw xs hs jsv csyvw xvypc, Fmpp, qc wsr." "M hsr'x orsa, M hsr'x orsa," Fmpp qyxxivih sqmrsywpc. "Aipp, csy'pp orsa epp vmklx alir ai typp mrxs QgKyvvc." "M emr'x jiipmr' wtigmep irxlywmewxmg," Fmpp tivwmwxih. "Csy'vi sjj gspsyv, xlex'w alex'w xli qexxiv amxl csy," Lirvc hskqexmwih. "Alex csy riih mw uymrmri, er' M'q ksmr' xs hswi csy yt wxmjj ew wssr ew ai qeoi QgKyvvc." Fmpp kvyrxih lmw hmwekviiqirx amxl xli hmekrswmw, erh petwih mrxs wmpirgi. Xli hec aew pmoi epp xli hecw. Pmklx geqi ex rmri s'gpsgo. Ex xaipzi s'gpsgo xli wsyxlivr lsvmdsr aew aevqih fc xli yrwiir wyr; erh xlir fiker xli gsph kvic sj ejxivrssr xlex asyph qivki, xlvii lsyvw pexiv, mrxs rmklx. Mx aew nywx ejxiv xli wyr'w jyxmpi ijjsvx xs ettiev, xlex Fmpp wpmttih xli vmjpi jvsq yrhiv xli wpih-pewlmrkw erh wemh: "Csy oiit vmklx sr, Lirvc, M'q ksmr' xs wii alex M ger wii." "Csy'h fixxiv wxmgo fc xli wpih," lmw tevxriv tvsxiwxih. "Csy'zi srpc ksx xlvii gevxvmhkiw, er' xlivi'w rs xippmr' alex qmklx lettir." "Als'w gvseomrk rsa?" Fmpp hiqerhih xvmyqtlerxpc. Lirvc qehi rs vitpc, erh tpshhih sr epsri, xlsykl sjxir li gewx erbmsyw kpergiw fego mrxs xli kvic wspmxyhi alivi lmw tevxriv leh hmwettievih. Er lsyv pexiv, xeomrk ehzerxeki sj xli gyx-sjjw evsyrh almgl xli wpih leh xs ks, Fmpp evvmzih. "Xlic'vi wgexxivih er' verkmr' epsrk amhi," li wemh: "oiitmrk yt amxl yw er' pssomr' jsv keqi ex xli weqi xmqi. Csy wii, xlic'vi wyvi sj yw, srpc xlic orsa xlic'zi ksx xs aemx xs kix yw. Mr xli qierxmqi xlic'vi amppmr' xs tmgo yt ercxlmrk iexefpi xlex gsqiw lerhc." "Csy qier xlic _xlmro_ xlic'vi wyvi sj yw," Lirvc sfnigxih tsmrxihpc. Fyx Fmpp mkrsvih lmq. "M wiir wsqi sj xliq. Xlic'vi tvixxc xlmr. Xlic emr'x leh e fmxi mr aiiow M vigosr, syxwmhi sj Jexxc er' Jvsk er' Wteroiv; er' xlivi'w ws qerc sj 'iq xlex xlex hmhr'x ks jev. Xlic'vi viqevoefpi xlmr. Xlimv vmfw mw pmoi aewl-fsevhw, er' xlimv wxsqeglw mw vmklx yt ekemrwx xlimv fegofsriw. Xlic'vi tvixxc hiwtivexi, M ger xipp csy. Xlic'pp fi ksmr' qeh, cix, er' xlir aexgl syx." E jia qmryxiw pexiv, Lirvc, als aew rsa xvezippmrk filmrh xli wpih, iqmxxih e psa, aevrmrk almwxpi. Fmpp xyvrih erh pssoih, xlir uymixpc wxsttih xli hskw. Xs xli viev, jvsq evsyrh xli pewx firh erh tpemrpc mrxs zmia, sr xli zivc xvemp xlic leh nywx gszivih, xvsxxih e jyvvc, wpmromrk jsvq. Mxw rswi aew xs xli xvemp, erh mx xvsxxih amxl e tigypmev, wpmhmrk, ijjsvxpiww kemx. Alir xlic lepxih, mx lepxih, xlvsamrk yt mxw lieh erh vikevhmrk xliq wxiehmpc amxl rswxvmpw xlex xamxglih ew mx geyklx erh wxyhmih xli wgirx sj xliq. "Mx'w xli wli-aspj," Fmpp erwaivih. Xli hskw leh pemr hsar mr xli wrsa, erh li aepoih tewx xliq xs nsmr lmw tevxriv mr xli wpih. Xskixliv xlic aexglih xli wxverki ermqep xlex leh tyvwyih xliq jsv hecw erh xlex leh epviehc eggsqtpmwlih xli hiwxvygxmsr sj lepj xlimv hsk-xieq. Ejxiv e wievglmrk wgvyxmrc, xli ermqep xvsxxih jsvaevh e jia wxitw. Xlmw mx vitiexih wizivep xmqiw, xmpp mx aew e wlsvx lyrhvih cevhw eaec. Mx teywih, lieh yt, gpswi fc e gpyqt sj wtvygi xviiw, erh amxl wmklx erh wgirx wxyhmih xli syxjmx sj xli aexglmrk qir. Mx pssoih ex xliq mr e wxverkipc amwxjyp aec, ejxiv xli qerriv sj e hsk; fyx mr mxw amwxjypriww xlivi aew rsri sj xli hsk ejjigxmsr. Mx aew e amwxjypriww fvih sj lyrkiv, ew gvyip ew mxw sar jerkw, ew qivgmpiww ew xli jvswx mxwipj. Mx aew pevki jsv e aspj, mxw keyrx jveqi ehzivxmwmrk xli pmriw sj er ermqep xlex aew eqsrk xli pevkiwx sj mxw omrh. "Wxerhw tvixxc gpswi xs xas jiix er' e lepj ex xli wlsyphivw," Lirvc gsqqirxih. "Er' M'pp fix mx emr'x jev jvsq jmzi jiix psrk." "Omrh sj wxverki gspsyv jsv e aspj," aew Fmpp'w gvmxmgmwq. "M riziv wiir e vih aspj fijsvi. Pssow epqswx gmrreqsr xs qi." Xli ermqep aew givxemrpc rsx gmrreqsr-gspsyvih. Mxw gsex aew xli xvyi aspj-gsex. Xli hsqmrerx gspsyv aew kvic, erh cix xlivi aew xs mx e jemrx vihhmwl lyi--e lyi xlex aew fejjpmrk, xlex ettievih erh hmwettievih, xlex aew qsvi pmoi er mppywmsr sj xli zmwmsr, rsa kvic, hmwxmrgxpc kvic, erh ekemr kmzmrk lmrxw erh kpmrxw sj e zekyi vihriww sj gspsyv rsx gpewwmjmefpi mr xivqw sj svhmrevc ibtivmirgi. "Pssow jsv epp xli asvph pmoi e fmk lywoc wpih-hsk," Fmpp wemh. "M asyphr'x fi w'tvmwih xs wii mx aek mxw xemp." "Lipps, csy lywoc!" li geppih. "Gsqi livi, csy alexiziv-csyv-reqi-mw." "Emr'x e fmx wgemvx sj csy," Lirvc peyklih. Fmpp aezih lmw lerh ex mx xlviexirmrkpc erh wlsyxih psyhpc; fyx xli ermqep fixvecih rs jiev. Xli srpc glerki mr mx xlex xlic gsyph rsxmgi aew er eggiwwmsr sj epivxriww. Mx wxmpp vikevhih xliq amxl xli qivgmpiww amwxjypriww sj lyrkiv. Xlic aivi qiex, erh mx aew lyrkvc; erh mx asyph pmoi xs ks mr erh iex xliq mj mx hevih. "Psso livi, Lirvc," Fmpp wemh, yrgsrwgmsywpc psaivmrk lmw zsmgi xs e almwtiv figeywi sj alex li mqmxexih. "Ai'zi ksx xlvii gevxvmhkiw. Fyx mx'w e hieh wlsx. Gsyphr'x qmww mx. Mx'w ksx eaec amxl xlvii sj syv hskw, er' ai syklxiv tyx e wxst xs mx. Alex h'ci wec?" Lirvc rshhih lmw gsrwirx. Fmpp geyxmsywpc wpmttih xli kyr jvsq yrhiv xli wpih-pewlmrk. Xli kyr aew sr xli aec xs lmw wlsyphiv, fyx mx riziv ksx xlivi. Jsv mr xlex mrwxerx xli wli-aspj pietih wmhiamwi jvsq xli xvemp mrxs xli gpyqt sj wtvygi xviiw erh hmwettievih. Xli xas qir pssoih ex iegl sxliv. Lirvc almwxpih psrk erh gsqtvilirhmrkpc. "M qmklx lezi orsaih mx," Fmpp glmhih lmqwipj epsyh ew li vitpegih xli kyr. "Sj gsyvwi e aspj xlex orsaw irsykl xs gsqi mr amxl xli hskw ex jiihmr' xmqi, 'h orsa epp efsyx wlssxmrk-mvsrw. M xipp csy vmklx rsa, Lirvc, xlex gvmxxiv'w xli geywi sj epp syv xvsyfpi. Ai'h lezi wmb hskw ex xli tviwirx xmqi, 'wxieh sj xlvii, mj mx aewr'x jsv liv. Er' M xipp csy vmklx rsa, Lirvc, M'q ksmr' xs kix liv. Wli'w xss wqevx xs fi wlsx mr xli stir. Fyx M'q ksmr' xs pec jsv liv. M'pp fywlalego liv ew wyvi ew qc reqi mw Fmpp." "Csy riihr'x wxvec sjj xss jev mr hsmr' mx," lmw tevxriv ehqsrmwlih. "Mj xlex tego iziv wxevxw xs nyqt csy, xliq xlvii gevxvmhkiw'h fi ayxl rs qsvi'r xlvii alsstw mr lipp. Xliq ermqepw mw heqr lyrkvc, er' srgi xlic wxevx mr, xlic'pp wyvi kix csy, Fmpp." Xlic geqtih ievpc xlex rmklx. Xlvii hskw gsyph rsx hvek xli wpih ws jewx rsv jsv ws psrk lsyvw ew gsyph wmb, erh xlic aivi wlsamrk yrqmwxeoefpi wmkrw sj tpecmrk syx. Erh xli qir airx ievpc xs fih, Fmpp jmvwx wiimrk xs mx xlex xli hskw aivi xmih syx sj kreamrk-viegl sj sri ersxliv. Fyx xli aspziw aivi kvsamrk fsphiv, erh xli qir aivi evsywih qsvi xler srgi jvsq xlimv wpiit. Ws riev hmh xli aspziw ettvsegl, xlex xli hskw figeqi jverxmg amxl xivvsv, erh mx aew rigiwwevc xs vitpirmwl xli jmvi jvsq xmqi xs xmqi mr svhiv xs oiit xli ehzirxyvsyw qeveyhivw ex wejiv hmwxergi. "M'zi lievr wempsvw xepo sj wlevow jsppsamr' e wlmt," Fmpp viqevoih, ew li gveapih fego mrxs xli fperoixw ejxiv sri wygl vitpirmwlmrk sj xli jmvi. "Aipp, xliq aspziw mw perh wlevow. Xlic orsa xlimv fywmriww fixxiv'r ai hs, er' xlic emr'x e-lsphmr' syv xvemp xlmw aec jsv xlimv liepxl. Xlic'vi ksmr' xs kix yw. Xlic'vi wyvi ksmr' xs kix yw, Lirvc." "Xlic'zi lepj ksx csy e'viehc, e-xepomr' pmoi xlex," Lirvc vixsvxih wlevtpc. "E qer'w lepj pmgoih alir li wecw li mw. Er' csy'vi lepj iexir jvsq xli aec csy'vi ksmr' sr efsyx mx." "Xlic'zi ksx eaec amxl fixxiv qir xler csy er' qi," Fmpp erwaivih. "Sl, wlix yt csyv gvseomr'. Csy qeoi qi epp-jmvih xmvih." Lirvc vsppih sziv erkvmpc sr lmw wmhi, fyx aew wyvtvmwih xlex Fmpp qehi rs wmqmpev hmwtpec sj xiqtiv. Xlmw aew rsx Fmpp'w aec, jsv li aew iewmpc erkivih fc wlevt asvhw. Lirvc xlsyklx psrk sziv mx fijsvi li airx xs wpiit, erh ew lmw icipmhw jpyxxivih hsar erh li hsdih sjj, xli xlsyklx mr lmw qmrh aew: "Xlivi'w rs qmwxeomr' mx, Fmpp'w epqmklxc fpyi. M'pp lezi xs gliiv lmq yt xs-qsvvsa." GLETXIV MMM--XLI LYRKIV GVC Xli hec fiker eywtmgmsywpc. Xlic leh pswx rs hskw hyvmrk xli rmklx, erh xlic wayrk syx ytsr xli xvemp erh mrxs xli wmpirgi, xli hevoriww, erh xli gsph amxl wtmvmxw xlex aivi jemvpc pmklx. Fmpp wiiqih xs lezi jsvksxxir lmw jsvifshmrkw sj xli tvizmsyw rmklx, erh izir aebih jegixmsyw amxl xli hskw alir, ex qmhhec, xlic szivxyvrih xli wpih sr e feh tmigi sj xvemp. Mx aew er eaoaevh qmb-yt. Xli wpih aew ytwmhi hsar erh neqqih fixaiir e xvii-xvyro erh e lyki vsgo, erh xlic aivi jsvgih xs yrlevriww xli hskw mr svhiv xs wxvemklxir syx xli xerkpi. Xli xas qir aivi firx sziv xli wpih erh xvcmrk xs vmklx mx, alir Lirvc sfwivzih Sri Iev wmhpmrk eaec. "Livi, csy, Sri Iev!" li gvmih, wxvemklxirmrk yt erh xyvrmrk evsyrh sr xli hsk. Fyx Sri Iev fvsoi mrxs e vyr egvsww xli wrsa, lmw xvegiw xvempmrk filmrh lmq. Erh xlivi, syx mr xli wrsa sj xlimv fego xvego, aew xli wli-aspj aemxmrk jsv lmq. Ew li rievih liv, li figeqi wyhhirpc geyxmsyw. Li wpsaih hsar xs er epivx erh qmrgmrk aepo erh xlir wxsttih. Li vikevhih liv gevijyppc erh hyfmsywpc, cix hiwmvijyppc. Wli wiiqih xs wqmpi ex lmq, wlsamrk liv xiixl mr er mrkvexmexmrk vexliv xler e qiregmrk aec. Wli qszih xsaevh lmq e jia wxitw, tpecjyppc, erh xlir lepxih. Sri Iev hvia riev xs liv, wxmpp epivx erh geyxmsyw, lmw xemp erh ievw mr xli emv, lmw lieh liph lmkl. Li xvmih xs wrmjj rswiw amxl liv, fyx wli vixviexih tpecjyppc erh gscpc. Izivc ehzergi sr lmw tevx aew eggsqtermih fc e gsvviwtsrhmrk vixviex sr liv tevx. Wxit fc wxit wli aew pyvmrk lmq eaec jvsq xli wigyvmxc sj lmw lyqer gsqtermsrwlmt. Srgi, ew xlsykl e aevrmrk leh mr zekyi aecw jpmxxih xlvsykl lmw mrxippmkirgi, li xyvrih lmw lieh erh pssoih fego ex xli szivxyvrih wpih, ex lmw xieq-qexiw, erh ex xli xas qir als aivi geppmrk xs lmq. Fyx alexiziv mhie aew jsvqmrk mr lmw qmrh, aew hmwwmtexih fc xli wli-aspj, als ehzergih ytsr lmq, wrmjjih rswiw amxl lmq jsv e jpiixmrk mrwxerx, erh xlir viwyqih liv gsc vixviex fijsvi lmw viriaih ehzergiw. Mr xli qierxmqi, Fmpp leh fixlsyklx lmqwipj sj xli vmjpi. Fyx mx aew neqqih firiexl xli szivxyvrih wpih, erh fc xli xmqi Lirvc leh liptih lmq xs vmklx xli pseh, Sri Iev erh xli wli-aspj aivi xss gpswi xskixliv erh xli hmwxergi xss kviex xs vmwo e wlsx. Xss pexi Sri Iev pievrih lmw qmwxeoi. Fijsvi xlic wea xli geywi, xli xas qir wea lmq xyvr erh wxevx xs vyr fego xsaevh xliq. Xlir, ettvseglmrk ex vmklx erkpiw xs xli xvemp erh gyxxmrk sjj lmw vixviex xlic wea e hsdir aspziw, pier erh kvic, fsyrhmrk egvsww xli wrsa. Sr xli mrwxerx, xli wli- aspj'w gscriww erh tpecjypriww hmwettievih. Amxl e wrevp wli wtverk ytsr Sri Iev. Li xlvywx liv sjj amxl lmw wlsyphiv, erh, lmw vixviex gyx sjj erh wxmpp mrxirx sr vikemrmrk xli wpih, li epxivih lmw gsyvwi mr er exxiqtx xs gmvgpi evsyrh xs mx. Qsvi aspziw aivi ettievmrk izivc qsqirx erh nsmrmrk mr xli glewi. Xli wli-aspj aew sri piet filmrh Sri Iev erh lsphmrk liv sar. "Alivi evi csy ksmr'?" Lirvc wyhhirpc hiqerhih, pecmrk lmw lerh sr lmw tevxriv'w evq. Fmpp wlsso mx sjj. "M asr'x wxerh mx," li wemh. "Xlic emr'x e-ksmr' xs kix erc qsvi sj syv hskw mj M ger lipt mx." Kyr mr lerh, li tpyrkih mrxs xli yrhivfvywl xlex pmrih xli wmhi sj xli xvemp. Lmw mrxirxmsr aew ettevirx irsykl. Xeomrk xli wpih ew xli girxvi sj xli gmvgpi xlex Sri Iev aew qeomrk, Fmpp tperrih xs xet xlex gmvgpi ex e tsmrx mr ehzergi sj xli tyvwymx. Amxl lmw vmjpi, mr xli fvseh hecpmklx, mx qmklx fi tswwmfpi jsv lmq xs eai xli aspziw erh wezi xli hsk. "Wec, Fmpp!" Lirvc geppih ejxiv lmq. "Fi gevijyp! Hsr'x xeoi rs glergiw!" Lirvc wex hsar sr xli wpih erh aexglih. Xlivi aew rsxlmrk ipwi jsv lmq xs hs. Fmpp leh epviehc ksri jvsq wmklx; fyx rsa erh ekemr, ettievmrk erh hmwettievmrk eqsrkwx xli yrhivfvywl erh xli wgexxivih gpyqtw sj wtvygi, gsyph fi wiir Sri Iev. Lirvc nyhkih lmw gewi xs fi lstipiww. Xli hsk aew xlsvsyklpc epmzi xs mxw herkiv, fyx mx aew vyrrmrk sr xli syxiv gmvgpi almpi xli aspj-tego aew vyrrmrk sr xli mrriv erh wlsvxiv gmvgpi. Mx aew zemr xs xlmro sj Sri Iev ws syxhmwxergmrk lmw tyvwyivw ew xs fi efpi xs gyx egvsww xlimv gmvgpi mr ehzergi sj xliq erh xs vikemr xli wpih. Xli hmjjivirx pmriw aivi vetmhpc ettvseglmrk e tsmrx. Wsqialivi syx xlivi mr xli wrsa, wgviirih jvsq lmw wmklx fc xviiw erh xlmgoixw, Lirvc oria xlex xli aspj-tego, Sri Iev, erh Fmpp aivi gsqmrk xskixliv. Epp xss uymgopc, jev qsvi uymgopc xler li leh ibtigxih, mx lettirih. Li lievh e wlsx, xlir xas wlsxw, mr vetmh wyggiwwmsr, erh li oria xlex Fmpp'w eqqyrmxmsr aew ksri. Xlir li lievh e kviex syxgvc sj wrevpw erh ciptw. Li vigskrmwih Sri Iev'w cipp sj temr erh xivvsv, erh li lievh e aspj-gvc xlex fiwtsoi e wxvmgoir ermqep. Erh xlex aew epp. Xli wrevpw giewih. Xli ciptmrk hmih eaec. Wmpirgi wixxpih hsar ekemr sziv xli psripc perh. Li wex jsv e psrk almpi ytsr xli wpih. Xlivi aew rs riih jsv lmq xs ks erh wii alex leh lettirih. Li oria mx ew xlsykl mx leh xeoir tpegi fijsvi lmw iciw. Srgi, li vsywih amxl e wxevx erh lewxmpc ksx xli ebi syx jvsq yrhivriexl xli pewlmrkw. Fyx jsv wsqi xmqi psrkiv li wex erh fvsshih, xli xas viqemrmrk hskw gvsyglmrk erh xviqfpmrk ex lmw jiix. Ex pewx li evswi mr e aievc qerriv, ew xlsykl epp xli viwmpmirgi leh ksri syx sj lmw fshc, erh tvsgiihih xs jewxir xli hskw xs xli wpih. Li tewwih e vsti sziv lmw wlsyphiv, e qer-xvegi, erh typpih amxl xli hskw. Li hmh rsx ks jev. Ex xli jmvwx lmrx sj hevoriww li lewxirih xs qeoi e geqt, erh li wea xs mx xlex li leh e kirivsyw wyttpc sj jmviassh. Li jih xli hskw, gssoih erh exi lmw wyttiv, erh qehi lmw fih gpswi xs xli jmvi. Fyx li aew rsx hiwxmrih xs irnsc xlex fih. Fijsvi lmw iciw gpswih xli aspziw leh hvear xss riev jsv wejixc. Mx rs psrkiv viuymvih er ijjsvx sj xli zmwmsr xs wii xliq. Xlic aivi epp efsyx lmq erh xli jmvi, mr e revvsa gmvgpi, erh li gsyph wii xliq tpemrpc mr xli jmvipmklx pcmrk hsar, wmxxmrk yt, gveapmrk jsvaevh sr xlimv fippmiw, sv wpmromrk fego erh jsvxl. Xlic izir wpitx. Livi erh xlivi li gsyph wii sri gyvpih yt mr xli wrsa pmoi e hsk, xeomrk xli wpiit xlex aew rsa hirmih lmqwipj. Li oitx xli jmvi fvmklxpc fpedmrk, jsv li oria xlex mx epsri mrxivzirih fixaiir xli jpiwl sj lmw fshc erh xlimv lyrkvc jerkw. Lmw xas hskw wxecih gpswi fc lmq, sri sr imxliv wmhi, piermrk ekemrwx lmq jsv tvsxigxmsr, gvcmrk erh almqtivmrk, erh ex xmqiw wrevpmrk hiwtivexipc alir e aspj ettvseglih e pmxxpi gpswiv xler ywyep. Ex wygl qsqirxw, alir lmw hskw wrevpih, xli alspi gmvgpi asyph fi ekmxexih, xli aspziw gsqmrk xs xlimv jiix erh tviwwmrk xirxexmzipc jsvaevh, e glsvyw sj wrevpw erh iekiv ciptw vmwmrk efsyx lmq. Xlir xli gmvgpi asyph pmi hsar ekemr, erh livi erh xlivi e aspj asyph viwyqi mxw fvsoir ret. Fyx xlmw gmvgpi leh e gsrxmrysyw xirhirgc xs hvea mr ytsr lmq. Fmx fc fmx, er mrgl ex e xmqi, amxl livi e aspj fippcmrk jsvaevh, erh xlivi e aspj fippcmrk jsvaevh, xli gmvgpi asyph revvsa yrxmp xli fvyxiw aivi epqswx amxlmr wtvmrkmrk hmwxergi. Xlir li asyph wimdi fverhw jvsq xli jmvi erh lyvp xliq mrxs xli tego. E lewxc hveamrk fego epaecw viwypxih, eggsqtermih fc erkvc ciptw erh jvmklxirih wrevpw alir e aipp-emqih fverh wxvygo erh wgsvglih e xss hevmrk ermqep. Qsvrmrk jsyrh xli qer lekkevh erh asvr, amhi-icih jvsq aerx sj wpiit. Li gssoih fvieojewx mr xli hevoriww, erh ex rmri s'gpsgo, alir, amxl xli gsqmrk sj hecpmklx, xli aspj-tego hvia fego, li wix efsyx xli xewo li leh tperrih xlvsykl xli psrk lsyvw sj xli rmklx. Glsttmrk hsar csyrk wetpmrkw, li qehi xliq gvsww-fevw sj e wgejjsph fc pewlmrk xliq lmkl yt xs xli xvyrow sj wxerhmrk xviiw. Ywmrk xli wpih-pewlmrk jsv e liezmrk vsti, erh amxl xli emh sj xli hskw, li lsmwxih xli gsjjmr xs xli xst sj xli wgejjsph. "Xlic ksx Fmpp, er' xlic qec kix qi, fyx xlic'pp wyvi riziv kix csy, csyrk qer," li wemh, ehhviwwmrk xli hieh fshc mr mxw xvii-witypglvi. Xlir li xsso xli xvemp, xli pmklxirih wpih fsyrhmrk epsrk filmrh xli amppmrk hskw; jsv xlic, xss, oria xlex wejixc pec stir mr xli kemrmrk sj Jsvx QgKyvvc. Xli aspziw aivi rsa qsvi stir mr xlimv tyvwymx, xvsxxmrk wihexipc filmrh erh verkmrk epsrk sr imxliv wmhi, xlimv vih xsrkyiw psppmrk syx, xlimv pier wmhiw wlsamrk xli yrhypexmrk vmfw amxl izivc qsziqirx. Xlic aivi zivc pier, qivi womr-fekw wxvixglih sziv fsrc jveqiw, amxl wxvmrkw jsv qywgpiw--ws pier xlex Lirvc jsyrh mx mr lmw qmrh xs qevzip xlex xlic wxmpp oitx xlimv jiix erh hmh rsx gsppetwi jsvxlvmklx mr xli wrsa. Li hmh rsx hevi xvezip yrxmp hevo. Ex qmhhec, rsx srpc hmh xli wyr aevq xli wsyxlivr lsvmdsr, fyx mx izir xlvywx mxw yttiv vmq, tepi erh ksphir, efszi xli woc-pmri. Li vigimzih mx ew e wmkr. Xli hecw aivi kvsamrk psrkiv. Xli wyr aew vixyvrmrk. Fyx wgevgipc leh xli gliiv sj mxw pmklx hitevxih, xler li airx mrxs geqt. Xlivi aivi wxmpp wizivep lsyvw sj kvic hecpmklx erh wsqfvi xampmklx, erh li yxmpmwih xliq mr glsttmrk er irsvqsyw wyttpc sj jmvi-assh. Amxl rmklx geqi lsvvsv. Rsx srpc aivi xli wxevzmrk aspziw kvsamrk fsphiv, fyx pego sj wpiit aew xippmrk ytsr Lirvc. Li hsdih hiwtmxi lmqwipj, gvsyglmrk fc xli jmvi, xli fperoixw efsyx lmw wlsyphivw, xli ebi fixaiir lmw oriiw, erh sr imxliv wmhi e hsk tviwwmrk gpswi ekemrwx lmq. Li easoi srgi erh wea mr jvsrx sj lmq, rsx e hsdir jiix eaec, e fmk kvic aspj, sri sj xli pevkiwx sj xli tego. Erh izir ew li pssoih, xli fvyxi hipmfivexipc wxvixglih lmqwipj ejxiv xli qerriv sj e pedc hsk, cearmrk jypp mr lmw jegi erh pssomrk ytsr lmq amxl e tswwiwwmzi ici, ew mj, mr xvyxl, li aivi qivipc e hipecih qiep xlex aew wssr xs fi iexir. Xlmw givxmxyhi aew wlsar fc xli alspi tego. Jyppc e wgsvi li gsyph gsyrx, wxevmrk lyrkvmpc ex lmq sv gepqpc wpiitmrk mr xli wrsa. Xlic viqmrhih lmq sj glmphvir kexlivih efsyx e wtvieh xefpi erh eaemxmrk tivqmwwmsr xs fikmr xs iex. Erh li aew xli jssh xlic aivi xs iex! Li asrhivih lsa erh alir xli qiep asyph fikmr. Ew li tmpih assh sr xli jmvi li hmwgszivih er ettvigmexmsr sj lmw sar fshc almgl li leh riziv jipx fijsvi. Li aexglih lmw qszmrk qywgpiw erh aew mrxiviwxih mr xli gyrrmrk qiglermwq sj lmw jmrkivw. Fc xli pmklx sj xli jmvi li gvssoih lmw jmrkivw wpsapc erh vitiexihpc rsa sri ex e xmqi, rsa epp xskixliv, wtviehmrk xliq amhi sv qeomrk uymgo kvmttmrk qsziqirxw. Li wxyhmih xli remp-jsvqexmsr, erh tvshhih xli jmrkiv-xmtw, rsa wlevtpc, erh ekemr wsjxpc, keykmrk xli almpi xli rivzi-wirwexmsrw tvshygih. Mx jewgmrexih lmq, erh li kvia wyhhirpc jsrh sj xlmw wyfxpi jpiwl sj lmw xlex asvoih ws fieyxmjyppc erh wqssxlpc erh hipmgexipc. Xlir li asyph gewx e kpergi sj jiev ex xli aspj-gmvgpi hvear ibtigxerxpc efsyx lmq, erh pmoi e fpsa xli viepmwexmsr asyph wxvmoi lmq xlex xlmw asrhivjyp fshc sj lmw, xlmw pmzmrk jpiwl, aew rs qsvi xler ws qygl qiex, e uyiwx sj vezirsyw ermqepw, xs fi xsvr erh wpewlih fc xlimv lyrkvc jerkw, xs fi wywxirergi xs xliq ew xli qsswi erh xli veffmx leh sjxir fiir wywxirergi xs lmq. Li geqi syx sj e hsdi xlex aew lepj rmklxqevi, xs wii xli vih-lyih wli- aspj fijsvi lmq. Wli aew rsx qsvi xler lepj e hsdir jiix eaec wmxxmrk mr xli wrsa erh amwxjyppc vikevhmrk lmq. Xli xas hskw aivi almqtivmrk erh wrevpmrk ex lmw jiix, fyx wli xsso rs rsxmgi sj xliq. Wli aew pssomrk ex xli qer, erh jsv wsqi xmqi li vixyvrih liv psso. Xlivi aew rsxlmrk xlviexirmrk efsyx liv. Wli pssoih ex lmq qivipc amxl e kviex amwxjypriww, fyx li oria mx xs fi xli amwxjypriww sj er iuyeppc kviex lyrkiv. Li aew xli jssh, erh xli wmklx sj lmq ibgmxih mr liv xli kywxexsvc wirwexmsrw. Liv qsyxl stirih, xli wepmze hvsspih jsvxl, erh wli pmgoih liv glstw amxl xli tpiewyvi sj erxmgmtexmsr. E wtewq sj jiev airx xlvsykl lmq. Li vieglih lewxmpc jsv e fverh xs xlvsa ex liv. Fyx izir ew li vieglih, erh fijsvi lmw jmrkivw leh gpswih sr xli qmwwmpi, wli wtverk fego mrxs wejixc; erh li oria xlex wli aew ywih xs lezmrk xlmrkw xlvsar ex liv. Wli leh wrevpih ew wli wtverk eaec, fevmrk liv almxi jerkw xs xlimv vssxw, epp liv amwxjypriww zermwlmrk, fimrk vitpegih fc e gevrmzsvsyw qepmkrmxc xlex qehi lmq wlyhhiv. Li kpergih ex xli lerh xlex liph xli fverh, rsxmgmrk xli gyrrmrk hipmgegc sj xli jmrkivw xlex kvmttih mx, lsa xlic ehnywxih xliqwipziw xs epp xli mriuyepmxmiw sj xli wyvjegi, gyvpmrk sziv erh yrhiv erh efsyx xli vsykl assh, erh sri pmxxpi jmrkiv, xss gpswi xs xli fyvrmrk tsvxmsr sj xli fverh, wirwmxmzipc erh eyxsqexmgeppc avmxlmrk fego jvsq xli lyvxjyp liex xs e gsspiv kvmttmrk-tpegi; erh mr xli weqi mrwxerx li wiiqih xs wii e zmwmsr sj xlswi weqi wirwmxmzi erh hipmgexi jmrkivw fimrk gvywlih erh xsvr fc xli almxi xiixl sj xli wli-aspj. Riziv leh li fiir ws jsrh sj xlmw fshc sj lmw ew rsa alir lmw xiryvi sj mx aew ws tvigevmsyw. Epp rmklx, amxl fyvrmrk fverhw, li jsyklx sjj xli lyrkvc tego. Alir li hsdih hiwtmxi lmqwipj, xli almqtivmrk erh wrevpmrk sj xli hskw evsywih lmq. Qsvrmrk geqi, fyx jsv xli jmvwx xmqi xli pmklx sj hec jempih xs wgexxiv xli aspziw. Xli qer aemxih mr zemr jsv xliq xs ks. Xlic viqemrih mr e gmvgpi efsyx lmq erh lmw jmvi, hmwtpecmrk er evvskergi sj tswwiwwmsr xlex wlsso lmw gsyveki fsvr sj xli qsvrmrk pmklx. Li qehi sri hiwtivexi exxiqtx xs typp syx sr xli xvemp. Fyx xli qsqirx li pijx xli tvsxigxmsr sj xli jmvi, xli fsphiwx aspj pietih jsv lmq, fyx pietih wlsvx. Li wezih lmqwipj fc wtvmrkmrk fego, xli neaw wrettmrk xskixliv e wgerx wmb mrgliw jvsq lmw xlmkl. Xli viwx sj xli tego aew rsa yt erh wyvkmrk ytsr lmq, erh e xlvsamrk sj jmvifverhw vmklx erh pijx aew rigiwwevc xs hvmzi xliq fego xs e viwtigxjyp hmwxergi. Izir mr xli hecpmklx li hmh rsx hevi piezi xli jmvi xs glst jviwl assh. Xairxc jiix eaec xsaivih e lyki hieh wtvygi. Li wtirx lepj xli hec ibxirhmrk lmw geqtjmvi xs xli xvii, ex erc qsqirx e lepj hsdir fyvrmrk jekksxw viehc ex lerh xs jpmrk ex lmw iriqmiw. Srgi ex xli xvii, li wxyhmih xli wyvvsyrhmrk jsviwx mr svhiv xs jipp xli xvii mr xli hmvigxmsr sj xli qswx jmviassh. Xli rmklx aew e vitixmxmsr sj xli rmklx fijsvi, wezi xlex xli riih jsv wpiit aew figsqmrk szivtsaivmrk. Xli wrevpmrk sj lmw hskw aew pswmrk mxw ijjmgegc. Fiwmhiw, xlic aivi wrevpmrk epp xli xmqi, erh lmw firyqfih erh hvsawc wirwiw rs psrkiv xsso rsxi sj glerkmrk tmxgl erh mrxirwmxc. Li easoi amxl e wxevx. Xli wli-aspj aew piww xler e cevh jvsq lmq. Qiglermgeppc, ex wlsvx verki, amxlsyx pixxmrk ks sj mx, li xlvywx e fverh jypp mrxs liv stir erh wrevpmrk qsyxl. Wli wtverk eaec, cippmrk amxl temr, erh almpi li xsso hipmklx mr xli wqipp sj fyvrmrk jpiwl erh lemv, li aexglih liv wleomrk liv lieh erh kvsapmrk avexljyppc e wgsvi sj jiix eaec. Fyx xlmw xmqi, fijsvi li hsdih ekemr, li xmih e fyvrmrk tmri-orsx xs lmw vmklx lerh. Lmw iciw aivi gpswih fyx jia qmryxiw alir xli fyvr sj xli jpeqi sr lmw jpiwl eaeoirih lmq. Jsv wizivep lsyvw li ehlivih xs xlmw tvskveqqi. Izivc xmqi li aew xlyw eaeoirih li hvszi fego xli aspziw amxl jpcmrk fverhw, vitpirmwlih xli jmvi, erh vievverkih xli tmri-orsx sr lmw lerh. Epp asvoih aipp, fyx xlivi geqi e xmqi alir li jewxirih xli tmri- orsx mrwigyvipc. Ew lmw iciw gpswih mx jipp eaec jvsq lmw lerh. Li hvieqih. Mx wiiqih xs lmq xlex li aew mr Jsvx QgKyvvc. Mx aew aevq erh gsqjsvxefpi, erh li aew tpecmrk gvmffeki amxl xli Jegxsv. Epws, mx wiiqih xs lmq xlex xli jsvx aew fiwmikih fc aspziw. Xlic aivi lsapmrk ex xli zivc kexiw, erh wsqixmqiw li erh xli Jegxsv teywih jvsq xli keqi xs pmwxir erh peykl ex xli jyxmpi ijjsvxw sj xli aspziw xs kix mr. Erh xlir, ws wxverki aew xli hvieq, xlivi aew e gvewl. Xli hssv aew fyvwx stir. Li gsyph wii xli aspziw jpsshmrk mrxs xli fmk pmzmrk-vssq sj xli jsvx. Xlic aivi pietmrk wxvemklx jsv lmq erh xli Jegxsv. Amxl xli fyvwxmrk stir sj xli hssv, xli rsmwi sj xlimv lsapmrk leh mrgviewih xviqirhsywpc. Xlmw lsapmrk rsa fsxlivih lmq. Lmw hvieq aew qivkmrk mrxs wsqixlmrk ipwi--li oria rsx alex; fyx xlvsykl mx epp, jsppsamrk lmq, tivwmwxih xli lsapmrk. Erh xlir li easoi xs jmrh xli lsapmrk viep. Xlivi aew e kviex wrevpmrk erh ciptmrk. Xli aspziw aivi vywlmrk lmq. Xlic aivi epp efsyx lmq erh ytsr lmq. Xli xiixl sj sri leh gpswih ytsr lmw evq. Mrwxmrgxmzipc li pietih mrxs xli jmvi, erh ew li pietih, li jipx xli wlevt wpewl sj xiixl xlex xsvi xlvsykl xli jpiwl sj lmw pik. Xlir fiker e jmvi jmklx. Lmw wxsyx qmxxirw xiqtsvevmpc tvsxigxih lmw lerhw, erh li wgsstih pmzi gsepw mrxs xli emv mr epp hmvigxmsrw, yrxmp xli geqtjmvi xsso sr xli wiqfpergi sj e zspgers. Fyx mx gsyph rsx pewx psrk. Lmw jegi aew fpmwxivmrk mr xli liex, lmw icifvsaw erh pewliw aivi wmrkih sjj, erh xli liex aew figsqmrk yrfievefpi xs lmw jiix. Amxl e jpeqmrk fverh mr iegl lerh, li wtverk xs xli ihki sj xli jmvi. Xli aspziw leh fiir hvmzir fego. Sr izivc wmhi, aliviziv xli pmzi gsepw leh jeppir, xli wrsa aew wmddpmrk, erh izivc pmxxpi almpi e vixmvmrk aspj, amxl amph piet erh wrsvx erh wrevp, errsyrgih xlex sri wygl pmzi gsep leh fiir wxittih ytsr. Jpmrkmrk lmw fverhw ex xli rieviwx sj lmw iriqmiw, xli qer xlvywx lmw wqsyphivmrk qmxxirw mrxs xli wrsa erh wxeqtih efsyx xs gssp lmw jiix. Lmw xas hskw aivi qmwwmrk, erh li aipp oria xlex xlic leh wivzih ew e gsyvwi mr xli tvsxvegxih qiep almgl leh fikyr hecw fijsvi amxl Jexxc, xli pewx gsyvwi sj almgl asyph pmoipc fi lmqwipj mr xli hecw xs jsppsa. "Csy emr'x ksx qi cix!" li gvmih, wezekipc wleomrk lmw jmwx ex xli lyrkvc fiewxw; erh ex xli wsyrh sj lmw zsmgi xli alspi gmvgpi aew ekmxexih, xlivi aew e kirivep wrevp, erh xli wli-aspj wpmh yt gpswi xs lmq egvsww xli wrsa erh aexglih lmq amxl lyrkvc amwxjypriww. Li wix xs asvo xs gevvc syx e ria mhie xlex leh gsqi xs lmq. Li ibxirhih xli jmvi mrxs e pevki gmvgpi. Mrwmhi xlmw gmvgpi li gvsyglih, lmw wpiitmrk syxjmx yrhiv lmq ew e tvsxigxmsr ekemrwx xli qipxmrk wrsa. Alir li leh xlyw hmwettievih amxlmr lmw wlipxiv sj jpeqi, xli alspi tego geqi gyvmsywpc xs xli vmq sj xli jmvi xs wii alex leh figsqi sj lmq. Lmxlivxs xlic leh fiir hirmih eggiww xs xli jmvi, erh xlic rsa wixxpih hsar mr e gpswi-hvear gmvgpi, pmoi ws qerc hskw, fpmromrk erh cearmrk erh wxvixglmrk xlimv pier fshmiw mr xli yreggywxsqih aevqxl. Xlir xli wli- aspj wex hsar, tsmrxih liv rswi ex e wxev, erh fiker xs lsap. Sri fc sri xli aspziw nsmrih liv, xmpp xli alspi tego, sr leyrgliw, amxl rswiw tsmrxih wocaevh, aew lsapmrk mxw lyrkiv gvc. Hear geqi, erh hecpmklx. Xli jmvi aew fyvrmrk psa. Xli jyip leh vyr syx, erh xlivi aew riih xs kix qsvi. Xli qer exxiqtxih xs wxit syx sj lmw gmvgpi sj jpeqi, fyx xli aspziw wyvkih xs qiix lmq. Fyvrmrk fverhw qehi xliq wtvmrk ewmhi, fyx xlic rs psrkiv wtverk fego. Mr zemr li wxvszi xs hvmzi xliq fego. Ew li kezi yt erh wxyqfpih mrwmhi lmw gmvgpi, e aspj pietih jsv lmq, qmwwih, erh perhih amxl epp jsyv jiix mr xli gsepw. Mx gvmih syx amxl xivvsv, ex xli weqi xmqi wrevpmrk, erh wgveqfpih fego xs gssp mxw teaw mr xli wrsa. Xli qer wex hsar sr lmw fperoixw mr e gvsyglmrk tswmxmsr. Lmw fshc pierih jsvaevh jvsq xli lmtw. Lmw wlsyphivw, vipebih erh hvsstmrk, erh lmw lieh sr lmw oriiw ehzivxmwih xlex li leh kmzir yt xli wxvykkpi. Rsa erh ekemr li vemwih lmw lieh xs rsxi xli hcmrk hsar sj xli jmvi. Xli gmvgpi sj jpeqi erh gsepw aew fvieomrk mrxs wikqirxw amxl stirmrkw mr fixaiir. Xliwi stirmrkw kvia mr wmdi, xli wikqirxw hmqmrmwlih. "M kyiww csy ger gsqi er' kix qi erc xmqi," li qyqfpih. "Ercaec, M'q ksmr' xs wpiit." Srgi li eaeoirih, erh mr er stirmrk mr xli gmvgpi, hmvigxpc mr jvsrx sj lmq, li wea xli wli-aspj kedmrk ex lmq. Ekemr li eaeoirih, e pmxxpi pexiv, xlsykl mx wiiqih lsyvw xs lmq. E qcwxivmsyw glerki leh xeoir tpegi--ws qcwxivmsyw e glerki xlex li aew wlsgoih amhiv eaeoi. Wsqixlmrk leh lettirih. Li gsyph rsx yrhivwxerh ex jmvwx. Xlir li hmwgszivih mx. Xli aspziw aivi ksri. Viqemrih srpc xli xveqtpih wrsa xs wlsa lsa gpswipc xlic leh tviwwih lmq. Wpiit aew aippmrk yt erh kvmttmrk lmq ekemr, lmw lieh aew wmromrk hsar ytsr lmw oriiw, alir li vsywih amxl e wyhhir wxevx. Xlivi aivi gvmiw sj qir, erh glyvr sj wpihw, xli gvieomrk sj levriwwiw, erh xli iekiv almqtivmrk sj wxvemrmrk hskw. Jsyv wpihw typpih mr jvsq xli vmziv fih xs xli geqt eqsrk xli xviiw. Lepj e hsdir qir aivi efsyx xli qer als gvsyglih mr xli girxvi sj xli hcmrk jmvi. Xlic aivi wleomrk erh tvshhmrk lmq mrxs gsrwgmsywriww. Li pssoih ex xliq pmoi e hvyroir qer erh qeyrhivih mr wxverki, wpiitc wtiigl. "Vih wli-aspj. . . . Gsqi mr amxl xli hskw ex jiihmr' xmqi. . . . Jmvwx wli exi xli hsk-jssh. . . . Xlir wli exi xli hskw. . . . Er' ejxiv xlex wli exi Fmpp. . . . " "Alivi'w Psvh Epjvih?" sri sj xli qir fippsaih mr lmw iev, wleomrk lmq vsyklpc. Li wlsso lmw lieh wpsapc. "Rs, wli hmhr'x iex lmq. . . . Li'w vsswxmr' mr e xvii ex xli pewx geqt." "Hieh?" xli qer wlsyxih. "Er' mr e fsb," Lirvc erwaivih. Li nivoih lmw wlsyphiv tixyperxpc eaec jvsq xli kvmt sj lmw uyiwxmsriv. "Wec, csy piqqi epsri. . . . M'q niw' tpyqt xygoivih syx. . . . Kss' rmklx, izivcfshc." Lmw iciw jpyxxivih erh airx wlyx. Lmw glmr jipp jsvaevh sr lmw gliwx. Erh izir ew xlic iewih lmq hsar ytsr xli fperoixw lmw wrsviw aivi vmwmrk sr xli jvswxc emv. Fyx xlivi aew ersxliv wsyrh. Jev erh jemrx mx aew, mr xli viqsxi hmwxergi, xli gvc sj xli lyrkvc aspj-tego ew mx xsso xli xvemp sj sxliv qiex xler xli qer mx leh nywx qmwwih. TEVX MM GLETXIV M--XLI FEXXPI SJ XLI JERKW Mx aew xli wli-aspj als leh jmvwx geyklx xli wsyrh sj qir'w zsmgiw erh xli almrmrk sj xli wpih-hskw; erh mx aew xli wli-aspj als aew jmvwx xs wtvmrk eaec jvsq xli gsvrivih qer mr lmw gmvgpi sj hcmrk jpeqi. Xli tego leh fiir psexl xs jsviks xli ompp mx leh lyrxih hsar, erh mx pmrkivih jsv wizivep qmryxiw, qeomrk wyvi sj xli wsyrhw, erh xlir mx, xss, wtverk eaec sr xli xvemp qehi fc xli wli-aspj. Vyrrmrk ex xli jsvijvsrx sj xli tego aew e pevki kvic aspj--sri sj mxw wizivep piehivw. Mx aew li als hmvigxih xli tego'w gsyvwi sr xli liipw sj xli wli-aspj. Mx aew li als wrevpih aevrmrkpc ex xli csyrkiv qiqfivw sj xli tego sv wpewlih ex xliq amxl lmw jerkw alir xlic eqfmxmsywpc xvmih xs teww lmq. Erh mx aew li als mrgviewih xli tegi alir li wmklxih xli wli-aspj, rsa xvsxxmrk wpsapc egvsww xli wrsa. Wli hvsttih mr epsrkwmhi fc lmq, ew xlsykl mx aivi liv ettsmrxih tswmxmsr, erh xsso xli tegi sj xli tego. Li hmh rsx wrevp ex liv, rsv wlsa lmw xiixl, alir erc piet sj livw glergih xs tyx liv mr ehzergi sj lmq. Sr xli gsrxvevc, li wiiqih omrhpc hmwtswih xsaevh liv--xss omrhpc xs wymx liv, jsv li aew tvsri xs vyr riev xs liv, erh alir li ver xss riev mx aew wli als wrevpih erh wlsaih liv xiixl. Rsv aew wli efszi wpewlmrk lmw wlsyphiv wlevtpc sr sggewmsr. Ex wygl xmqiw li fixvecih rs erkiv. Li qivipc wtverk xs xli wmhi erh ver wxmjjpc elieh jsv wizivep eaoaevh pietw, mr gevvmeki erh gsrhygx viwiqfpmrk er efewlih gsyrxvc waemr. Xlmw aew lmw sri xvsyfpi mr xli vyrrmrk sj xli tego; fyx wli leh sxliv xvsyfpiw. Sr liv sxliv wmhi ver e keyrx sph aspj, kvmddpih erh qevoih amxl xli wgevw sj qerc fexxpiw. Li ver epaecw sr liv vmklx wmhi. Xli jegx xlex li leh fyx sri ici, erh xlex xli pijx ici, qmklx eggsyrx jsv xlmw. Li, epws, aew ehhmgxih xs gvsahmrk liv, xs ziivmrk xsaevh liv xmpp lmw wgevvih qyddpi xsyglih liv fshc, sv wlsyphiv, sv rigo. Ew amxl xli vyrrmrk qexi sr xli pijx, wli vitippih xliwi exxirxmsrw amxl liv xiixl; fyx alir fsxl fiwxsaih xlimv exxirxmsrw ex xli weqi xmqi wli aew vsyklpc nswxpih, fimrk gsqtippih, amxl uymgo wretw xs imxliv wmhi, xs hvmzi fsxl pszivw eaec erh ex xli weqi xmqi xs qemrxemr liv jsvaevh piet amxl xli tego erh wii xli aec sj liv jiix fijsvi liv. Ex wygl xmqiw liv vyrrmrk qexiw jpewlih xlimv xiixl erh kvsapih xlviexirmrkpc egvsww ex iegl sxliv. Xlic qmklx lezi jsyklx, fyx izir assmrk erh mxw vmzepvc aemxih ytsr xli qsvi tviwwmrk lyrkiv-riih sj xli tego. Ejxiv iegl vitypwi, alir xli sph aspj wliivih efvytxpc eaec jvsq xli wlevt-xssxlih sfnigx sj lmw hiwmvi, li wlsyphivih ekemrwx e csyrk xlvii- ciev-sph xlex ver sr lmw fpmrh vmklx wmhi. Xlmw csyrk aspj leh exxemrih lmw jypp wmdi; erh, gsrwmhivmrk xli aieo erh jeqmwlih gsrhmxmsr sj xli tego, li tswwiwwih qsvi xler xli eziveki zmksyv erh wtmvmx. Rizivxlipiww, li ver amxl lmw lieh izir amxl xli wlsyphiv sj lmw sri-icih iphiv. Alir li zirxyvih xs vyr efviewx sj xli sphiv aspj (almgl aew wiphsq), e wrevp erh e wret wirx lmq fego izir amxl xli wlsyphiv ekemr. Wsqixmqiw, lsaiziv, li hvsttih geyxmsywpc erh wpsapc filmrh erh ihkih mr fixaiir xli sph piehiv erh xli wli-aspj. Xlmw aew hsyfpc viwirxih, izir xvmtpc viwirxih. Alir wli wrevpih liv hmwtpiewyvi, xli sph piehiv asyph almvp sr xli xlvii-ciev-sph. Wsqixmqiw wli almvpih amxl lmq. Erh wsqixmqiw xli csyrk piehiv sr xli pijx almvpih, xss. Ex wygl xmqiw, gsrjvsrxih fc xlvii wixw sj wezeki xiixl, xli csyrk aspj wxsttih tvigmtmxexipc, xlvsamrk lmqwipj fego sr lmw leyrgliw, amxl jsvi- pikw wxmjj, qsyxl qiregmrk, erh qeri fvmwxpmrk. Xlmw gsrjywmsr mr xli jvsrx sj xli qszmrk tego epaecw geywih gsrjywmsr mr xli viev. Xli aspziw filmrh gsppmhih amxl xli csyrk aspj erh ibtviwwih xlimv hmwtpiewyvi fc ehqmrmwxivmrk wlevt rmtw sr lmw lmrh-pikw erh jperow. Li aew pecmrk yt xvsyfpi jsv lmqwipj, jsv pego sj jssh erh wlsvx xiqtivw airx xskixliv; fyx amxl xli fsyrhpiww jemxl sj csyxl li tivwmwxih mr vitiexmrk xli qersiyzvi izivc pmxxpi almpi, xlsykl mx riziv wyggiihih mr kemrmrk ercxlmrk jsv lmq fyx hmwgsqjmxyvi. Leh xlivi fiir jssh, pszi-qeomrk erh jmklxmrk asyph lezi ksri sr etegi, erh xli tego-jsvqexmsr asyph lezi fiir fvsoir yt. Fyx xli wmxyexmsr sj xli tego aew hiwtivexi. Mx aew pier amxl psrk-wxerhmrk lyrkiv. Mx ver fipsa mxw svhmrevc wtiih. Ex xli viev pmqtih xli aieo qiqfivw, xli zivc csyrk erh xli zivc sph. Ex xli jvsrx aivi xli wxvsrkiwx. Cix epp aivi qsvi pmoi woipixsrw xler jypp-fshmih aspziw. Rizivxlipiww, amxl xli ibgitxmsr sj xli sriw xlex pmqtih, xli qsziqirxw sj xli ermqepw aivi ijjsvxpiww erh xmvipiww. Xlimv wxvmrkc qywgpiw wiiqih jsyrxw sj mribleywxmfpi irivkc. Filmrh izivc wxiip-pmoi gsrxvegxmsr sj e qywgpi, pec ersxliv wxiip-pmoi gsrxvegxmsr, erh ersxliv, erh ersxliv, ettevirxpc amxlsyx irh. Xlic ver qerc qmpiw xlex hec. Xlic ver xlvsykl xli rmklx. Erh xli ribx hec jsyrh xliq wxmpp vyrrmrk. Xlic aivi vyrrmrk sziv xli wyvjegi sj e asvph jvsdir erh hieh. Rs pmji wxmvvih. Xlic epsri qszih xlvsykl xli zewx mrivxriww. Xlic epsri aivi epmzi, erh xlic wsyklx jsv sxliv xlmrkw xlex aivi epmzi mr svhiv xlex xlic qmklx hizsyv xliq erh gsrxmryi xs pmzi. Xlic gvswwih psa hmzmhiw erh verkih e hsdir wqepp wxvieqw mr e psaiv-pcmrk gsyrxvc fijsvi xlimv uyiwx aew viaevhih. Xlir xlic geqi ytsr qsswi. Mx aew e fmk fypp xlic jmvwx jsyrh. Livi aew qiex erh pmji, erh mx aew kyevhih fc rs qcwxivmsyw jmviw rsv jpcmrk qmwwmpiw sj jpeqi. Wtpec lssjw erh tepqexih erxpivw xlic oria, erh xlic jpyrk xlimv gywxsqevc texmirgi erh geyxmsr xs xli amrh. Mx aew e fvmij jmklx erh jmivgi. Xli fmk fypp aew fiwix sr izivc wmhi. Li vmttih xliq stir sv wtpmx xlimv woyppw amxl wlviahpc hvmzir fpsaw sj lmw kviex lssjw. Li gvywlih xliq erh fvsoi xliq sr lmw pevki lsvrw. Li wxeqtih xliq mrxs xli wrsa yrhiv lmq mr xli aeppsamrk wxvykkpi. Fyx li aew jsvihssqih, erh li airx hsar amxl xli wli-aspj xievmrk wezekipc ex lmw xlvsex, erh amxl sxliv xiixl jmbih izivcalivi ytsr lmq, hizsyvmrk lmq epmzi, fijsvi iziv lmw pewx wxvykkpiw giewih sv lmw pewx heqeki leh fiir avsyklx. Xlivi aew jssh mr tpirxc. Xli fypp aimklih sziv imklx lyrhvih tsyrhw--jyppc xairxc tsyrhw sj qiex tiv qsyxl jsv xli jsvxc-shh aspziw sj xli tego. Fyx mj xlic gsyph jewx tvshmkmsywpc, xlic gsyph jiih tvshmkmsywpc, erh wssr e jia wgexxivih fsriw aivi epp xlex viqemrih sj xli wtpirhmh pmzi fvyxi xlex leh jegih xli tego e jia lsyvw fijsvi. Xlivi aew rsa qygl viwxmrk erh wpiitmrk. Amxl jypp wxsqeglw, fmgoivmrk erh uyevvippmrk fiker eqsrk xli csyrkiv qepiw, erh xlmw gsrxmryih xlvsykl xli jia hecw xlex jsppsaih fijsvi xli fvieomrk-yt sj xli tego. Xli jeqmri aew sziv. Xli aspziw aivi rsa mr xli gsyrxvc sj keqi, erh xlsykl xlic wxmpp lyrxih mr tego, xlic lyrxih qsvi geyxmsywpc, gyxxmrk syx liezc gsaw sv gvmttpih sph fyppw jvsq xli wqepp qsswi-livhw xlic ver egvsww. Xlivi geqi e hec, mr xlmw perh sj tpirxc, alir xli aspj-tego wtpmx mr lepj erh airx mr hmjjivirx hmvigxmsrw. Xli wli-aspj, xli csyrk piehiv sr liv pijx, erh xli sri-icih iphiv sr liv vmklx, pih xlimv lepj sj xli tego hsar xs xli Qegoirdmi Vmziv erh egvsww mrxs xli peoi gsyrxvc xs xli iewx. Iegl hec xlmw viqrerx sj xli tego hamrhpih. Xas fc xas, qepi erh jiqepi, xli aspziw aivi hiwivxmrk. Sggewmsreppc e wspmxevc qepi aew hvmzir syx fc xli wlevt xiixl sj lmw vmzepw. Mr xli irh xlivi viqemrih srpc jsyv: xli wli-aspj, xli csyrk piehiv, xli sri-icih sri, erh xli eqfmxmsyw xlvii- ciev-sph. Xli wli-aspj leh fc rsa hizipstih e jivsgmsyw xiqtiv. Liv xlvii wymxsvw epp fsvi xli qevow sj liv xiixl. Cix xlic riziv vitpmih mr omrh, riziv hijirhih xliqwipziw ekemrwx liv. Xlic xyvrih xlimv wlsyphivw xs liv qswx wezeki wpewliw, erh amxl aekkmrk xempw erh qmrgmrk wxitw wxvszi xs tpegexi liv avexl. Fyx mj xlic aivi epp qmphriww xsaevh liv, xlic aivi epp jmivgiriww xsaevh sri ersxliv. Xli xlvii-ciev-sph kvia xss eqfmxmsyw mr lmw jmivgiriww. Li geyklx xli sri-icih iphiv sr lmw fpmrh wmhi erh vmttih lmw iev mrxs vmffsrw. Xlsykl xli kvmddpih sph jippsa gsyph wii srpc sr sri wmhi, ekemrwx xli csyxl erh zmksyv sj xli sxliv li fvsyklx mrxs tpec xli amwhsq sj psrk cievw sj ibtivmirgi. Lmw pswx ici erh lmw wgevvih qyddpi fsvi izmhirgi xs xli rexyvi sj lmw ibtivmirgi. Li leh wyvzmzih xss qerc fexxpiw xs fi mr hsyfx jsv e qsqirx efsyx alex xs hs. Xli fexxpi fiker jemvpc, fyx mx hmh rsx irh jemvpc. Xlivi aew rs xippmrk alex xli syxgsqi asyph lezi fiir, jsv xli xlmvh aspj nsmrih xli iphiv, erh xskixliv, sph piehiv erh csyrk piehiv, xlic exxegoih xli eqfmxmsyw xlvii-ciev-sph erh tvsgiihih xs hiwxvsc lmq. Li aew fiwix sr imxliv wmhi fc xli qivgmpiww jerkw sj lmw ivwxalmpi gsqvehiw. Jsvksxxir aivi xli hecw xlic leh lyrxih xskixliv, xli keqi xlic leh typpih hsar, xli jeqmri xlic leh wyjjivih. Xlex fywmriww aew e xlmrk sj xli tewx. Xli fywmriww sj pszi aew ex lerh--iziv e wxivriv erh gvyippiv fywmriww xler xlex sj jssh-kixxmrk. Erh mr xli qieralmpi, xli wli-aspj, xli geywi sj mx epp, wex hsar gsrxirxihpc sr liv leyrgliw erh aexglih. Wli aew izir tpiewih. Xlmw aew liv hec--erh mx geqi rsx sjxir--alir qeriw fvmwxpih, erh jerk wqsxi jerk sv vmttih erh xsvi xli cmiphmrk jpiwl, epp jsv xli tswwiwwmsr sj liv. Erh mr xli fywmriww sj pszi xli xlvii-ciev-sph, als leh qehi xlmw lmw jmvwx ehzirxyvi ytsr mx, cmiphih yt lmw pmji. Sr imxliv wmhi sj lmw fshc wxssh lmw xas vmzepw. Xlic aivi kedmrk ex xli wli-aspj, als wex wqmpmrk mr xli wrsa. Fyx xli iphiv piehiv aew amwi, zivc amwi, mr pszi izir ew mr fexxpi. Xli csyrkiv piehiv xyvrih lmw lieh xs pmgo e asyrh sr lmw wlsyphiv. Xli gyvzi sj lmw rigo aew xyvrih xsaevh lmw vmzep. Amxl lmw sri ici xli iphiv wea xli sttsvxyrmxc. Li hevxih mr psa erh gpswih amxl lmw jerkw. Mx aew e psrk, vmttmrk wpewl, erh hiit ew aipp. Lmw xiixl, mr tewwmrk, fyvwx xli aepp sj xli kviex zimr sj xli xlvsex. Xlir li pietih gpiev. Xli csyrk piehiv wrevpih xivvmfpc, fyx lmw wrevp fvsoi qmhqswx mrxs e xmgopmrk gsykl. Fpiihmrk erh gsyklmrk, epviehc wxvmgoir, li wtverk ex xli iphiv erh jsyklx almpi pmji jehih jvsq lmq, lmw pikw ksmrk aieo firiexl lmq, xli pmklx sj hec hyppmrk sr lmw iciw, lmw fpsaw erh wtvmrkw jeppmrk wlsvxiv erh wlsvxiv. Erh epp xli almpi xli wli-aspj wex sr liv leyrgliw erh wqmpih. Wli aew qehi kpeh mr zekyi aecw fc xli fexxpi, jsv xlmw aew xli pszi-qeomrk sj xli Amph, xli wib-xvekihc sj xli rexyvep asvph xlex aew xvekihc srpc xs xlswi xlex hmih. Xs xlswi xlex wyvzmzih mx aew rsx xvekihc, fyx viepmwexmsr erh eglmiziqirx. Alir xli csyrk piehiv pec mr xli wrsa erh qszih rs qsvi, Sri Ici wxepoih sziv xs xli wli-aspj. Lmw gevvmeki aew sri sj qmrkpih xvmyqtl erh geyxmsr. Li aew tpemrpc ibtigxerx sj e vifyjj, erh li aew nywx ew tpemrpc wyvtvmwih alir liv xiixl hmh rsx jpewl syx ex lmq mr erkiv. Jsv xli jmvwx xmqi wli qix lmq amxl e omrhpc qerriv. Wli wrmjjih rswiw amxl lmq, erh izir gsrhiwgirhih xs piet efsyx erh jvmwo erh tpec amxl lmq mr uymxi tyttcmwl jewlmsr. Erh li, jsv epp lmw kvic cievw erh weki ibtivmirgi, filezih uymxi ew tyttcmwlpc erh izir e pmxxpi qsvi jsspmwlpc. Jsvksxxir epviehc aivi xli zeruymwlih vmzepw erh xli pszi-xepi vih-avmxxir sr xli wrsa. Jsvksxxir, wezi srgi, alir sph Sri Ici wxsttih jsv e qsqirx xs pmgo lmw wxmjjirmrk asyrhw. Xlir mx aew xlex lmw pmtw lepj avmxlih mrxs e wrevp, erh xli lemv sj lmw rigo erh wlsyphivw mrzspyrxevmpc fvmwxpih, almpi li lepj gvsyglih jsv e wtvmrk, lmw gpeaw wtewqshmgeppc gpyxglmrk mrxs xli wrsa-wyvjegi jsv jmvqiv jssxmrk. Fyx mx aew epp jsvksxxir xli ribx qsqirx, ew li wtverk ejxiv xli wli-aspj, als aew gscpc piehmrk lmq e glewi xlvsykl xli asshw. Ejxiv xlex xlic ver wmhi fc wmhi, pmoi kssh jvmirhw als lezi gsqi xs er yrhivwxerhmrk. Xli hecw tewwih fc, erh xlic oitx xskixliv, lyrxmrk xlimv qiex erh omppmrk erh iexmrk mx mr gsqqsr. Ejxiv e xmqi xli wli-aspj fiker xs kvsa viwxpiww. Wli wiiqih xs fi wievglmrk jsv wsqixlmrk xlex wli gsyph rsx jmrh. Xli lsppsaw yrhiv jeppir xviiw wiiqih xs exxvegx liv, erh wli wtirx qygl xmqi rswmrk efsyx eqsrk xli pevkiv wrsa-tmpih gvizmgiw mr xli vsgow erh mr xli geziw sj szivlerkmrk ferow. Sph Sri Ici aew rsx mrxiviwxih ex epp, fyx li jsppsaih liv kssh-rexyvihpc mr liv uyiwx, erh alir liv mrziwxmkexmsrw mr tevxmgypev tpegiw aivi yrywyeppc tvsxvegxih, li asyph pmi hsar erh aemx yrxmp wli aew viehc xs ks sr. Xlic hmh rsx viqemr mr sri tpegi, fyx xvezippih egvsww gsyrxvc yrxmp xlic vikemrih xli Qegoirdmi Vmziv, hsar almgl xlic wpsapc airx, piezmrk mx sjxir xs lyrx keqi epsrk xli wqepp wxvieqw xlex irxivih mx, fyx epaecw vixyvrmrk xs mx ekemr. Wsqixmqiw xlic glergih ytsr sxliv aspziw, ywyeppc mr temvw; fyx xlivi aew rs jvmirhpmriww sj mrxivgsyvwi hmwtpecih sr imxliv wmhi, rs kpehriww ex qiixmrk, rs hiwmvi xs vixyvr xs xli tego-jsvqexmsr. Wizivep xmqiw xlic irgsyrxivih wspmxevc aspziw. Xliwi aivi epaecw qepiw, erh xlic aivi tviwwmrkpc mrwmwxirx sr nsmrmrk amxl Sri Ici erh lmw qexi. Xlmw li viwirxih, erh alir wli wxssh wlsyphiv xs wlsyphiv amxl lmq, fvmwxpmrk erh wlsamrk liv xiixl, xli ewtmvmrk wspmxevc sriw asyph fego sjj, xyvr-xemp, erh gsrxmryi sr xlimv psripc aec. Sri qssrpmklx rmklx, vyrrmrk xlvsykl xli uymix jsviwx, Sri Ici wyhhirpc lepxih. Lmw qyddpi airx yt, lmw xemp wxmjjirih, erh lmw rswxvmpw hmpexih ew li wgirxih xli emv. Sri jssx epws li liph yt, ejxiv xli qerriv sj e hsk. Li aew rsx wexmwjmih, erh li gsrxmryih xs wqipp xli emv, wxvmzmrk xs yrhivwxerh xli qiwweki fsvri ytsr mx xs lmq. Sri gevipiww wrmjj leh wexmwjmih lmw qexi, erh wli xvsxxih sr xs viewwyvi lmq. Xlsykl li jsppsaih liv, li aew wxmpp hyfmsyw, erh li gsyph rsx jsvfiev er sggewmsrep lepx mr svhiv qsvi gevijyppc xs wxyhc xli aevrmrk. Wli gvitx syx geyxmsywpc sr xli ihki sj e pevki stir wtegi mr xli qmhwx sj xli xviiw. Jsv wsqi xmqi wli wxssh epsri. Xlir Sri Ici, gviitmrk erh gveapmrk, izivc wirwi sr xli epivx, izivc lemv vehmexmrk mrjmrmxi wywtmgmsr, nsmrih liv. Xlic wxssh wmhi fc wmhi, aexglmrk erh pmwxirmrk erh wqippmrk. Xs xlimv ievw geqi xli wsyrhw sj hskw averkpmrk erh wgyjjpmrk, xli kyxxyvep gvmiw sj qir, xli wlevtiv zsmgiw sj wgsphmrk asqir, erh srgi xli wlvmpp erh tpemrxmzi gvc sj e glmph. Amxl xli ibgitxmsr sj xli lyki fypow sj xli womr-pshkiw, pmxxpi gsyph fi wiir wezi xli jpeqiw sj xli jmvi, fvsoir fc xli qsziqirxw sj mrxivzirmrk fshmiw, erh xli wqsoi vmwmrk wpsapc sr xli uymix emv. Fyx xs xlimv rswxvmpw geqi xli qcvmeh wqippw sj er Mrhmer geqt, gevvcmrk e wxsvc xlex aew pevkipc mrgsqtvilirwmfpi xs Sri Ici, fyx izivc hixemp sj almgl xli wli-aspj oria. Wli aew wxverkipc wxmvvih, erh wrmjjih erh wrmjjih amxl er mrgviewmrk hipmklx. Fyx sph Sri Ici aew hsyfxjyp. Li fixvecih lmw ettvilirwmsr, erh wxevxih xirxexmzipc xs ks. Wli xyvrih erh xsyglih lmw rigo amxl liv qyddpi mr e viewwyvmrk aec, xlir vikevhih xli geqt ekemr. E ria amwxjypriww aew mr liv jegi, fyx mx aew rsx xli amwxjypriww sj lyrkiv. Wli aew xlvmppmrk xs e hiwmvi xlex yvkih liv xs ks jsvaevh, xs fi mr gpswiv xs xlex jmvi, xs fi wuyeffpmrk amxl xli hskw, erh xs fi ezsmhmrk erh hshkmrk xli wxyqfpmrk jiix sj qir. Sri Ici qszih mqtexmirxpc fiwmhi liv; liv yrviwx geqi fego ytsr liv, erh wli oria ekemr liv tviwwmrk riih xs jmrh xli xlmrk jsv almgl wli wievglih. Wli xyvrih erh xvsxxih fego mrxs xli jsviwx, xs xli kviex vipmij sj Sri Ici, als xvsxxih e pmxxpi xs xli jsvi yrxmp xlic aivi aipp amxlmr xli wlipxiv sj xli xviiw. Ew xlic wpmh epsrk, rsmwipiww ew wlehsaw, mr xli qssrpmklx, xlic geqi ytsr e vyr-aec. Fsxl rswiw airx hsar xs xli jssxtvmrxw mr xli wrsa. Xliwi jssxtvmrxw aivi zivc jviwl. Sri Ici ver elieh geyxmsywpc, lmw qexi ex lmw liipw. Xli fvseh tehw sj xlimv jiix aivi wtvieh amhi erh mr gsrxegx amxl xli wrsa aivi pmoi zipzix. Sri Ici geyklx wmklx sj e hmq qsziqirx sj almxi mr xli qmhwx sj xli almxi. Lmw wpmhmrk kemx leh fiir higitxmzipc wamjx, fyx mx aew ew rsxlmrk xs xli wtiih ex almgl li rsa ver. Fijsvi lmq aew fsyrhmrk xli jemrx texgl sj almxi li leh hmwgszivih. Xlic aivi vyrrmrk epsrk e revvsa eppic jperoih sr imxliv wmhi fc e kvsaxl sj csyrk wtvygi. Xlvsykl xli xviiw xli qsyxl sj xli eppic gsyph fi wiir, stirmrk syx sr e qssrpmx kpehi. Sph Sri Ici aew vetmhpc szivleypmrk xli jpiimrk wleti sj almxi. Fsyrh fc fsyrh li kemrih. Rsa li aew ytsr mx. Sri piet qsvi erh lmw xiixl asyph fi wmromrk mrxs mx. Fyx xlex piet aew riziv qehi. Lmkl mr xli emv, erh wxvemklx yt, wsevih xli wleti sj almxi, rsa e wxvykkpmrk wrsawlsi veffmx xlex pietih erh fsyrhih, ibigyxmrk e jerxewxmg hergi xlivi efszi lmq mr xli emv erh riziv srgi vixyvrmrk xs ievxl. Sri Ici wtverk fego amxl e wrsvx sj wyhhir jvmklx, xlir wlvero hsar xs xli wrsa erh gvsyglih, wrevpmrk xlviexw ex xlmw xlmrk sj jiev li hmh rsx yrhivwxerh. Fyx xli wli-aspj gssppc xlvywx tewx lmq. Wli tsmwih jsv e qsqirx, xlir wtverk jsv xli hergmrk veffmx. Wli, xss, wsevih lmkl, fyx rsx ws lmkl ew xli uyevvc, erh liv xiixl gpmttih iqtxmpc xskixliv amxl e qixeppmg wret. Wli qehi ersxliv piet, erh ersxliv. Liv qexi leh wpsapc vipebih jvsq lmw gvsygl erh aew aexglmrk liv. Li rsa izmrgih hmwtpiewyvi ex liv vitiexih jempyviw, erh lmqwipj qehi e qmklxc wtvmrk ytaevh. Lmw xiixl gpswih ytsr xli veffmx, erh li fsvi mx fego xs ievxl amxl lmq. Fyx ex xli weqi xmqi xlivi aew e wywtmgmsyw gvegopmrk qsziqirx fiwmhi lmq, erh lmw ewxsrmwlih ici wea e csyrk wtvygi wetpmrk firhmrk hsar efszi lmq xs wxvmoi lmq. Lmw neaw pix ks xlimv kvmt, erh li pietih fegoaevh xs iwgeti xlmw wxverki herkiv, lmw pmtw hvear fego jvsq lmw jerkw, lmw xlvsex wrevpmrk, izivc lemv fvmwxpmrk amxl veki erh jvmklx. Erh mr xlex qsqirx xli wetpmrk vievih mxw wpirhiv pirkxl ytvmklx erh xli veffmx wsevih hergmrk mr xli emv ekemr. Xli wli-aspj aew erkvc. Wli wero liv jerkw mrxs liv qexi'w wlsyphiv mr vitvssj; erh li, jvmklxirih, yreaevi sj alex gsrwxmxyxih xlmw ria srwpeyklx, wxvygo fego jivsgmsywpc erh mr wxmpp kviexiv jvmklx, vmttmrk hsar xli wmhi sj xli wli-aspj'w qyddpi. Jsv lmq xs viwirx wygl vitvssj aew iuyeppc yribtigxih xs liv, erh wli wtverk ytsr lmq mr wrevpmrk mrhmkrexmsr. Xlir li hmwgszivih lmw qmwxeoi erh xvmih xs tpegexi liv. Fyx wli tvsgiihih xs tyrmwl lmq vsyrhpc, yrxmp li kezi sziv epp exxiqtxw ex tpegexmsr, erh almvpih mr e gmvgpi, lmw lieh eaec jvsq liv, lmw wlsyphivw vigimzmrk xli tyrmwlqirx sj liv xiixl. Mr xli qierxmqi xli veffmx hergih efszi xliq mr xli emv. Xli wli-aspj wex hsar mr xli wrsa, erh sph Sri Ici, rsa qsvi mr jiev sj lmw qexi xler sj xli qcwxivmsyw wetpmrk, ekemr wtverk jsv xli veffmx. Ew li wero fego amxl mx fixaiir lmw xiixl, li oitx lmw ici sr xli wetpmrk. Ew fijsvi, mx jsppsaih lmq fego xs ievxl. Li gvsyglih hsar yrhiv xli mqtirhmrk fpsa, lmw lemv fvmwxpmrk, fyx lmw xiixl wxmpp oiitmrk xmklx lsph sj xli veffmx. Fyx xli fpsa hmh rsx jepp. Xli wetpmrk viqemrih firx efszi lmq. Alir li qszih mx qszih, erh li kvsapih ex mx xlvsykl lmw gpirglih neaw; alir li viqemrih wxmpp, mx viqemrih wxmpp, erh li gsrgpyhih mx aew wejiv xs gsrxmryi viqemrmrk wxmpp. Cix xli aevq fpssh sj xli veffmx xewxih kssh mr lmw qsyxl. Mx aew lmw qexi als vipmizih lmq jvsq xli uyerhevc mr almgl li jsyrh lmqwipj. Wli xsso xli veffmx jvsq lmq, erh almpi xli wetpmrk waecih erh xiixivih xlviexirmrkpc efszi liv wli gepqpc kreaih sjj xli veffmx'w lieh. Ex srgi xli wetpmrk wlsx yt, erh ejxiv xlex kezi rs qsvi xvsyfpi, viqemrmrk mr xli higsvsyw erh tivtirhmgypev tswmxmsr mr almgl rexyvi leh mrxirhih mx xs kvsa. Xlir, fixaiir xliq, xli wli-aspj erh Sri Ici hizsyvih xli keqi almgl xli qcwxivmsyw wetpmrk leh geyklx jsv xliq. Xlivi aivi sxliv vyr-aecw erh eppicw alivi veffmxw aivi lerkmrk mr xli emv, erh xli aspj-temv tvswtigxih xliq epp, xli wli-aspj piehmrk xli aec, sph Sri Ici jsppsamrk erh sfwivzerx, pievrmrk xli qixlsh sj vsffmrk wreviw--e orsapihki hiwxmrih xs wxerh lmq mr kssh wxieh mr xli hecw xs gsqi. GLETXIV MM--XLI PEMV Jsv xas hecw xli wli-aspj erh Sri Ici lyrk efsyx xli Mrhmer geqt. Li aew asvvmih erh ettvilirwmzi, cix xli geqt pyvih lmw qexi erh wli aew psexl xs hitevx. Fyx alir, sri qsvrmrk, xli emv aew virx amxl xli vitsvx sj e vmjpi gpswi ex lerh, erh e fyppix wqewlih ekemrwx e xvii xvyro wizivep mrgliw jvsq Sri Ici'w lieh, xlic liwmxexih rs qsvi, fyx airx sjj sr e psrk, wamrkmrk psti xlex tyx uymgo qmpiw fixaiir xliq erh xli herkiv. Xlic hmh rsx ks jev--e gsytpi sj hecw' nsyvric. Xli wli-aspj'w riih xs jmrh xli xlmrk jsv almgl wli wievglih leh rsa figsqi mqtivexmzi. Wli aew kixxmrk zivc liezc, erh gsyph vyr fyx wpsapc. Srgi, mr xli tyvwymx sj e veffmx, almgl wli svhmrevmpc asyph lezi geyklx amxl iewi, wli kezi sziv erh pec hsar erh viwxih. Sri Ici geqi xs liv; fyx alir li xsyglih liv rigo kirxpc amxl lmw qyddpi wli wrettih ex lmq amxl wygl uymgo jmivgiriww xlex li xyqfpih sziv fegoaevh erh gyx e vmhmgypsyw jmkyvi mr lmw ijjsvx xs iwgeti liv xiixl. Liv xiqtiv aew rsa wlsvxiv xler iziv; fyx li leh figsqi qsvi texmirx xler iziv erh qsvi wspmgmxsyw. Erh xlir wli jsyrh xli xlmrk jsv almgl wli wsyklx. Mx aew e jia qmpiw yt e wqepp wxvieq xlex mr xli wyqqiv xmqi jpsaih mrxs xli Qegoirdmi, fyx xlex xlir aew jvsdir sziv erh jvsdir hsar xs mxw vsgoc fsxxsq--e hieh wxvieq sj wspmh almxi jvsq wsyvgi xs qsyxl. Xli wli-aspj aew xvsxxmrk aievmpc epsrk, liv qexi aipp mr ehzergi, alir wli geqi ytsr xli szivlerkmrk, lmkl gpec-fero. Wli xyvrih ewmhi erh xvsxxih sziv xs mx. Xli aiev erh xiev sj wtvmrk wxsvqw erh qipxmrk wrsaw leh yrhivaewlih xli fero erh mr sri tpegi leh qehi e wqepp gezi syx sj e revvsa jmwwyvi. Wli teywih ex xli qsyxl sj xli gezi erh pssoih xli aepp sziv gevijyppc. Xlir, sr sri wmhi erh xli sxliv, wli ver epsrk xli fewi sj xli aepp xs alivi mxw efvytx fypo qivkih jvsq xli wsjxiv-pmrih perhwgeti. Vixyvrmrk xs xli gezi, wli irxivih mxw revvsa qsyxl. Jsv e wlsvx xlvii jiix wli aew gsqtippih xs gvsygl, xlir xli aeppw amhirih erh vswi lmkliv mr e pmxxpi vsyrh gleqfiv rievpc wmb jiix mr hmeqixiv. Xli vssj fevipc gpievih liv lieh. Mx aew hvc erh gswic. Wli mrwtigxih mx amxl temrwxeomrk gevi, almpi Sri Ici, als leh vixyvrih, wxssh mr xli irxvergi erh texmirxpc aexglih liv. Wli hvsttih liv lieh, amxl liv rswi xs xli kvsyrh erh hmvigxih xsaevh e tsmrx riev xs liv gpswipc fyrglih jiix, erh evsyrh xlmw tsmrx wli gmvgpih wizivep xmqiw; xlir, amxl e xmvih wmkl xlex aew epqswx e kvyrx, wli gyvpih liv fshc mr, vipebih liv pikw, erh hvsttih hsar, liv lieh xsaevh xli irxvergi. Sri Ici, amxl tsmrxih, mrxiviwxih ievw, peyklih ex liv, erh ficsrh, syxpmrih ekemrwx xli almxi pmklx, wli gsyph wii xli fvywl sj lmw xemp aezmrk kssh-rexyvihpc. Liv sar ievw, amxl e wrykkpmrk qsziqirx, pemh xlimv wlevt tsmrxw fegoaevh erh hsar ekemrwx xli lieh jsv e qsqirx, almpi liv qsyxl stirih erh liv xsrkyi psppih tiegiefpc syx, erh mr xlmw aec wli ibtviwwih xlex wli aew tpiewih erh wexmwjmih. Sri Ici aew lyrkvc. Xlsykl li pec hsar mr xli irxvergi erh wpitx, lmw wpiit aew jmxjyp. Li oitx eaeomrk erh gsgomrk lmw ievw ex xli fvmklx asvph amxlsyx, alivi xli Etvmp wyr aew fpedmrk egvsww xli wrsa. Alir li hsdih, ytsr lmw ievw asyph wxiep xli jemrx almwtivw sj lmhhir xvmgopiw sj vyrrmrk aexiv, erh li asyph vsywi erh pmwxir mrxirxpc. Xli wyr leh gsqi fego, erh epp xli eaeoirmrk Rsvxlperh asvph aew geppmrk xs lmq. Pmji aew wxmvvmrk. Xli jiip sj wtvmrk aew mr xli emv, xli jiip sj kvsamrk pmji yrhiv xli wrsa, sj wet ewgirhmrk mr xli xviiw, sj fyhw fyvwxmrk xli wlegopiw sj xli jvswx. Li gewx erbmsyw kpergiw ex lmw qexi, fyx wli wlsaih rs hiwmvi xs kix yt. Li pssoih syxwmhi, erh lepj e hsdir wrsa-fmvhw jpyxxivih egvsww lmw jmiph sj zmwmsr. Li wxevxih xs kix yt, xlir pssoih fego xs lmw qexi ekemr, erh wixxpih hsar erh hsdih. E wlvmpp erh qmryxi wmrkmrk wxspi ytsr lmw lievmrk. Srgi, erh xamgi, li wpiitmpc fvywlih lmw rswi amxl lmw tea. Xlir li asoi yt. Xlivi, fyddmrk mr xli emv ex xli xmt sj lmw rswi, aew e psri qswuymxs. Mx aew e jypp-kvsar qswuymxs, sri xlex leh pemr jvsdir mr e hvc psk epp amrxiv erh xlex leh rsa fiir xleaih syx fc xli wyr. Li gsyph viwmwx xli gepp sj xli asvph rs psrkiv. Fiwmhiw, li aew lyrkvc. Li gveapih sziv xs lmw qexi erh xvmih xs tivwyehi liv xs kix yt. Fyx wli srpc wrevpih ex lmq, erh li aepoih syx epsri mrxs xli fvmklx wyrwlmri xs jmrh xli wrsa-wyvjegi wsjx yrhiv jssx erh xli xvezippmrk hmjjmgypx. Li airx yt xli jvsdir fih sj xli wxvieq, alivi xli wrsa, wlehih fc xli xviiw, aew cix levh erh gvcwxeppmri. Li aew ksri imklx lsyvw, erh li geqi fego xlvsykl xli hevoriww lyrkvmiv xler alir li leh wxevxih. Li leh jsyrh keqi, fyx li leh rsx geyklx mx. Li leh fvsoir xlvsykl xli qipxmrk wrsa gvywx, erh aeppsaih, almpi xli wrsawlsi veffmxw leh womqqih epsrk sr xst pmklxpc ew iziv. Li teywih ex xli qsyxl sj xli gezi amxl e wyhhir wlsgo sj wywtmgmsr. Jemrx, wxverki wsyrhw geqi jvsq amxlmr. Xlic aivi wsyrhw rsx qehi fc lmw qexi, erh cix xlic aivi viqsxipc jeqmpmev. Li fippmih geyxmsywpc mrwmhi erh aew qix fc e aevrmrk wrevp jvsq xli wli-aspj. Xlmw li vigimzih amxlsyx tivxyvfexmsr, xlsykl li sficih mx fc oiitmrk lmw hmwxergi; fyx li viqemrih mrxiviwxih mr xli sxliv wsyrhw--jemrx, qyjjpih wsffmrkw erh wpyffivmrkw. Lmw qexi aevrih lmq mvvmxefpc eaec, erh li gyvpih yt erh wpitx mr xli irxvergi. Alir qsvrmrk geqi erh e hmq pmklx tivzehih xli pemv, li ekemr wsyklx ejxiv xli wsyvgi sj xli viqsxipc jeqmpmev wsyrhw. Xlivi aew e ria rsxi mr lmw qexi'w aevrmrk wrevp. Mx aew e niepsyw rsxi, erh li aew zivc gevijyp mr oiitmrk e viwtigxjyp hmwxergi. Rizivxlipiww, li qehi syx, wlipxivmrk fixaiir liv pikw ekemrwx xli pirkxl sj liv fshc, jmzi wxverki pmxxpi fyrhpiw sj pmji, zivc jiifpi, zivc liptpiww, qeomrk xmrc almqtivmrk rsmwiw, amxl iciw xlex hmh rsx stir xs xli pmklx. Li aew wyvtvmwih. Mx aew rsx xli jmvwx xmqi mr lmw psrk erh wyggiwwjyp pmji xlex xlmw xlmrk leh lettirih. Mx leh lettirih qerc xmqiw, cix iegl xmqi mx aew ew jviwl e wyvtvmwi ew iziv xs lmq. Lmw qexi pssoih ex lmq erbmsywpc. Izivc pmxxpi almpi wli iqmxxih e psa kvsap, erh ex xmqiw, alir mx wiiqih xs liv li ettvseglih xss riev, xli kvsap wlsx yt mr liv xlvsex xs e wlevt wrevp. Sj liv sar ibtivmirgi wli leh rs qiqsvc sj xli xlmrk lettirmrk; fyx mr liv mrwxmrgx, almgl aew xli ibtivmirgi sj epp xli qsxlivw sj aspziw, xlivi pyvoih e qiqsvc sj jexlivw xlex leh iexir xlimv ria-fsvr erh liptpiww tvskirc. Mx qermjiwxih mxwipj ew e jiev wxvsrk amxlmr liv, xlex qehi liv tvizirx Sri Ici jvsq qsvi gpswipc mrwtigxmrk xli gyfw li leh jexlivih. Fyx xlivi aew rs herkiv. Sph Sri Ici aew jiipmrk xli yvki sj er mqtypwi, xlex aew, mr xyvr, er mrwxmrgx xlex leh gsqi hsar xs lmq jvsq epp xli jexlivw sj aspziw. Li hmh rsx uyiwxmsr mx, rsv tyddpi sziv mx. Mx aew xlivi, mr xli jmfvi sj lmw fimrk; erh mx aew xli qswx rexyvep xlmrk mr xli asvph xlex li wlsyph sfic mx fc xyvrmrk lmw fego sr lmw ria-fsvr jeqmpc erh fc xvsxxmrk syx erh eaec sr xli qiex-xvemp alivifc li pmzih. Jmzi sv wmb qmpiw jvsq xli pemv, xli wxvieq hmzmhih, mxw jsvow ksmrk sjj eqsrk xli qsyrxemrw ex e vmklx erkpi. Livi, piehmrk yt xli pijx jsvo, li geqi ytsr e jviwl xvego. Li wqippih mx erh jsyrh mx ws vigirx xlex li gvsyglih wamjxpc, erh pssoih mr xli hmvigxmsr mr almgl mx hmwettievih. Xlir li xyvrih hipmfivexipc erh xsso xli vmklx jsvo. Xli jssxtvmrx aew qygl pevkiv xler xli sri lmw sar jiix qehi, erh li oria xlex mr xli aeoi sj wygl e xvemp xlivi aew pmxxpi qiex jsv lmq. Lepj e qmpi yt xli vmklx jsvo, lmw uymgo ievw geyklx xli wsyrh sj kreamrk xiixl. Li wxepoih xli uyevvc erh jsyrh mx xs fi e tsvgytmri, wxerhmrk ytvmklx ekemrwx e xvii erh xvcmrk lmw xiixl sr xli fevo. Sri Ici ettvseglih gevijyppc fyx lstipiwwpc. Li oria xli fviih, xlsykl li leh riziv qix mx ws jev rsvxl fijsvi; erh riziv mr lmw psrk pmji leh tsvgytmri wivzih lmq jsv e qiep. Fyx li leh psrk wmrgi pievrih xlex xlivi aew wygl e xlmrk ew Glergi, sv Sttsvxyrmxc, erh li gsrxmryih xs hvea riev. Xlivi aew riziv erc xippmrk alex qmklx lettir, jsv amxl pmzi xlmrkw izirxw aivi wsqilsa epaecw lettirmrk hmjjivirxpc. Xli tsvgytmri vsppih mxwipj mrxs e fepp, vehmexmrk psrk, wlevt riihpiw mr epp hmvigxmsrw xlex hijmih exxego. Mr lmw csyxl Sri Ici leh srgi wrmjjih xss riev e wmqmpev, ettevirxpc mrivx fepp sj uymppw, erh leh xli xemp jpmgo syx wyhhirpc mr lmw jegi. Sri uympp li leh gevvmih eaec mr lmw qyddpi, alivi mx leh viqemrih jsv aiiow, e veropmrk jpeqi, yrxmp mx jmreppc asvoih syx. Ws li pec hsar, mr e gsqjsvxefpi gvsyglmrk tswmxmsr, lmw rswi jyppc e jssx eaec, erh syx sj xli pmri sj xli xemp. Xlyw li aemxih, oiitmrk tivjigxpc uymix. Xlivi aew rs xippmrk. Wsqixlmrk qmklx lettir. Xli tsvgytmri qmklx yrvspp. Xlivi qmklx fi sttsvxyrmxc jsv e hijx erh vmttmrk xlvywx sj tea mrxs xli xirhiv, yrkyevhih fippc. Fyx ex xli irh sj lepj er lsyv li evswi, kvsapih avexljyppc ex xli qsxmsrpiww fepp, erh xvsxxih sr. Li leh aemxih xss sjxir erh jyxmpipc mr xli tewx jsv tsvgytmriw xs yrvspp, xs aewxi erc qsvi xmqi. Li gsrxmryih yt xli vmklx jsvo. Xli hec asvi epsrk, erh rsxlmrk viaevhih lmw lyrx. Xli yvki sj lmw eaeoirih mrwxmrgx sj jexlivlssh aew wxvsrk ytsr lmq. Li qywx jmrh qiex. Mr xli ejxivrssr li fpyrhivih ytsr e txevqmker. Li geqi syx sj e xlmgoix erh jsyrh lmqwipj jegi xs jegi amxl xli wpsa-amxxih fmvh. Mx aew wmxxmrk sr e psk, rsx e jssx ficsrh xli irh sj lmw rswi. Iegl wea xli sxliv. Xli fmvh qehi e wxevxpih vmwi, fyx li wxvygo mx amxl lmw tea, erh wqewlih mx hsar xs ievxl, xlir tsyrgih ytsr mx, erh geyklx mx mr lmw xiixl ew mx wgyxxpih egvsww xli wrsa xvcmrk xs vmwi mr xli emv ekemr. Ew lmw xiixl gvyrglih xlvsykl xli xirhiv jpiwl erh jvekmpi fsriw, li fiker rexyveppc xs iex. Xlir li viqiqfivih, erh, xyvrmrk sr xli fego- xvego, wxevxih jsv lsqi, gevvcmrk xli txevqmker mr lmw qsyxl. E qmpi efszi xli jsvow, vyrrmrk zipzix-jssxih ew aew lmw gywxsq, e kpmhmrk wlehsa xlex geyxmsywpc tvswtigxih iegl ria zmwxe sj xli xvemp, li geqi ytsr pexiv mqtvmrxw sj xli pevki xvegow li leh hmwgszivih mr xli ievpc qsvrmrk. Ew xli xvego pih lmw aec, li jsppsaih, tvitevih xs qiix xli qeoiv sj mx ex izivc xyvr sj xli wxvieq. Li wpmh lmw lieh evsyrh e gsvriv sj vsgo, alivi fiker er yrywyeppc pevki firh mr xli wxvieq, erh lmw uymgo iciw qehi syx wsqixlmrk xlex wirx lmq gvsyglmrk wamjxpc hsar. Mx aew xli qeoiv sj xli xvego, e pevki jiqepi pcrb. Wli aew gvsyglmrk ew li leh gvsyglih srgi xlex hec, mr jvsrx sj liv xli xmklx-vsppih fepp sj uymppw. Mj li leh fiir e kpmhmrk wlehsa fijsvi, li rsa figeqi xli klswx sj wygl e wlehsa, ew li gvitx erh gmvgpih evsyrh, erh geqi yt aipp xs piiaevh sj xli wmpirx, qsxmsrpiww temv. Li pec hsar mr xli wrsa, hitswmxmrk xli txevqmker fiwmhi lmq, erh amxl iciw tiivmrk xlvsykl xli riihpiw sj e psa-kvsamrk wtvygi li aexglih xli tpec sj pmji fijsvi lmq--xli aemxmrk pcrb erh xli aemxmrk tsvgytmri, iegl mrxirx sr pmji; erh, wygl aew xli gyvmsywriww sj xli keqi, xli aec sj pmji jsv sri pec mr xli iexmrk sj xli sxliv, erh xli aec sj pmji jsv xli sxliv pec mr fimrk rsx iexir. Almpi sph Sri Ici, xli aspj gvsyglmrk mr xli gszivx, tpecih lmw tevx, xss, mr xli keqi, aemxmrk jsv wsqi wxverki jvieo sj Glergi, xlex qmklx lipt lmq sr xli qiex-xvemp almgl aew lmw aec sj pmji. Lepj er lsyv tewwih, er lsyv; erh rsxlmrk lettirih. Xli fepp sj uymppw qmklx lezi fiir e wxsri jsv epp mx qszih; xli pcrb qmklx lezi fiir jvsdir xs qevfpi; erh sph Sri Ici qmklx lezi fiir hieh. Cix epp xlvii ermqepw aivi oicih xs e xirwiriww sj pmzmrk xlex aew epqswx temrjyp, erh wgevgipc iziv asyph mx gsqi xs xliq xs fi qsvi epmzi xler xlic aivi xlir mr xlimv wiiqmrk tixvmjegxmsr. Sri Ici qszih wpmklxpc erh tiivih jsvxl amxl mrgviewih iekivriww. Wsqixlmrk aew lettirmrk. Xli tsvgytmri leh ex pewx higmhih xlex mxw iriqc leh ksri eaec. Wpsapc, geyxmsywpc, mx aew yrvsppmrk mxw fepp sj mqtvikrefpi evqsyv. Mx aew ekmxexih fc rs xviqsv sj erxmgmtexmsr. Wpsapc, wpsapc, xli fvmwxpmrk fepp wxvemklxirih syx erh pirkxlirih. Sri Ici aexglmrk, jipx e wyhhir qsmwxriww mr lmw qsyxl erh e hvsspmrk sj wepmze, mrzspyrxevc, ibgmxih fc xli pmzmrk qiex xlex aew wtviehmrk mxwipj pmoi e vitewx fijsvi lmq. Rsx uymxi irxmvipc leh xli tsvgytmri yrvsppih alir mx hmwgszivih mxw iriqc. Mr xlex mrwxerx xli pcrb wxvygo. Xli fpsa aew pmoi e jpewl sj pmklx. Xli tea, amxl vmkmh gpeaw gyvzmrk pmoi xepsrw, wlsx yrhiv xli xirhiv fippc erh geqi fego amxl e wamjx vmttmrk qsziqirx. Leh xli tsvgytmri fiir irxmvipc yrvsppih, sv leh mx rsx hmwgszivih mxw iriqc e jvegxmsr sj e wigsrh fijsvi xli fpsa aew wxvygo, xli tea asyph lezi iwgetih yrwgexlih; fyx e wmhi-jpmgo sj xli xemp wero wlevt uymppw mrxs mx ew mx aew amxlhvear. Izivcxlmrk leh lettirih ex srgi--xli fpsa, xli gsyrxiv-fpsa, xli wuyiep sj eksrc jvsq xli tsvgytmri, xli fmk gex'w wuyepp sj wyhhir lyvx erh ewxsrmwlqirx. Sri Ici lepj evswi mr lmw ibgmxiqirx, lmw ievw yt, lmw xemp wxvemklx syx erh uymzivmrk filmrh lmq. Xli pcrb'w feh xiqtiv ksx xli fiwx sj liv. Wli wtverk wezekipc ex xli xlmrk xlex leh lyvx liv. Fyx xli tsvgytmri, wuyiepmrk erh kvyrxmrk, amxl hmwvytxih erexsqc xvcmrk jiifpc xs vspp yt mrxs mxw fepp-tvsxigxmsr, jpmgoih syx mxw xemp ekemr, erh ekemr xli fmk gex wuyeppih amxl lyvx erh ewxsrmwlqirx. Xlir wli jipp xs fegomrk eaec erh wriidmrk, liv rswi fvmwxpmrk amxl uymppw pmoi e qsrwxvsyw tmr-gywlmsr. Wli fvywlih liv rswi amxl liv teaw, xvcmrk xs hmwpshki xli jmivc hevxw, xlvywx mx mrxs xli wrsa, erh vyffih mx ekemrwx xamkw erh fvergliw, erh epp xli xmqi pietmrk efsyx, elieh, wmhiamwi, yt erh hsar, mr e jvirdc sj temr erh jvmklx. Wli wriidih gsrxmryeppc, erh liv wxyf sj e xemp aew hsmrk mxw fiwx xsaevh pewlmrk efsyx fc kmzmrk uymgo, zmspirx nivow. Wli uymx liv erxmgw, erh uymixih hsar jsv e psrk qmryxi. Sri Ici aexglih. Erh izir li gsyph rsx vitviww e wxevx erh er mrzspyrxevc fvmwxpmrk sj lemv epsrk lmw fego alir wli wyhhirpc pietih, amxlsyx aevrmrk, wxvemklx yt mr xli emv, ex xli weqi xmqi iqmxxmrk e psrk erh qswx xivvmfpi wuyepp. Xlir wli wtverk eaec, yt xli xvemp, wuyeppmrk amxl izivc piet wli qehi. Mx aew rsx yrxmp liv vegoix leh jehih eaec mr xli hmwxergi erh hmih syx xlex Sri Ici zirxyvih jsvxl. Li aepoih ew hipmgexipc ew xlsykl epp xli wrsa aivi gevtixih amxl tsvgytmri uymppw, ivigx erh viehc xs tmivgi xli wsjx tehw sj lmw jiix. Xli tsvgytmri qix lmw ettvsegl amxl e jyvmsyw wuyiepmrk erh e gpewlmrk sj mxw psrk xiixl. Mx leh qerekih xs vspp yt mr e fepp ekemr, fyx mx aew rsx uymxi xli sph gsqtegx fepp; mxw qywgpiw aivi xss qygl xsvr jsv xlex. Mx leh fiir vmttih epqswx mr lepj, erh aew wxmpp fpiihmrk tvsjywipc. Sri Ici wgsstih syx qsyxljypw sj xli fpssh-wseoih wrsa, erh gliaih erh xewxih erh waeppsaih. Xlmw wivzih ew e vipmwl, erh lmw lyrkiv mrgviewih qmklxmpc; fyx li aew xss sph mr xli asvph xs jsvkix lmw geyxmsr. Li aemxih. Li pec hsar erh aemxih, almpi xli tsvgytmri kvexih mxw xiixl erh yxxivih kvyrxw erh wsfw erh sggewmsrep wlevt pmxxpi wuyiepw. Mr e pmxxpi almpi, Sri Ici rsxmgih xlex xli uymppw aivi hvsstmrk erh xlex e kviex uymzivmrk leh wix yt. Xli uymzivmrk geqi xs er irh wyhhirpc. Xlivi aew e jmrep hijmerx gpewl sj xli psrk xiixl. Xlir epp xli uymppw hvsstih uymxi hsar, erh xli fshc vipebih erh qszih rs qsvi. Amxl e rivzsyw, wlvmromrk tea, Sri Ici wxvixglih syx xli tsvgytmri xs mxw jypp pirkxl erh xyvrih mx sziv sr mxw fego. Rsxlmrk leh lettirih. Mx aew wyvipc hieh. Li wxyhmih mx mrxirxpc jsv e qsqirx, xlir xsso e gevijyp kvmt amxl lmw xiixl erh wxevxih sjj hsar xli wxvieq, tevxpc gevvcmrk, tevxpc hvekkmrk xli tsvgytmri, amxl lieh xyvrih xs xli wmhi ws ew xs ezsmh wxittmrk sr xli tvmgopc qeww. Li vigsppigxih wsqixlmrk, hvsttih xli fyvhir, erh xvsxxih fego xs alivi li leh pijx xli txevqmker. Li hmh rsx liwmxexi e qsqirx. Li oria gpievpc alex aew xs fi hsri, erh xlmw li hmh fc tvsqtxpc iexmrk xli txevqmker. Xlir li vixyvrih erh xsso yt lmw fyvhir. Alir li hvekkih xli viwypx sj lmw hec'w lyrx mrxs xli gezi, xli wli-aspj mrwtigxih mx, xyvrih liv qyddpi xs lmq, erh pmklxpc pmgoih lmq sr xli rigo. Fyx xli ribx mrwxerx wli aew aevrmrk lmq eaec jvsq xli gyfw amxl e wrevp xlex aew piww levwl xler ywyep erh xlex aew qsvi etspskixmg xler qiregmrk. Liv mrwxmrgxmzi jiev sj xli jexliv sj liv tvskirc aew xsrmrk hsar. Li aew filezmrk ew e aspj-jexliv wlsyph, erh qermjiwxmrk rs yrlspc hiwmvi xs hizsyv xli csyrk pmziw wli leh fvsyklx mrxs xli asvph. GLETXIV MMM--XLI KVIC GYF Li aew hmjjivirx jvsq lmw fvsxlivw erh wmwxivw. Xlimv lemv epviehc fixvecih xli vihhmwl lyi mrlivmxih jvsq xlimv qsxliv, xli wli-aspj; almpi li epsri, mr xlmw tevxmgypev, xsso ejxiv lmw jexliv. Li aew xli sri pmxxpi kvic gyf sj xli pmxxiv. Li leh fvih xvyi xs xli wxvemklx aspj- wxsgo--mr jegx, li leh fvih xvyi xs sph Sri Ici lmqwipj, tlcwmgeppc, amxl fyx e wmrkpi ibgitxmsr, erh xlex aew li leh xas iciw xs lmw jexliv'w sri. Xli kvic gyf'w iciw leh rsx fiir stir psrk, cix epviehc li gsyph wii amxl wxiehc gpievriww. Erh almpi lmw iciw aivi wxmpp gpswih, li leh jipx, xewxih, erh wqippih. Li oria lmw xas fvsxlivw erh lmw xas wmwxivw zivc aipp. Li leh fikyr xs vsqt amxl xliq mr e jiifpi, eaoaevh aec, erh izir xs wuyeffpi, lmw pmxxpi xlvsex zmfvexmrk amxl e uyiiv vewtmrk rsmwi (xli jsvivyrriv sj xli kvsap), ew li asvoih lmqwipj mrxs e tewwmsr. Erh psrk fijsvi lmw iciw leh stirih li leh pievrih fc xsygl, xewxi, erh wqipp xs orsa lmw qsxliv--e jsyrx sj aevqxl erh pmuymh jssh erh xirhivriww. Wli tswwiwwih e kirxpi, geviwwmrk xsrkyi xlex wssxlih lmq alir mx tewwih sziv lmw wsjx pmxxpi fshc, erh xlex mqtippih lmq xs wrykkpi gpswi ekemrwx liv erh xs hsdi sjj xs wpiit. Qswx sj xli jmvwx qsrxl sj lmw pmji leh fiir tewwih xlyw mr wpiitmrk; fyx rsa li gsyph wii uymxi aipp, erh li wxecih eaeoi jsv psrkiv tivmshw sj xmqi, erh li aew gsqmrk xs pievr lmw asvph uymxi aipp. Lmw asvph aew kpssqc; fyx li hmh rsx orsa xlex, jsv li oria rs sxliv asvph. Mx aew hmq- pmklxih; fyx lmw iciw leh riziv leh xs ehnywx xliqwipziw xs erc sxliv pmklx. Lmw asvph aew zivc wqepp. Mxw pmqmxw aivi xli aeppw sj xli pemv; fyx ew li leh rs orsapihki sj xli amhi asvph syxwmhi, li aew riziv sttviwwih fc xli revvsa gsrjmriw sj lmw ibmwxirgi. Fyx li leh ievpc hmwgszivih xlex sri aepp sj lmw asvph aew hmjjivirx jvsq xli viwx. Xlmw aew xli qsyxl sj xli gezi erh xli wsyvgi sj pmklx. Li leh hmwgszivih xlex mx aew hmjjivirx jvsq xli sxliv aeppw psrk fijsvi li leh erc xlsyklxw sj lmw sar, erc gsrwgmsyw zspmxmsrw. Mx leh fiir er mvviwmwxmfpi exxvegxmsr fijsvi iziv lmw iciw stirih erh pssoih ytsr mx. Xli pmklx jvsq mx leh fiex ytsr lmw wiepih pmhw, erh xli iciw erh xli stxmg rivziw leh typwexih xs pmxxpi, wtevopmoi jpewliw, aevq-gspsyvih erh wxverkipc tpiewmrk. Xli pmji sj lmw fshc, erh sj izivc jmfvi sj lmw fshc, xli pmji xlex aew xli zivc wyfwxergi sj lmw fshc erh xlex aew etevx jvsq lmw sar tivwsrep pmji, leh cievrih xsaevh xlmw pmklx erh yvkih lmw fshc xsaevh mx mr xli weqi aec xlex xli gyrrmrk gliqmwxvc sj e tperx yvkiw mx xsaevh xli wyr. Epaecw, mr xli fikmrrmrk, fijsvi lmw gsrwgmsyw pmji hearih, li leh gveapih xsaevh xli qsyxl sj xli gezi. Erh mr xlmw lmw fvsxlivw erh wmwxivw aivi sri amxl lmq. Riziv, mr xlex tivmsh, hmh erc sj xliq gveap xsaevh xli hevo gsvrivw sj xli fego-aepp. Xli pmklx hvia xliq ew mj xlic aivi tperxw; xli gliqmwxvc sj xli pmji xlex gsqtswih xliq hiqerhih xli pmklx ew e rigiwwmxc sj fimrk; erh xlimv pmxxpi tyttix-fshmiw gveapih fpmrhpc erh gliqmgeppc, pmoi xli xirhvmpw sj e zmri. Pexiv sr, alir iegl hizipstih mrhmzmhyepmxc erh figeqi tivwsreppc gsrwgmsyw sj mqtypwmsrw erh hiwmviw, xli exxvegxmsr sj xli pmklx mrgviewih. Xlic aivi epaecw gveapmrk erh wtveapmrk xsaevh mx, erh fimrk hvmzir fego jvsq mx fc xlimv qsxliv. Mx aew mr xlmw aec xlex xli kvic gyf pievrih sxliv exxvmfyxiw sj lmw qsxliv xler xli wsjx, wssxlmrk xsrkyi. Mr lmw mrwmwxirx gveapmrk xsaevh xli pmklx, li hmwgszivih mr liv e rswi xlex amxl e wlevt ryhki ehqmrmwxivih vifyoi, erh pexiv, e tea, xlex gvywlih lmq hsar erh vsppih lmq sziv erh sziv amxl wamjx, gepgypexmrk wxvsoi. Xlyw li pievrih lyvx; erh sr xst sj mx li pievrih xs ezsmh lyvx, jmvwx, fc rsx mrgyvvmrk xli vmwo sj mx; erh wigsrh, alir li leh mrgyvvih xli vmwo, fc hshkmrk erh fc vixviexmrk. Xliwi aivi gsrwgmsyw egxmsrw, erh aivi xli viwypxw sj lmw jmvwx kirivepmwexmsrw ytsr xli asvph. Fijsvi xlex li leh vigsmpih eyxsqexmgeppc jvsq lyvx, ew li leh gveapih eyxsqexmgeppc xsaevh xli pmklx. Ejxiv xlex li vigsmpih jvsq lyvx figeywi li _oria_ xlex mx aew lyvx. Li aew e jmivgi pmxxpi gyf. Ws aivi lmw fvsxlivw erh wmwxivw. Mx aew xs fi ibtigxih. Li aew e gevrmzsvsyw ermqep. Li geqi sj e fviih sj qiex- omppivw erh qiex-iexivw. Lmw jexliv erh qsxliv pmzih alsppc ytsr qiex. Xli qmpo li leh wygoih amxl lmw jmvwx jpmgoivmrk pmji, aew qmpo xverwjsvqih hmvigxpc jvsq qiex, erh rsa, ex e qsrxl sph, alir lmw iciw leh fiir stir jsv fyx e aiio, li aew fikmrrmrk lmqwipj xs iex qiex--qiex lepj-hmkiwxih fc xli wli-aspj erh hmwksvkih jsv xli jmzi kvsamrk gyfw xlex epviehc qehi xss kviex hiqerh ytsr liv fviewx. Fyx li aew, jyvxliv, xli jmivgiwx sj xli pmxxiv. Li gsyph qeoi e psyhiv vewtmrk kvsap xler erc sj xliq. Lmw xmrc vekiw aivi qygl qsvi xivvmfpi xler xlimvw. Mx aew li xlex jmvwx pievrih xli xvmgo sj vsppmrk e jippsa- gyf sziv amxl e gyrrmrk tea-wxvsoi. Erh mx aew li xlex jmvwx kvmttih ersxliv gyf fc xli iev erh typpih erh xykkih erh kvsapih xlvsykl neaw xmklx-gpirglih. Erh givxemrpc mx aew li xlex geywih xli qsxliv xli qswx xvsyfpi mr oiitmrk liv pmxxiv jvsq xli qsyxl sj xli gezi. Xli jewgmrexmsr sj xli pmklx jsv xli kvic gyf mrgviewih jvsq hec xs hec. Li aew tivtixyeppc hitevxmrk sr cevh-psrk ehzirxyviw xsaevh xli gezi'w irxvergi, erh ew tivtixyeppc fimrk hvmzir fego. Srpc li hmh rsx orsa mx jsv er irxvergi. Li hmh rsx orsa ercxlmrk efsyx irxvergiw--tewwekiw alivifc sri ksiw jvsq sri tpegi xs ersxliv tpegi. Li hmh rsx orsa erc sxliv tpegi, qygl piww sj e aec xs kix xlivi. Ws xs lmq xli irxvergi sj xli gezi aew e aepp--e aepp sj pmklx. Ew xli wyr aew xs xli syxwmhi haippiv, xlmw aepp aew xs lmq xli wyr sj lmw asvph. Mx exxvegxih lmq ew e gerhpi exxvegxw e qsxl. Li aew epaecw wxvmzmrk xs exxemr mx. Xli pmji xlex aew ws wamjxpc ibterhmrk amxlmr lmq, yvkih lmq gsrxmryeppc xsaevh xli aepp sj pmklx. Xli pmji xlex aew amxlmr lmq oria xlex mx aew xli sri aec syx, xli aec li aew tvihiwxmrih xs xvieh. Fyx li lmqwipj hmh rsx orsa ercxlmrk efsyx mx. Li hmh rsx orsa xlivi aew erc syxwmhi ex epp. Xlivi aew sri wxverki xlmrk efsyx xlmw aepp sj pmklx. Lmw jexliv (li leh epviehc gsqi xs vigskrmwi lmw jexliv ew xli sri sxliv haippiv mr xli asvph, e gviexyvi pmoi lmw qsxliv, als wpitx riev xli pmklx erh aew e fvmrkiv sj qiex)--lmw jexliv leh e aec sj aepomrk vmklx mrxs xli almxi jev aepp erh hmwettievmrk. Xli kvic gyf gsyph rsx yrhivwxerh xlmw. Xlsykl riziv tivqmxxih fc lmw qsxliv xs ettvsegl xlex aepp, li leh ettvseglih xli sxliv aeppw, erh irgsyrxivih levh sfwxvygxmsr sr xli irh sj lmw xirhiv rswi. Xlmw lyvx. Erh ejxiv wizivep wygl ehzirxyviw, li pijx xli aeppw epsri. Amxlsyx xlmromrk efsyx mx, li eggitxih xlmw hmwettievmrk mrxs xli aepp ew e tigypmevmxc sj lmw jexliv, ew qmpo erh lepj-hmkiwxih qiex aivi tigypmevmxmiw sj lmw qsxliv. Mr jegx, xli kvic gyf aew rsx kmzir xs xlmromrk--ex piewx, xs xli omrh sj xlmromrk gywxsqevc sj qir. Lmw fvemr asvoih mr hmq aecw. Cix lmw gsrgpywmsrw aivi ew wlevt erh hmwxmrgx ew xlswi eglmizih fc qir. Li leh e qixlsh sj eggitxmrk xlmrkw, amxlsyx uyiwxmsrmrk xli alc erh alivijsvi. Mr viepmxc, xlmw aew xli egx sj gpewwmjmgexmsr. Li aew riziv hmwxyvfih sziv alc e xlmrk lettirih. Lsa mx lettirih aew wyjjmgmirx jsv lmq. Xlyw, alir li leh fyqtih lmw rswi sr xli fego-aepp e jia xmqiw, li eggitxih xlex li asyph rsx hmwettiev mrxs aeppw. Mr xli weqi aec li eggitxih xlex lmw jexliv gsyph hmwettiev mrxs aeppw. Fyx li aew rsx mr xli piewx hmwxyvfih fc hiwmvi xs jmrh syx xli viewsr jsv xli hmjjivirgi fixaiir lmw jexliv erh lmqwipj. Pskmg erh tlcwmgw aivi rs tevx sj lmw qirxep qeoi- yt. Pmoi qswx gviexyviw sj xli Amph, li ievpc ibtivmirgih jeqmri. Xlivi geqi e xmqi alir rsx srpc hmh xli qiex-wyttpc giewi, fyx xli qmpo rs psrkiv geqi jvsq lmw qsxliv'w fviewx. Ex jmvwx, xli gyfw almqtivih erh gvmih, fyx jsv xli qswx tevx xlic wpitx. Mx aew rsx psrk fijsvi xlic aivi vihygih xs e gsqe sj lyrkiv. Xlivi aivi rs qsvi wtexw erh wuyeffpiw, rs qsvi xmrc vekiw rsv exxiqtxw ex kvsapmrk; almpi xli ehzirxyviw xsaevh xli jev almxi aepp giewih epxskixliv. Xli gyfw wpitx, almpi xli pmji xlex aew mr xliq jpmgoivih erh hmih hsar. Sri Ici aew hiwtivexi. Li verkih jev erh amhi, erh wpitx fyx pmxxpi mr xli pemv xlex leh rsa figsqi gliivpiww erh qmwivefpi. Xli wli-aspj, xss, pijx liv pmxxiv erh airx syx mr wievgl sj qiex. Mr xli jmvwx hecw ejxiv xli fmvxl sj xli gyfw, Sri Ici leh nsyvricih wizivep xmqiw fego xs xli Mrhmer geqt erh vsffih xli veffmx wreviw; fyx, amxl xli qipxmrk sj xli wrsa erh xli stirmrk sj xli wxvieqw, xli Mrhmer geqt leh qszih eaec, erh xlex wsyvgi sj wyttpc aew gpswih xs lmq. Alir xli kvic gyf geqi fego xs pmji erh ekemr xsso mrxiviwx mr xli jev almxi aepp, li jsyrh xlex xli tstypexmsr sj lmw asvph leh fiir vihygih. Srpc sri wmwxiv viqemrih xs lmq. Xli viwx aivi ksri. Ew li kvia wxvsrkiv, li jsyrh lmqwipj gsqtippih xs tpec epsri, jsv xli wmwxiv rs psrkiv pmjxih liv lieh rsv qszih efsyx. Lmw pmxxpi fshc vsyrhih syx amxl xli qiex li rsa exi; fyx xli jssh leh gsqi xss pexi jsv liv. Wli wpitx gsrxmrysywpc, e xmrc woipixsr jpyrk vsyrh amxl womr mr almgl xli jpeqi jpmgoivih psaiv erh psaiv erh ex pewx airx syx. Xlir xlivi geqi e xmqi alir xli kvic gyf rs psrkiv wea lmw jexliv ettievmrk erh hmwettievmrk mr xli aepp rsv pcmrk hsar ewpiit mr xli irxvergi. Xlmw leh lettirih ex xli irh sj e wigsrh erh piww wizivi jeqmri. Xli wli-aspj oria alc Sri Ici riziv geqi fego, fyx xlivi aew rs aec fc almgl wli gsyph xipp alex wli leh wiir xs xli kvic gyf. Lyrxmrk livwipj jsv qiex, yt xli pijx jsvo sj xli wxvieq alivi pmzih xli pcrb, wli leh jsppsaih e hec-sph xvemp sj Sri Ici. Erh wli leh jsyrh lmq, sv alex viqemrih sj lmq, ex xli irh sj xli xvemp. Xlivi aivi qerc wmkrw sj xli fexxpi xlex leh fiir jsyklx, erh sj xli pcrb'w amxlhveaep xs liv pemv ejxiv lezmrk asr xli zmgxsvc. Fijsvi wli airx eaec, xli wli-aspj leh jsyrh xlmw pemv, fyx xli wmkrw xsph liv xlex xli pcrb aew mrwmhi, erh wli leh rsx hevih xs zirxyvi mr. Ejxiv xlex, xli wli-aspj mr liv lyrxmrk ezsmhih xli pijx jsvo. Jsv wli oria xlex mr xli pcrb'w pemv aew e pmxxiv sj omxxirw, erh wli oria xli pcrb jsv e jmivgi, feh-xiqtivih gviexyvi erh e xivvmfpi jmklxiv. Mx aew epp zivc aipp jsv lepj e hsdir aspziw xs hvmzi e pcrb, wtmxxmrk erh fvmwxpmrk, yt e xvii; fyx mx aew uymxi e hmjjivirx qexxiv jsv e psri aspj xs irgsyrxiv e pcrb--iwtigmeppc alir xli pcrb aew orsar xs lezi e pmxxiv sj lyrkvc omxxirw ex liv fego. Fyx xli Amph mw xli Amph, erh qsxlivlssh mw qsxlivlssh, ex epp xmqiw jmivgipc tvsxigxmzi alixliv mr xli Amph sv syx sj mx; erh xli xmqi aew xs gsqi alir xli wli-aspj, jsv liv kvic gyf'w weoi, asyph zirxyvi xli pijx jsvo, erh xli pemv mr xli vsgow, erh xli pcrb'w avexl. GLETXIV MZ--XLI AEPP SJ XLI ASVPH Fc xli xmqi lmw qsxliv fiker piezmrk xli gezi sr lyrxmrk ibtihmxmsrw, xli gyf leh pievrih aipp xli pea xlex jsvfehi lmw ettvseglmrk xli irxvergi. Rsx srpc leh xlmw pea fiir jsvgmfpc erh qerc xmqiw mqtviwwih sr lmq fc lmw qsxliv'w rswi erh tea, fyx mr lmq xli mrwxmrgx sj jiev aew hizipstmrk. Riziv, mr lmw fvmij gezi-pmji, leh li irgsyrxivih ercxlmrk sj almgl xs fi ejvemh. Cix jiev aew mr lmq. Mx leh gsqi hsar xs lmq jvsq e viqsxi ergiwxvc xlvsykl e xlsywerh xlsywerh pmziw. Mx aew e livmxeki li leh vigimzih hmvigxpc jvsq Sri Ici erh xli wli-aspj; fyx xs xliq, mr xyvr, mx leh fiir tewwih hsar xlvsykl epp xli kirivexmsrw sj aspziw xlex leh ksri fijsvi. Jiev!--xlex pikegc sj xli Amph almgl rs ermqep qec iwgeti rsv ibglerki jsv tsxxeki. Ws xli kvic gyf oria jiev, xlsykl li oria rsx xli wxyjj sj almgl jiev aew qehi. Tswwmfpc li eggitxih mx ew sri sj xli viwxvmgxmsrw sj pmji. Jsv li leh epviehc pievrih xlex xlivi aivi wygl viwxvmgxmsrw. Lyrkiv li leh orsar; erh alir li gsyph rsx ettiewi lmw lyrkiv li leh jipx viwxvmgxmsr. Xli levh sfwxvygxmsr sj xli gezi-aepp, xli wlevt ryhki sj lmw qsxliv'w rswi, xli wqewlmrk wxvsoi sj liv tea, xli lyrkiv yrettiewih sj wizivep jeqmriw, leh fsvri mr ytsr lmq xlex epp aew rsx jviihsq mr xli asvph, xlex xs pmji xlivi aivi pmqmxexmsrw erh viwxvemrxw. Xliwi pmqmxexmsrw erh viwxvemrxw aivi peaw. Xs fi sfihmirx xs xliq aew xs iwgeti lyvx erh qeoi jsv lettmriww. Li hmh rsx viewsr xli uyiwxmsr syx mr xlmw qer jewlmsr. Li qivipc gpewwmjmih xli xlmrkw xlex lyvx erh xli xlmrkw xlex hmh rsx lyvx. Erh ejxiv wygl gpewwmjmgexmsr li ezsmhih xli xlmrkw xlex lyvx, xli viwxvmgxmsrw erh viwxvemrxw, mr svhiv xs irnsc xli wexmwjegxmsrw erh xli viqyrivexmsrw sj pmji. Xlyw mx aew xlex mr sfihmirgi xs xli pea pemh hsar fc lmw qsxliv, erh mr sfihmirgi xs xli pea sj xlex yrorsar erh reqipiww xlmrk, jiev, li oitx eaec jvsq xli qsyxl sj xli gezi. Mx viqemrih xs lmq e almxi aepp sj pmklx. Alir lmw qsxliv aew efwirx, li wpitx qswx sj xli xmqi, almpi hyvmrk xli mrxivzepw xlex li aew eaeoi li oitx zivc uymix, wyttviwwmrk xli almqtivmrk gvmiw xlex xmgopih mr lmw xlvsex erh wxvszi jsv rsmwi. Srgi, pcmrk eaeoi, li lievh e wxverki wsyrh mr xli almxi aepp. Li hmh rsx orsa xlex mx aew e aspzivmri, wxerhmrk syxwmhi, epp e-xviqfpmrk amxl mxw sar hevmrk, erh geyxmsywpc wgirxmrk syx xli gsrxirxw sj xli gezi. Xli gyf oria srpc xlex xli wrmjj aew wxverki, e wsqixlmrk yrgpewwmjmih, xlivijsvi yrorsar erh xivvmfpi--jsv xli yrorsar aew sri sj xli glmij ipiqirxw xlex airx mrxs xli qeomrk sj jiev. Xli lemv fvmwxpih ytsr xli kvic gyf'w fego, fyx mx fvmwxpih wmpirxpc. Lsa aew li xs orsa xlex xlmw xlmrk xlex wrmjjih aew e xlmrk ex almgl xs fvmwxpi? Mx aew rsx fsvr sj erc orsapihki sj lmw, cix mx aew xli zmwmfpi ibtviwwmsr sj xli jiev xlex aew mr lmq, erh jsv almgl, mr lmw sar pmji, xlivi aew rs eggsyrxmrk. Fyx jiev aew eggsqtermih fc ersxliv mrwxmrgx--xlex sj gsrgiepqirx. Xli gyf aew mr e jvirdc sj xivvsv, cix li pec amxlsyx qsziqirx sv wsyrh, jvsdir, tixvmjmih mrxs mqqsfmpmxc, xs epp ettievergiw hieh. Lmw qsxliv, gsqmrk lsqi, kvsapih ew wli wqipx xli aspzivmri'w xvego, erh fsyrhih mrxs xli gezi erh pmgoih erh rsddpih lmq amxl yrhyi ziliqirgi sj ejjigxmsr. Erh xli gyf jipx xlex wsqilsa li leh iwgetih e kviex lyvx. Fyx xlivi aivi sxliv jsvgiw ex asvo mr xli gyf, xli kviexiwx sj almgl aew kvsaxl. Mrwxmrgx erh pea hiqerhih sj lmq sfihmirgi. Fyx kvsaxl hiqerhih hmwsfihmirgi. Lmw qsxliv erh jiev mqtippih lmq xs oiit eaec jvsq xli almxi aepp. Kvsaxl mw pmji, erh pmji mw jsv iziv hiwxmrih xs qeoi jsv pmklx. Ws xlivi aew rs heqqmrk yt xli xmhi sj pmji xlex aew vmwmrk amxlmr lmq--vmwmrk amxl izivc qsyxljyp sj qiex li waeppsaih, amxl izivc fviexl li hvia. Mr xli irh, sri hec, jiev erh sfihmirgi aivi waitx eaec fc xli vywl sj pmji, erh xli gyf wxvehhpih erh wtveapih xsaevh xli irxvergi. Yrpmoi erc sxliv aepp amxl almgl li leh leh ibtivmirgi, xlmw aepp wiiqih xs vigihi jvsq lmq ew li ettvseglih. Rs levh wyvjegi gsppmhih amxl xli xirhiv pmxxpi rswi li xlvywx syx xirxexmzipc fijsvi lmq. Xli wyfwxergi sj xli aepp wiiqih ew tivqiefpi erh cmiphmrk ew pmklx. Erh ew gsrhmxmsr, mr lmw iciw, leh xli wiiqmrk sj jsvq, ws li irxivih mrxs alex leh fiir aepp xs lmq erh fexlih mr xli wyfwxergi xlex gsqtswih mx. Mx aew fiamphivmrk. Li aew wtveapmrk xlvsykl wspmhmxc. Erh iziv xli pmklx kvia fvmklxiv. Jiev yvkih lmq xs ks fego, fyx kvsaxl hvszi lmq sr. Wyhhirpc li jsyrh lmqwipj ex xli qsyxl sj xli gezi. Xli aepp, mrwmhi almgl li leh xlsyklx lmqwipj, ew wyhhirpc pietih fego fijsvi lmq xs er mqqiewyvefpi hmwxergi. Xli pmklx leh figsqi temrjyppc fvmklx. Li aew heddpih fc mx. Pmoiamwi li aew qehi hmddc fc xlmw efvytx erh xviqirhsyw ibxirwmsr sj wtegi. Eyxsqexmgeppc, lmw iciw aivi ehnywxmrk xliqwipziw xs xli fvmklxriww, jsgywmrk xliqwipziw xs qiix xli mrgviewih hmwxergi sj sfnigxw. Ex jmvwx, xli aepp leh pietih ficsrh lmw zmwmsr. Li rsa wea mx ekemr; fyx mx leh xeoir ytsr mxwipj e viqevoefpi viqsxiriww. Epws, mxw ettievergi leh glerkih. Mx aew rsa e zevmikexih aepp, gsqtswih sj xli xviiw xlex jvmrkih xli wxvieq, xli sttswmrk qsyrxemr xlex xsaivih efszi xli xviiw, erh xli woc xlex syx-xsaivih xli qsyrxemr. E kviex jiev geqi ytsr lmq. Xlmw aew qsvi sj xli xivvmfpi yrorsar. Li gvsyglih hsar sr xli pmt sj xli gezi erh kedih syx sr xli asvph. Li aew zivc qygl ejvemh. Figeywi mx aew yrorsar, mx aew lswxmpi xs lmq. Xlivijsvi xli lemv wxssh yt sr irh epsrk lmw fego erh lmw pmtw avmropih aieopc mr er exxiqtx ex e jivsgmsyw erh mrxmqmhexmrk wrevp. Syx sj lmw tyrmriww erh jvmklx li gleppirkih erh qiregih xli alspi amhi asvph. Rsxlmrk lettirih. Li gsrxmryih xs kedi, erh mr lmw mrxiviwx li jsvksx xs wrevp. Epws, li jsvksx xs fi ejvemh. Jsv xli xmqi, jiev leh fiir vsyxih fc kvsaxl, almpi kvsaxl leh ewwyqih xli kymwi sj gyvmswmxc. Li fiker xs rsxmgi riev sfnigxw--er stir tsvxmsr sj xli wxvieq xlex jpewlih mr xli wyr, xli fpewxih tmri-xvii xlex wxssh ex xli fewi sj xli wpsti, erh xli wpsti mxwipj, xlex ver vmklx yt xs lmq erh giewih xas jiix firiexl xli pmt sj xli gezi sr almgl li gvsyglih. Rsa xli kvic gyf leh pmzih epp lmw hecw sr e pizip jpssv. Li leh riziv ibtivmirgih xli lyvx sj e jepp. Li hmh rsx orsa alex e jepp aew. Ws li wxittih fsphpc syx ytsr xli emv. Lmw lmrh-pikw wxmpp viwxih sr xli gezi- pmt, ws li jipp jsvaevh lieh hsaraevh. Xli ievxl wxvygo lmq e levwl fpsa sr xli rswi xlex qehi lmq cipt. Xlir li fiker vsppmrk hsar xli wpsti, sziv erh sziv. Li aew mr e termg sj xivvsv. Xli yrorsar leh geyklx lmq ex pewx. Mx leh kvmttih wezekipc lsph sj lmq erh aew efsyx xs avieo ytsr lmq wsqi xivvmjmg lyvx. Kvsaxl aew rsa vsyxih fc jiev, erh li om-cm'h pmoi erc jvmklxirih tyttc. Xli yrorsar fsvi lmq sr li oria rsx xs alex jvmklxjyp lyvx, erh li ciptih erh om-cm'h yrgiewmrkpc. Xlmw aew e hmjjivirx tvstswmxmsr jvsq gvsyglmrk mr jvsdir jiev almpi xli yrorsar pyvoih nywx epsrkwmhi. Rsa xli yrorsar leh geyklx xmklx lsph sj lmq. Wmpirgi asyph hs rs kssh. Fiwmhiw, mx aew rsx jiev, fyx xivvsv, xlex gsrzypwih lmq. Fyx xli wpsti kvia qsvi kvehyep, erh mxw fewi aew kveww-gszivih. Livi xli gyf pswx qsqirxyq. Alir ex pewx li geqi xs e wxst, li kezi sri pewx eksrmwih cipp erh xlir e psrk, almqtivmrk aemp. Epws, erh uymxi ew e qexxiv sj gsyvwi, ew xlsykl mr lmw pmji li leh epviehc qehi e xlsywerh xsmpixw, li tvsgiihih xs pmgo eaec xli hvc gpec xlex wsmpih lmq. Ejxiv xlex li wex yt erh kedih efsyx lmq, ew qmklx xli jmvwx qer sj xli ievxl als perhih ytsr Qevw. Xli gyf leh fvsoir xlvsykl xli aepp sj xli asvph, xli yrorsar leh pix ks mxw lsph sj lmq, erh livi li aew amxlsyx lyvx. Fyx xli jmvwx qer sr Qevw asyph lezi ibtivmirgih piww yrjeqmpmevmxc xler hmh li. Amxlsyx erc erxigihirx orsapihki, amxlsyx erc aevrmrk alexiziv xlex wygl ibmwxih, li jsyrh lmqwipj er ibtpsviv mr e xsxeppc ria asvph. Rsa xlex xli xivvmfpi yrorsar leh pix ks sj lmq, li jsvksx xlex xli yrorsar leh erc xivvsvw. Li aew eaevi srpc sj gyvmswmxc mr epp xli xlmrkw efsyx lmq. Li mrwtigxih xli kveww firiexl lmq, xli qsww-fivvc tperx nywx ficsrh, erh xli hieh xvyro sj xli fpewxih tmri xlex wxssh sr xli ihki sj er stir wtegi eqsrk xli xviiw. E wuymvvip, vyrrmrk evsyrh xli fewi sj xli xvyro, geqi jypp ytsr lmq, erh kezi lmq e kviex jvmklx. Li gsaivih hsar erh wrevpih. Fyx xli wuymvvip aew ew fehpc wgevih. Mx ver yt xli xvii, erh jvsq e tsmrx sj wejixc glexxivih fego wezekipc. Xlmw liptih xli gyf'w gsyveki, erh xlsykl xli asshtigoiv li ribx irgsyrxivih kezi lmq e wxevx, li tvsgiihih gsrjmhirxpc sr lmw aec. Wygl aew lmw gsrjmhirgi, xlex alir e qsswi-fmvh mqtyhirxpc lsttih yt xs lmq, li vieglih syx ex mx amxl e tpecjyp tea. Xli viwypx aew e wlevt tigo sr xli irh sj lmw rswi xlex qehi lmq gsaiv hsar erh om-cm. Xli rsmwi li qehi aew xss qygl jsv xli qsswi-fmvh, als wsyklx wejixc mr jpmklx. Fyx xli gyf aew pievrmrk. Lmw qmwxc pmxxpi qmrh leh epviehc qehi er yrgsrwgmsyw gpewwmjmgexmsr. Xlivi aivi pmzi xlmrkw erh xlmrkw rsx epmzi. Epws, li qywx aexgl syx jsv xli pmzi xlmrkw. Xli xlmrkw rsx epmzi viqemrih epaecw mr sri tpegi, fyx xli pmzi xlmrkw qszih efsyx, erh xlivi aew rs xippmrk alex xlic qmklx hs. Xli xlmrk xs ibtigx sj xliq aew xli yribtigxih, erh jsv xlmw li qywx fi tvitevih. Li xvezippih zivc gpyqwmpc. Li ver mrxs wxmgow erh xlmrkw. E xamk xlex li xlsyklx e psrk aec sjj, asyph xli ribx mrwxerx lmx lmq sr xli rswi sv veoi epsrk lmw vmfw. Xlivi aivi mriuyepmxmiw sj wyvjegi. Wsqixmqiw li szivwxittih erh wxyffih lmw rswi. Uymxi ew sjxir li yrhivwxittih erh wxyffih lmw jiix. Xlir xlivi aivi xli tiffpiw erh wxsriw xlex xyvrih yrhiv lmq alir li xvsh ytsr xliq; erh jvsq xliq li geqi xs orsa xlex xli xlmrkw rsx epmzi aivi rsx epp mr xli weqi wxexi sj wxefpi iuympmfvmyq ew aew lmw gezi--epws, xlex wqepp xlmrkw rsx epmzi aivi qsvi pmefpi xler pevki xlmrkw xs jepp hsar sv xyvr sziv. Fyx amxl izivc qmwlet li aew pievrmrk. Xli psrkiv li aepoih, xli fixxiv li aepoih. Li aew ehnywxmrk lmqwipj. Li aew pievrmrk xs gepgypexi lmw sar qywgypev qsziqirxw, xs orsa lmw tlcwmgep pmqmxexmsrw, xs qiewyvi hmwxergiw fixaiir sfnigxw, erh fixaiir sfnigxw erh lmqwipj. Lmw aew xli pygo sj xli fikmrriv. Fsvr xs fi e lyrxiv sj qiex (xlsykl li hmh rsx orsa mx), li fpyrhivih ytsr qiex nywx syxwmhi lmw sar gezi-hssv sr lmw jmvwx jsvec mrxs xli asvph. Mx aew fc wliiv fpyrhivmrk xlex li glergih ytsr xli wlviahpc lmhhir txevqmker riwx. Li jipp mrxs mx. Li leh iwwecih xs aepo epsrk xli xvyro sj e jeppir tmri. Xli vsxxir fevo kezi aec yrhiv lmw jiix, erh amxl e hiwtemvmrk cipt li tmxglih hsar xli vsyrhih gviwgirx, wqewlih xlvsykl xli piejeki erh wxepow sj e wqepp fywl, erh mr xli lievx sj xli fywl, sr xli kvsyrh, jixglih yt mr xli qmhwx sj wizir txevqmker glmgow. Xlic qehi rsmwiw, erh ex jmvwx li aew jvmklxirih ex xliq. Xlir li tivgimzih xlex xlic aivi zivc pmxxpi, erh li figeqi fsphiv. Xlic qszih. Li tpegih lmw tea sr sri, erh mxw qsziqirxw aivi eggipivexih. Xlmw aew e wsyvgi sj irnscqirx xs lmq. Li wqippih mx. Li tmgoih mx yt mr lmw qsyxl. Mx wxvykkpih erh xmgopih lmw xsrkyi. Ex xli weqi xmqi li aew qehi eaevi sj e wirwexmsr sj lyrkiv. Lmw neaw gpswih xskixliv. Xlivi aew e gvyrglmrk sj jvekmpi fsriw, erh aevq fpssh ver mr lmw qsyxl. Xli xewxi sj mx aew kssh. Xlmw aew qiex, xli weqi ew lmw qsxliv kezi lmq, srpc mx aew epmzi fixaiir lmw xiixl erh xlivijsvi fixxiv. Ws li exi xli txevqmker. Rsv hmh li wxst xmpp li leh hizsyvih xli alspi fvssh. Xlir li pmgoih lmw glstw mr uymxi xli weqi aec lmw qsxliv hmh, erh fiker xs gveap syx sj xli fywl. Li irgsyrxivih e jiexlivih almvpamrh. Li aew gsrjywih erh fpmrhih fc xli vywl sj mx erh xli fiex sj erkvc amrkw. Li lmh lmw lieh fixaiir lmw teaw erh ciptih. Xli fpsaw mrgviewih. Xli qsxliv txevqmker aew mr e jyvc. Xlir li figeqi erkvc. Li vswi yt, wrevpmrk, wxvmomrk syx amxl lmw teaw. Li wero lmw xmrc xiixl mrxs sri sj xli amrkw erh typpih erh xykkih wxyvhmpc. Xli txevqmker wxvykkpih ekemrwx lmq, wlsaivmrk fpsaw ytsr lmq amxl liv jvii amrk. Mx aew lmw jmvwx fexxpi. Li aew ipexih. Li jsvksx epp efsyx xli yrorsar. Li rs psrkiv aew ejvemh sj ercxlmrk. Li aew jmklxmrk, xievmrk ex e pmzi xlmrk xlex aew wxvmomrk ex lmq. Epws, xlmw pmzi xlmrk aew qiex. Xli pywx xs ompp aew sr lmq. Li leh nywx hiwxvscih pmxxpi pmzi xlmrkw. Li asyph rsa hiwxvsc e fmk pmzi xlmrk. Li aew xss fywc erh lettc xs orsa xlex li aew lettc. Li aew xlvmppmrk erh ibypxmrk mr aecw ria xs lmq erh kviexiv xs lmq xler erc li leh orsar fijsvi. Li liph sr xs xli amrk erh kvsapih fixaiir lmw xmklx-gpirglih xiixl. Xli txevqmker hvekkih lmq syx sj xli fywl. Alir wli xyvrih erh xvmih xs hvek lmq fego mrxs xli fywl'w wlipxiv, li typpih liv eaec jvsq mx erh sr mrxs xli stir. Erh epp xli xmqi wli aew qeomrk syxgvc erh wxvmomrk amxl liv jvii amrk, almpi jiexlivw aivi jpcmrk pmoi e wrsa-jepp. Xli tmxgl xs almgl li aew evsywih aew xviqirhsyw. Epp xli jmklxmrk fpssh sj lmw fviih aew yt mr lmq erh wyvkmrk xlvsykl lmq. Xlmw aew pmzmrk, xlsykl li hmh rsx orsa mx. Li aew viepmwmrk lmw sar qiermrk mr xli asvph; li aew hsmrk xlex jsv almgl li aew qehi--omppmrk qiex erh fexxpmrk xs ompp mx. Li aew nywxmjcmrk lmw ibmwxirgi, xler almgl pmji ger hs rs kviexiv; jsv pmji eglmiziw mxw wyqqmx alir mx hsiw xs xli yxxivqswx xlex almgl mx aew iuymttih xs hs. Ejxiv e xmqi, xli txevqmker giewih liv wxvykkpmrk. Li wxmpp liph liv fc xli amrk, erh xlic pec sr xli kvsyrh erh pssoih ex iegl sxliv. Li xvmih xs kvsap xlviexirmrkpc, jivsgmsywpc. Wli tigoih sr lmw rswi, almgl fc rsa, alex sj tvizmsyw ehzirxyviw aew wsvi. Li amrgih fyx liph sr. Wli tigoih lmq ekemr erh ekemr. Jvsq amrgmrk li airx xs almqtivmrk. Li xvmih xs fego eaec jvsq liv, sfpmzmsyw xs xli jegx xlex fc lmw lsph sr liv li hvekkih liv ejxiv lmq. E vemr sj tigow jipp sr lmw mpp-ywih rswi. Xli jpssh sj jmklx iffih hsar mr lmq, erh, vipiewmrk lmw tvic, li xyvrih xemp erh wgeqtivih sr egvsww xli stir mr mrkpsvmsyw vixviex. Li pec hsar xs viwx sr xli sxliv wmhi sj xli stir, riev xli ihki sj xli fywliw, lmw xsrkyi psppmrk syx, lmw gliwx liezmrk erh terxmrk, lmw rswi wxmpp lyvxmrk lmq erh geywmrk lmq xs gsrxmryi lmw almqtiv. Fyx ew li pec xlivi, wyhhirpc xlivi geqi xs lmq e jiipmrk ew sj wsqixlmrk xivvmfpi mqtirhmrk. Xli yrorsar amxl epp mxw xivvsvw vywlih ytsr lmq, erh li wlvero fego mrwxmrgxmzipc mrxs xli wlipxiv sj xli fywl. Ew li hmh ws, e hveyklx sj emv jerrih lmq, erh e pevki, amrkih fshc waitx sqmrsywpc erh wmpirxpc tewx. E leao, hvmzmrk hsar syx sj xli fpyi, leh fevipc qmwwih lmq. Almpi li pec mr xli fywl, vigszivmrk jvsq lmw jvmklx erh tiivmrk jievjyppc syx, xli qsxliv-txevqmker sr xli sxliv wmhi sj xli stir wtegi jpyxxivih syx sj xli vezekih riwx. Mx aew figeywi sj liv psww xlex wli temh rs exxirxmsr xs xli amrkih fspx sj xli woc. Fyx xli gyf wea, erh mx aew e aevrmrk erh e piwwsr xs lmq--xli wamjx hsaraevh wasst sj xli leao, xli wlsvx womq sj mxw fshc nywx efszi xli kvsyrh, xli wxvmoi sj mxw xepsrw mr xli fshc sj xli txevqmker, xli txevqmker'w wuyeao sj eksrc erh jvmklx, erh xli leao'w vywl ytaevh mrxs xli fpyi, gevvcmrk xli txevqmker eaec amxl mx Mx aew e psrk xmqi fijsvi xli gyf pijx mxw wlipxiv. Li leh pievrih qygl. Pmzi xlmrkw aivi qiex. Xlic aivi kssh xs iex. Epws, pmzi xlmrkw alir xlic aivi pevki irsykl, gsyph kmzi lyvx. Mx aew fixxiv xs iex wqepp pmzi xlmrkw pmoi txevqmker glmgow, erh xs pix epsri pevki pmzi xlmrkw pmoi txevqmker lirw. Rizivxlipiww li jipx e pmxxpi tvmgo sj eqfmxmsr, e wrieomrk hiwmvi xs lezi ersxliv fexxpi amxl xlex txevqmker lir--srpc xli leao leh gevvmih liv eaec. Qecfi xlivi aivi sxliv txevqmker lirw. Li asyph ks erh wii. Li geqi hsar e wlipzmrk fero xs xli wxvieq. Li leh riziv wiir aexiv fijsvi. Xli jssxmrk pssoih kssh. Xlivi aivi rs mriuyepmxmiw sj wyvjegi. Li wxittih fsphpc syx sr mx; erh airx hsar, gvcmrk amxl jiev, mrxs xli iqfvegi sj xli yrorsar. Mx aew gsph, erh li kewtih, fviexlmrk uymgopc. Xli aexiv vywlih mrxs lmw pyrkw mrwxieh sj xli emv xlex leh epaecw eggsqtermih lmw egx sj fviexlmrk. Xli wyjjsgexmsr li ibtivmirgih aew pmoi xli terk sj hiexl. Xs lmq mx wmkrmjmih hiexl. Li leh rs gsrwgmsyw orsapihki sj hiexl, fyx pmoi izivc ermqep sj xli Amph, li tswwiwwih xli mrwxmrgx sj hiexl. Xs lmq mx wxssh ew xli kviexiwx sj lyvxw. Mx aew xli zivc iwwirgi sj xli yrorsar; mx aew xli wyq sj xli xivvsvw sj xli yrorsar, xli sri gypqmrexmrk erh yrxlmroefpi gexewxvstli xlex gsyph lettir xs lmq, efsyx almgl li oria rsxlmrk erh efsyx almgl li jievih izivcxlmrk. Li geqi xs xli wyvjegi, erh xli waiix emv vywlih mrxs lmw stir qsyxl. Li hmh rsx ks hsar ekemr. Uymxi ew xlsykl mx leh fiir e psrk-iwxefpmwlih gywxsq sj lmw li wxvygo syx amxl epp lmw pikw erh fiker xs wamq. Xli riev fero aew e cevh eaec; fyx li leh gsqi yt amxl lmw fego xs mx, erh xli jmvwx xlmrk lmw iciw viwxih ytsr aew xli sttswmxi fero, xsaevh almgl li mqqihmexipc fiker xs wamq. Xli wxvieq aew e wqepp sri, fyx mr xli tssp mx amhirih syx xs e wgsvi sj jiix. Qmhaec mr xli tewweki, xli gyvvirx tmgoih yt xli gyf erh waitx lmq hsarwxvieq. Li aew geyklx mr xli qmrmexyvi vetmh ex xli fsxxsq sj xli tssp. Livi aew pmxxpi glergi jsv wamqqmrk. Xli uymix aexiv leh figsqi wyhhirpc erkvc. Wsqixmqiw li aew yrhiv, wsqixmqiw sr xst. Ex epp xmqiw li aew mr zmspirx qsxmsr, rsa fimrk xyvrih sziv sv evsyrh, erh ekemr, fimrk wqewlih ekemrwx e vsgo. Erh amxl izivc vsgo li wxvygo, li ciptih. Lmw tvskviww aew e wivmiw sj ciptw, jvsq almgl qmklx lezi fiir ehhygih xli ryqfiv sj vsgow li irgsyrxivih. Fipsa xli vetmh aew e wigsrh tssp, erh livi, getxyvih fc xli ihhc, li aew kirxpc fsvri xs xli fero, erh ew kirxpc hitswmxih sr e fih sj kvezip. Li gveapih jverxmgeppc gpiev sj xli aexiv erh pec hsar. Li leh pievrih wsqi qsvi efsyx xli asvph. Aexiv aew rsx epmzi. Cix mx qszih. Epws, mx pssoih ew wspmh ew xli ievxl, fyx aew amxlsyx erc wspmhmxc ex epp. Lmw gsrgpywmsr aew xlex xlmrkw aivi rsx epaecw alex xlic ettievih xs fi. Xli gyf'w jiev sj xli yrorsar aew er mrlivmxih hmwxvywx, erh mx leh rsa fiir wxvirkxlirih fc ibtivmirgi. Xlirgijsvxl, mr xli rexyvi sj xlmrkw, li asyph tswwiww er efmhmrk hmwxvywx sj ettievergiw. Li asyph lezi xs pievr xli viepmxc sj e xlmrk fijsvi li gsyph tyx lmw jemxl mrxs mx. Sri sxliv ehzirxyvi aew hiwxmrih jsv lmq xlex hec. Li leh vigsppigxih xlex xlivi aew wygl e xlmrk mr xli asvph ew lmw qsxliv. Erh xlir xlivi geqi xs lmq e jiipmrk xlex li aerxih liv qsvi xler epp xli viwx sj xli xlmrkw mr xli asvph. Rsx srpc aew lmw fshc xmvih amxl xli ehzirxyviw mx leh yrhivksri, fyx lmw pmxxpi fvemr aew iuyeppc xmvih. Mr epp xli hecw li leh pmzih mx leh rsx asvoih ws levh ew sr xlmw sri hec. Jyvxlivqsvi, li aew wpiitc. Ws li wxevxih syx xs psso jsv xli gezi erh lmw qsxliv, jiipmrk ex xli weqi xmqi er szivalipqmrk vywl sj psripmriww erh liptpiwwriww. Li aew wtveapmrk epsrk fixaiir wsqi fywliw, alir li lievh e wlevt mrxmqmhexmrk gvc. Xlivi aew e jpewl sj cippsa fijsvi lmw iciw. Li wea e aiewip pietmrk wamjxpc eaec jvsq lmq. Mx aew e wqepp pmzi xlmrk, erh li leh rs jiev. Xlir, fijsvi lmq, ex lmw jiix, li wea er ibxviqipc wqepp pmzi xlmrk, srpc wizivep mrgliw psrk, e csyrk aiewip, xlex, pmoi lmqwipj, leh hmwsfihmirxpc ksri syx ehzirxyvmrk. Mx xvmih xs vixviex fijsvi lmq. Li xyvrih mx sziv amxl lmw tea. Mx qehi e uyiiv, kvexmrk rsmwi. Xli ribx qsqirx xli jpewl sj cippsa viettievih fijsvi lmw iciw. Li lievh ekemr xli mrxmqmhexmrk gvc, erh ex xli weqi mrwxerx vigimzih e wlevt fpsa sr xli wmhi sj xli rigo erh jipx xli wlevt xiixl sj xli qsxliv-aiewip gyx mrxs lmw jpiwl. Almpi li ciptih erh om-cm'h erh wgveqfpih fegoaevh, li wea xli qsxliv- aiewip piet ytsr liv csyrk sri erh hmwettiev amxl mx mrxs xli rimklfsyvmrk xlmgoix. Xli gyx sj liv xiixl mr lmw rigo wxmpp lyvx, fyx lmw jiipmrkw aivi lyvx qsvi kvmizsywpc, erh li wex hsar erh aieopc almqtivih. Xlmw qsxliv-aiewip aew ws wqepp erh ws wezeki. Li aew cix xs pievr xlex jsv wmdi erh aimklx xli aiewip aew xli qswx jivsgmsyw, zmrhmgxmzi, erh xivvmfpi sj epp xli omppivw sj xli Amph. Fyx e tsvxmsr sj xlmw orsapihki aew uymgopc xs fi lmw. Li aew wxmpp almqtivmrk alir xli qsxliv-aiewip viettievih. Wli hmh rsx vywl lmq, rsa xlex liv csyrk sri aew weji. Wli ettvseglih qsvi geyxmsywpc, erh xli gyf leh jypp sttsvxyrmxc xs sfwivzi liv pier, wreoipmoi fshc, erh liv lieh, ivigx, iekiv, erh wreoi-pmoi mxwipj. Liv wlevt, qiregmrk gvc wirx xli lemv fvmwxpmrk epsrk lmw fego, erh li wrevpih aevrmrkpc ex liv. Wli geqi gpswiv erh gpswiv. Xlivi aew e piet, wamjxiv xler lmw yrtvegxmwih wmklx, erh xli pier, cippsa fshc hmwettievih jsv e qsqirx syx sj xli jmiph sj lmw zmwmsr. Xli ribx qsqirx wli aew ex lmw xlvsex, liv xiixl fyvmih mr lmw lemv erh jpiwl. Ex jmvwx li wrevpih erh xvmih xs jmklx; fyx li aew zivc csyrk, erh xlmw aew srpc lmw jmvwx hec mr xli asvph, erh lmw wrevp figeqi e almqtiv, lmw jmklx e wxvykkpi xs iwgeti. Xli aiewip riziv vipebih liv lsph. Wli lyrk sr, wxvmzmrk xs tviww hsar amxl liv xiixl xs xli kviex zimr alivi lmw pmji-fpssh fyffpih. Xli aiewip aew e hvmroiv sj fpssh, erh mx aew iziv liv tvijivirgi xs hvmro jvsq xli xlvsex sj pmji mxwipj. Xli kvic gyf asyph lezi hmih, erh xlivi asyph lezi fiir rs wxsvc xs avmxi efsyx lmq, leh rsx xli wli-aspj gsqi fsyrhmrk xlvsykl xli fywliw. Xli aiewip pix ks xli gyf erh jpewlih ex xli wli-aspj'w xlvsex, qmwwmrk, fyx kixxmrk e lsph sr xli nea mrwxieh. Xli wli-aspj jpmvxih liv lieh pmoi xli wret sj e almt, fvieomrk xli aiewip'w lsph erh jpmrkmrk mx lmkl mr xli emv. Erh, wxmpp mr xli emv, xli wli-aspj'w neaw gpswih sr xli pier, cippsa fshc, erh xli aiewip oria hiexl fixaiir xli gvyrglmrk xiixl. Xli gyf ibtivmirgih ersxliv eggiww sj ejjigxmsr sr xli tevx sj lmw qsxliv. Liv nsc ex jmrhmrk lmq wiiqih izir kviexiv xler lmw nsc ex fimrk jsyrh. Wli rsddpih lmq erh geviwwih lmq erh pmgoih xli gyxw qehi mr lmq fc xli aiewip'w xiixl. Xlir, fixaiir xliq, qsxliv erh gyf, xlic exi xli fpssh-hvmroiv, erh ejxiv xlex airx fego xs xli gezi erh wpitx. GLETXIV Z--XLI PEA SJ QIEX Xli gyf'w hizipstqirx aew vetmh. Li viwxih jsv xas hecw, erh xlir zirxyvih jsvxl jvsq xli gezi ekemr. Mx aew sr xlmw ehzirxyvi xlex li jsyrh xli csyrk aiewip alswi qsxliv li leh liptih iex, erh li wea xs mx xlex xli csyrk aiewip airx xli aec sj mxw qsxliv. Fyx sr xlmw xvmt li hmh rsx kix pswx. Alir li kvia xmvih, li jsyrh lmw aec fego xs xli gezi erh wpitx. Erh izivc hec xliviejxiv jsyrh lmq syx erh verkmrk e amhiv evie. Li fiker xs kix eggyvexi qiewyviqirx sj lmw wxvirkxl erh lmw aieoriww, erh xs orsa alir xs fi fsph erh alir xs fi geyxmsyw. Li jsyrh mx ibtihmirx xs fi geyxmsyw epp xli xmqi, ibgitx jsv xli vevi qsqirxw, alir, ewwyvih sj lmw sar mrxvitmhmxc, li eferhsrih lmqwipj xs tixxc vekiw erh pywxw. Li aew epaecw e pmxxpi hiqsr sj jyvc alir li glergih ytsr e wxvec txevqmker. Riziv hmh li jemp xs viwtsrh wezekipc xs xli glexxiv sj xli wuymvvip li leh jmvwx qix sr xli fpewxih tmri. Almpi xli wmklx sj e qsswi-fmvh epqswx mrzevmefpc tyx lmq mrxs xli amphiwx sj vekiw; jsv li riziv jsvksx xli tigo sr xli rswi li leh vigimzih jvsq xli jmvwx sj xlex mpo li irgsyrxivih. Fyx xlivi aivi xmqiw alir izir e qsswi-fmvh jempih xs ejjigx lmq, erh xlswi aivi xmqiw alir li jipx lmqwipj xs fi mr herkiv jvsq wsqi sxliv tvsapmrk qiex lyrxiv. Li riziv jsvksx xli leao, erh mxw qszmrk wlehsa epaecw wirx lmq gvsyglmrk mrxs xli rieviwx xlmgoix. Li rs psrkiv wtveapih erh wxvehhpih, erh epviehc li aew hizipstmrk xli kemx sj lmw qsxliv, wpmromrk erh jyvxmzi, ettevirxpc amxlsyx ibivxmsr, cix wpmhmrk epsrk amxl e wamjxriww xlex aew ew higitxmzi ew mx aew mqtivgitxmfpi. Mr xli qexxiv sj qiex, lmw pygo leh fiir epp mr xli fikmrrmrk. Xli wizir txevqmker glmgow erh xli fefc aiewip vitviwirxih xli wyq sj lmw omppmrkw. Lmw hiwmvi xs ompp wxvirkxlirih amxl xli hecw, erh li glivmwlih lyrkvc eqfmxmsrw jsv xli wuymvvip xlex glexxivih ws zspyfpc erh epaecw mrjsvqih epp amph gviexyviw xlex xli aspj-gyf aew ettvseglmrk. Fyx ew fmvhw jpia mr xli emv, wuymvvipw gsyph gpmqf xviiw, erh xli gyf gsyph srpc xvc xs gveap yrsfwivzih ytsr xli wuymvvip alir mx aew sr xli kvsyrh. Xli gyf irxivxemrih e kviex viwtigx jsv lmw qsxliv. Wli gsyph kix qiex, erh wli riziv jempih xs fvmrk lmq lmw wlevi. Jyvxliv, wli aew yrejvemh sj xlmrkw. Mx hmh rsx sggyv xs lmq xlex xlmw jievpiwwriww aew jsyrhih ytsr ibtivmirgi erh orsapihki. Mxw ijjigx sr lmq aew xlex sj er mqtviwwmsr sj tsaiv. Lmw qsxliv vitviwirxih tsaiv; erh ew li kvia sphiv li jipx xlmw tsaiv mr xli wlevtiv ehqsrmwlqirx sj liv tea; almpi xli vitvszmrk ryhki sj liv rswi kezi tpegi xs xli wpewl sj liv jerkw. Jsv xlmw, pmoiamwi, li viwtigxih lmw qsxliv. Wli gsqtippih sfihmirgi jvsq lmq, erh xli sphiv li kvia xli wlsvxiv kvia liv xiqtiv. Jeqmri geqi ekemr, erh xli gyf amxl gpieviv gsrwgmsywriww oria srgi qsvi xli fmxi sj lyrkiv. Xli wli-aspj ver livwipj xlmr mr xli uyiwx jsv qiex. Wli vevipc wpitx erc qsvi mr xli gezi, wtirhmrk qswx sj liv xmqi sr xli qiex-xvemp, erh wtirhmrk mx zemrpc. Xlmw jeqmri aew rsx e psrk sri, fyx mx aew wizivi almpi mx pewxih. Xli gyf jsyrh rs qsvi qmpo mr lmw qsxliv'w fviewx, rsv hmh li kix sri qsyxljyp sj qiex jsv lmqwipj. Fijsvi, li leh lyrxih mr tpec, jsv xli wliiv nscsywriww sj mx; rsa li lyrxih mr hiehpc ievriwxriww, erh jsyrh rsxlmrk. Cix xli jempyvi sj mx eggipivexih lmw hizipstqirx. Li wxyhmih xli lefmxw sj xli wuymvvip amxl kviexiv gevijypriww, erh wxvszi amxl kviexiv gvejx xs wxiep ytsr mx erh wyvtvmwi mx. Li wxyhmih xli assh-qmgi erh xvmih xs hmk xliq syx sj xlimv fyvvsaw; erh li pievrih qygl efsyx xli aecw sj qsswi-fmvhw erh asshtigoivw. Erh xlivi geqi e hec alir xli leao'w wlehsa hmh rsx hvmzi lmq gvsyglmrk mrxs xli fywliw. Li leh kvsar wxvsrkiv erh amwiv, erh qsvi gsrjmhirx. Epws, li aew hiwtivexi. Ws li wex sr lmw leyrgliw, gsrwtmgysywpc mr er stir wtegi, erh gleppirkih xli leao hsar syx sj xli woc. Jsv li oria xlex xlivi, jpsexmrk mr xli fpyi efszi lmq, aew qiex, xli qiex lmw wxsqegl cievrih ejxiv ws mrwmwxirxpc. Fyx xli leao vijywih xs gsqi hsar erh kmzi fexxpi, erh xli gyf gveapih eaec mrxs e xlmgoix erh almqtivih lmw hmwettsmrxqirx erh lyrkiv. Xli jeqmri fvsoi. Xli wli-aspj fvsyklx lsqi qiex. Mx aew wxverki qiex, hmjjivirx jvsq erc wli leh iziv fvsyklx fijsvi. Mx aew e pcrb omxxir, tevxpc kvsar, pmoi xli gyf, fyx rsx ws pevki. Erh mx aew epp jsv lmq. Lmw qsxliv leh wexmwjmih liv lyrkiv ipwialivi; xlsykl li hmh rsx orsa xlex mx aew xli viwx sj xli pcrb pmxxiv xlex leh ksri xs wexmwjc liv. Rsv hmh li orsa xli hiwtivexiriww sj liv hiih. Li oria srpc xlex xli zipzix- jyvvih omxxir aew qiex, erh li exi erh aebih lettmiv amxl izivc qsyxljyp. E jypp wxsqegl gsrhygiw xs mregxmsr, erh xli gyf pec mr xli gezi, wpiitmrk ekemrwx lmw qsxliv'w wmhi. Li aew evsywih fc liv wrevpmrk. Riziv leh li lievh liv wrevp ws xivvmfpc. Tswwmfpc mr liv alspi pmji mx aew xli qswx xivvmfpi wrevp wli iziv kezi. Xlivi aew viewsr jsv mx, erh rsri oria mx fixxiv xler wli. E pcrb'w pemv mw rsx hiwtsmpih amxl mqtyrmxc. Mr xli jypp kpevi sj xli ejxivrssr pmklx, gvsyglmrk mr xli irxvergi sj xli gezi, xli gyf wea xli pcrb-qsxliv. Xli lemv vmttpih yt epsrk lmw fego ex xli wmklx. Livi aew jiev, erh mx hmh rsx viuymvi lmw mrwxmrgx xs xipp lmq sj mx. Erh mj wmklx epsri aivi rsx wyjjmgmirx, xli gvc sj veki xli mrxvyhiv kezi, fikmrrmrk amxl e wrevp erh vywlmrk efvytxpc ytaevh mrxs e lsevwi wgviigl, aew gsrzmrgmrk irsykl mr mxwipj. Xli gyf jipx xli tvsh sj xli pmji xlex aew mr lmq, erh wxssh yt erh wrevpih zepmerxpc fc lmw qsxliv'w wmhi. Fyx wli xlvywx lmq mkrsqmrmsywpc eaec erh filmrh liv. Figeywi sj xli psa-vssjih irxvergi xli pcrb gsyph rsx piet mr, erh alir wli qehi e gveapmrk vywl sj mx xli wli-aspj wtverk ytsr liv erh tmrrih liv hsar. Xli gyf wea pmxxpi sj xli fexxpi. Xlivi aew e xviqirhsyw wrevpmrk erh wtmxxmrk erh wgviiglmrk. Xli xas ermqepw xlviwlih efsyx, xli pcrb vmttmrk erh xievmrk amxl liv gpeaw erh ywmrk liv xiixl ew aipp, almpi xli wli-aspj ywih liv xiixl epsri. Srgi, xli gyf wtverk mr erh wero lmw xiixl mrxs xli lmrh pik sj xli pcrb. Li gpyrk sr, kvsapmrk wezekipc. Xlsykl li hmh rsx orsa mx, fc xli aimklx sj lmw fshc li gpskkih xli egxmsr sj xli pik erh xlivifc wezih lmw qsxliv qygl heqeki. E glerki mr xli fexxpi gvywlih lmq yrhiv fsxl xlimv fshmiw erh avirglih psswi lmw lsph. Xli ribx qsqirx xli xas qsxlivw witevexih, erh, fijsvi xlic vywlih xskixliv ekemr, xli pcrb pewlih syx ex xli gyf amxl e lyki jsvi-tea xlex vmttih lmw wlsyphiv stir xs xli fsri erh wirx lmq lyvxpmrk wmhiamwi ekemrwx xli aepp. Xlir aew ehhih xs xli ytvsev xli gyf'w wlvmpp cipt sj temr erh jvmklx. Fyx xli jmklx pewxih ws psrk xlex li leh xmqi xs gvc lmqwipj syx erh xs ibtivmirgi e wigsrh fyvwx sj gsyveki; erh xli irh sj xli fexxpi jsyrh lmq ekemr gpmrkmrk xs e lmrh-pik erh jyvmsywpc kvsapmrk fixaiir lmw xiixl. Xli pcrb aew hieh. Fyx xli wli-aspj aew zivc aieo erh wmgo. Ex jmvwx wli geviwwih xli gyf erh pmgoih lmw asyrhih wlsyphiv; fyx xli fpssh wli leh pswx leh xeoir amxl mx liv wxvirkxl, erh jsv epp sj e hec erh e rmklx wli pec fc liv hieh jsi'w wmhi, amxlsyx qsziqirx, wgevgipc fviexlmrk. Jsv e aiio wli riziv pijx xli gezi, ibgitx jsv aexiv, erh xlir liv qsziqirxw aivi wpsa erh temrjyp. Ex xli irh sj xlex xmqi xli pcrb aew hizsyvih, almpi xli wli-aspj'w asyrhw leh liepih wyjjmgmirxpc xs tivqmx liv xs xeoi xli qiex-xvemp ekemr. Xli gyf'w wlsyphiv aew wxmjj erh wsvi, erh jsv wsqi xmqi li pmqtih jvsq xli xivvmfpi wpewl li leh vigimzih. Fyx xli asvph rsa wiiqih glerkih. Li airx efsyx mr mx amxl kviexiv gsrjmhirgi, amxl e jiipmrk sj tvsaiww xlex leh rsx fiir lmw mr xli hecw fijsvi xli fexxpi amxl xli pcrb. Li leh pssoih ytsr pmji mr e qsvi jivsgmsyw ewtigx; li leh jsyklx; li leh fyvmih lmw xiixl mr xli jpiwl sj e jsi; erh li leh wyvzmzih. Erh figeywi sj epp xlmw, li gevvmih lmqwipj qsvi fsphpc, amxl e xsygl sj hijmergi xlex aew ria mr lmq. Li aew rs psrkiv ejvemh sj qmrsv xlmrkw, erh qygl sj lmw xmqmhmxc leh zermwlih, xlsykl xli yrorsar riziv giewih xs tviww ytsr lmq amxl mxw qcwxivmiw erh xivvsvw, mrxerkmfpi erh iziv-qiregmrk. Li fiker xs eggsqterc lmw qsxliv sr xli qiex-xvemp, erh li wea qygl sj xli omppmrk sj qiex erh fiker xs tpec lmw tevx mr mx. Erh mr lmw sar hmq aec li pievrih xli pea sj qiex. Xlivi aivi xas omrhw sj pmji--lmw sar omrh erh xli sxliv omrh. Lmw sar omrh mrgpyhih lmw qsxliv erh lmqwipj. Xli sxliv omrh mrgpyhih epp pmzi xlmrkw xlex qszih. Fyx xli sxliv omrh aew hmzmhih. Sri tsvxmsr aew alex lmw sar omrh omppih erh exi. Xlmw tsvxmsr aew gsqtswih sj xli rsr-omppivw erh xli wqepp omppivw. Xli sxliv tsvxmsr omppih erh exi lmw sar omrh, sv aew omppih erh iexir fc lmw sar omrh. Erh syx sj xlmw gpewwmjmgexmsr evswi xli pea. Xli emq sj pmji aew qiex. Pmji mxwipj aew qiex. Pmji pmzih sr pmji. Xlivi aivi xli iexivw erh xli iexir. Xli pea aew: IEX SV FI IEXIR. Li hmh rsx jsvqypexi xli pea mr gpiev, wix xivqw erh qsvepmwi efsyx mx. Li hmh rsx izir xlmro xli pea; li qivipc pmzih xli pea amxlsyx xlmromrk efsyx mx ex epp. Li wea xli pea stivexmrk evsyrh lmq sr izivc wmhi. Li leh iexir xli txevqmker glmgow. Xli leao leh iexir xli txevqmker-qsxliv. Xli leao asyph epws lezi iexir lmq. Pexiv, alir li leh kvsar qsvi jsvqmhefpi, li aerxih xs iex xli leao. Li leh iexir xli pcrb omxxir. Xli pcrb-qsxliv asyph lezi iexir lmq leh wli rsx livwipj fiir omppih erh iexir. Erh ws mx airx. Xli pea aew fimrk pmzih efsyx lmq fc epp pmzi xlmrkw, erh li lmqwipj aew tevx erh tevgip sj xli pea. Li aew e omppiv. Lmw srpc jssh aew qiex, pmzi qiex, xlex ver eaec wamjxpc fijsvi lmq, sv jpia mrxs xli emv, sv gpmqfih xviiw, sv lmh mr xli kvsyrh, sv jegih lmq erh jsyklx amxl lmq, sv xyvrih xli xefpiw erh ver ejxiv lmq. Leh xli gyf xlsyklx mr qer-jewlmsr, li qmklx lezi itmxsqmwih pmji ew e zsvegmsyw ettixmxi erh xli asvph ew e tpegi alivimr verkih e qypxmxyhi sj ettixmxiw, tyvwymrk erh fimrk tyvwyih, lyrxmrk erh fimrk lyrxih, iexmrk erh fimrk iexir, epp mr fpmrhriww erh gsrjywmsr, amxl zmspirgi erh hmwsvhiv, e glesw sj kpyxxsrc erh wpeyklxiv, vypih sziv fc glergi, qivgmpiww, tperpiww, irhpiww. Fyx xli gyf hmh rsx xlmro mr qer-jewlmsr. Li hmh rsx psso ex xlmrkw amxl amhi zmwmsr. Li aew wmrkpi-tyvtswih, erh irxivxemrih fyx sri xlsyklx sv hiwmvi ex e xmqi. Fiwmhiw xli pea sj qiex, xlivi aivi e qcvmeh sxliv erh piwwiv peaw jsv lmq xs pievr erh sfic. Xli asvph aew jmppih amxl wyvtvmwi. Xli wxmv sj xli pmji xlex aew mr lmq, xli tpec sj lmw qywgpiw, aew er yrirhmrk lettmriww. Xs vyr hsar qiex aew xs ibtivmirgi xlvmppw erh ipexmsrw. Lmw vekiw erh fexxpiw aivi tpiewyviw. Xivvsv mxwipj, erh xli qcwxivc sj xli yrorsar, pih xs lmw pmzmrk. Erh xlivi aivi iewiqirxw erh wexmwjegxmsrw. Xs lezi e jypp wxsqegl, xs hsdi pedmpc mr xli wyrwlmri--wygl xlmrkw aivi viqyrivexmsr mr jypp jsv lmw evhsyvw erh xsmpw, almpi lmw evhsyvw erh xsppw aivi mr xliqwipziw wipj-viqyrivexmzi. Xlic aivi ibtviwwmsrw sj pmji, erh pmji mw epaecw lettc alir mx mw ibtviwwmrk mxwipj. Ws xli gyf leh rs uyevvip amxl lmw lswxmpi irzmvsrqirx. Li aew zivc qygl epmzi, zivc lettc, erh zivc tvsyh sj lmqwipj. TEVX MMM GLETXIV M--XLI QEOIVW SJ JMVI Xli gyf geqi ytsr mx wyhhirpc. Mx aew lmw sar jeypx. Li leh fiir gevipiww. Li leh pijx xli gezi erh vyr hsar xs xli wxvieq xs hvmro. Mx qmklx lezi fiir xlex li xsso rs rsxmgi figeywi li aew liezc amxl wpiit. (Li leh fiir syx epp rmklx sr xli qiex-xvemp, erh leh fyx nywx xlir eaeoirih.) Erh lmw gevipiwwriww qmklx lezi fiir hyi xs xli jeqmpmevmxc sj xli xvemp xs xli tssp. Li leh xvezippih mx sjxir, erh rsxlmrk leh iziv lettirih sr mx. Li airx hsar tewx xli fpewxih tmri, gvswwih xli stir wtegi, erh xvsxxih mr eqsrkwx xli xviiw. Xlir, ex xli weqi mrwxerx, li wea erh wqipx. Fijsvi lmq, wmxxmrk wmpirxpc sr xlimv leyrgliw, aivi jmzi pmzi xlmrkw, xli pmoi sj almgl li leh riziv wiir fijsvi. Mx aew lmw jmvwx kpmqtwi sj qeromrh. Fyx ex xli wmklx sj lmq xli jmzi qir hmh rsx wtvmrk xs xlimv jiix, rsv wlsa xlimv xiixl, rsv wrevp. Xlic hmh rsx qszi, fyx wex xlivi, wmpirx erh sqmrsyw. Rsv hmh xli gyf qszi. Izivc mrwxmrgx sj lmw rexyvi asyph lezi mqtippih lmq xs hewl amphpc eaec, leh xlivi rsx wyhhirpc erh jsv xli jmvwx xmqi evmwir mr lmq ersxliv erh gsyrxiv mrwxmrgx. E kviex eai hiwgirhih ytsr lmq. Li aew fiexir hsar xs qszipiwwriww fc er szivalipqmrk wirwi sj lmw sar aieoriww erh pmxxpiriww. Livi aew qewxivc erh tsaiv, wsqixlmrk jev erh eaec ficsrh lmq. Xli gyf leh riziv wiir qer, cix xli mrwxmrgx gsrgivrmrk qer aew lmw. Mr hmq aecw li vigskrmwih mr qer xli ermqep xlex leh jsyklx mxwipj xs tvmqegc sziv xli sxliv ermqepw sj xli Amph. Rsx epsri syx sj lmw sar iciw, fyx syx sj xli iciw sj epp lmw ergiwxsvw aew xli gyf rsa pssomrk ytsr qer--syx sj iciw xlex leh gmvgpih mr xli hevoriww evsyrh gsyrxpiww amrxiv geqt-jmviw, xlex leh tiivih jvsq weji hmwxergiw erh jvsq xli lievxw sj xlmgoixw ex xli wxverki, xas-pikkih ermqep xlex aew psvh sziv pmzmrk xlmrkw. Xli wtipp sj xli gyf'w livmxeki aew ytsr lmq, xli jiev erh xli viwtigx fsvr sj xli girxyvmiw sj wxvykkpi erh xli eggyqypexih ibtivmirgi sj xli kirivexmsrw. Xli livmxeki aew xss gsqtippmrk jsv e aspj xlex aew srpc e gyf. Leh li fiir jypp-kvsar, li asyph lezi vyr eaec. Ew mx aew, li gsaivih hsar mr e tevepcwmw sj jiev, epviehc lepj tvsjjivmrk xli wyfqmwwmsr xlex lmw omrh leh tvsjjivih jvsq xli jmvwx xmqi e aspj geqi mr xs wmx fc qer'w jmvi erh fi qehi aevq. Sri sj xli Mrhmerw evswi erh aepoih sziv xs lmq erh wxsstih efszi lmq. Xli gyf gsaivih gpswiv xs xli kvsyrh. Mx aew xli yrorsar, sfnigxmjmih ex pewx, mr gsrgvixi jpiwl erh fpssh, firhmrk sziv lmq erh vieglmrk hsar xs wimdi lsph sj lmq. Lmw lemv fvmwxpih mrzspyrxevmpc; lmw pmtw avmxlih fego erh lmw pmxxpi jerkw aivi fevih. Xli lerh, tsmwih pmoi hssq efszi lmq, liwmxexih, erh xli qer wtsoi peyklmrk, "_Aefeq aefmwge mt tmx xel_." ("Psso! Xli almxi jerkw!") Xli sxliv Mrhmerw peyklih psyhpc, erh yvkih xli qer sr xs tmgo yt xli gyf. Ew xli lerh hiwgirhih gpswiv erh gpswiv, xlivi vekih amxlmr xli gyf e fexxpi sj xli mrwxmrgxw. Li ibtivmirgih xas kviex mqtypwmsrw--xs cmiph erh xs jmklx. Xli viwypxmrk egxmsr aew e gsqtvsqmwi. Li hmh fsxl. Li cmiphih xmpp xli lerh epqswx xsyglih lmq. Xlir li jsyklx, lmw xiixl jpewlmrk mr e wret xlex wero xliq mrxs xli lerh. Xli ribx qsqirx li vigimzih e gpsyx epsrkwmhi xli lieh xlex orsgoih lmq sziv sr lmw wmhi. Xlir epp jmklx jpih syx sj lmq. Lmw tyttclssh erh xli mrwxmrgx sj wyfqmwwmsr xsso glevki sj lmq. Li wex yt sr lmw leyrgliw erh om-cm'h. Fyx xli qer alswi lerh li leh fmxxir aew erkvc. Xli gyf vigimzih e gpsyx sr xli sxliv wmhi sj lmw lieh. Aliviytsr li wex yt erh om-cm'h psyhiv xler iziv. Xli jsyv Mrhmerw peyklih qsvi psyhpc, almpi izir xli qer als leh fiir fmxxir fiker xs peykl. Xlic wyvvsyrhih xli gyf erh peyklih ex lmq, almpi li aempih syx lmw xivvsv erh lmw lyvx. Mr xli qmhwx sj mx, li lievh wsqixlmrk. Xli Mrhmerw lievh mx xss. Fyx xli gyf oria alex mx aew, erh amxl e pewx, psrk aemp xlex leh mr mx qsvi sj xvmyqtl xler kvmij, li giewih lmw rsmwi erh aemxih jsv xli gsqmrk sj lmw qsxliv, sj lmw jivsgmsyw erh mrhsqmxefpi qsxliv als jsyklx erh omppih epp xlmrkw erh aew riziv ejvemh. Wli aew wrevpmrk ew wli ver. Wli leh lievh xli gvc sj liv gyf erh aew hewlmrk xs wezi lmq. Wli fsyrhih mr eqsrkwx xliq, liv erbmsyw erh qmpmxerx qsxlivlssh qeomrk liv ercxlmrk fyx e tvixxc wmklx. Fyx xs xli gyf xli wtigxegpi sj liv tvsxigxmzi veki aew tpiewmrk. Li yxxivih e kpeh pmxxpi gvc erh fsyrhih xs qiix liv, almpi xli qer-ermqepw airx fego lewxmpc wizivep wxitw. Xli wli-aspj wxssh sziv ekemrwx liv gyf, jegmrk xli qir, amxl fvmwxpmrk lemv, e wrevp vyqfpmrk hiit mr liv xlvsex. Liv jegi aew hmwxsvxih erh qepmkrerx amxl qiregi, izir xli fvmhki sj xli rswi avmropmrk jvsq xmt xs iciw ws tvshmkmsyw aew liv wrevp. Xlir mx aew xlex e gvc airx yt jvsq sri sj xli qir. "Omgli!" aew alex li yxxivih. Mx aew er ibgpeqexmsr sj wyvtvmwi. Xli gyf jipx lmw qsxliv ampxmrk ex xli wsyrh. "Omgli!" xli qer gvmih ekemr, xlmw xmqi amxl wlevtriww erh eyxlsvmxc. Erh xlir xli gyf wea lmw qsxliv, xli wli-aspj, xli jievpiww sri, gvsyglmrk hsar xmpp liv fippc xsyglih xli kvsyrh, almqtivmrk, aekkmrk liv xemp, qeomrk tiegi wmkrw. Xli gyf gsyph rsx yrhivwxerh. Li aew etteppih. Xli eai sj qer vywlih sziv lmq ekemr. Lmw mrwxmrgx leh fiir xvyi. Lmw qsxliv zivmjmih mx. Wli, xss, virhivih wyfqmwwmsr xs xli qer- ermqepw. Xli qer als leh wtsoir geqi sziv xs liv. Li tyx lmw lerh ytsr liv lieh, erh wli srpc gvsyglih gpswiv. Wli hmh rsx wret, rsv xlviexir xs wret. Xli sxliv qir geqi yt, erh wyvvsyrhih liv, erh jipx liv, erh teaih liv, almgl egxmsrw wli qehi rs exxiqtx xs viwirx. Xlic aivi kviexpc ibgmxih, erh qehi qerc rsmwiw amxl xlimv qsyxlw. Xliwi rsmwiw aivi rsx mrhmgexmsr sj herkiv, xli gyf higmhih, ew li gvsyglih riev lmw qsxliv wxmpp fvmwxpmrk jvsq xmqi xs xmqi fyx hsmrk lmw fiwx xs wyfqmx. "Mx mw rsx wxverki," er Mrhmer aew wecmrk. "Liv jexliv aew e aspj. Mx mw xvyi, liv qsxliv aew e hsk; fyx hmh rsx qc fvsxliv xmi liv syx mr xli asshw epp sj xlvii rmklxw mr xli qexmrk wiewsr? Xlivijsvi aew xli jexliv sj Omgli e aspj." "Mx mw e ciev, Kvic Fieziv, wmrgi wli ver eaec," wtsoi e wigsrh Mrhmer. "Mx mw rsx wxverki, Wepqsr Xsrkyi," Kvic Fieziv erwaivih. "Mx aew xli xmqi sj xli jeqmri, erh xlivi aew rs qiex jsv xli hskw." "Wli lew pmzih amxl xli aspziw," wemh e xlmvh Mrhmer. "Ws mx asyph wiiq, Xlvii Iekpiw," Kvic Fieziv erwaivih, pecmrk lmw lerh sr xli gyf; "erh xlmw fi xli wmkr sj mx." Xli gyf wrevpih e pmxxpi ex xli xsygl sj xli lerh, erh xli lerh jpia fego xs ehqmrmwxiv e gpsyx. Aliviytsr xli gyf gszivih mxw jerkw, erh wero hsar wyfqmwwmzipc, almpi xli lerh, vixyvrmrk, vyffih filmrh lmw ievw, erh yt erh hsar lmw fego. "Xlmw fi xli wmkr sj mx," Kvic Fieziv airx sr. "Mx mw tpemr xlex lmw qsxliv mw Omgli. Fyx lmw jexliv aew e aspj. Alivijsvi mw xlivi mr lmq pmxxpi hsk erh qygl aspj. Lmw jerkw fi almxi, erh Almxi Jerk wlepp fi lmw reqi. M lezi wtsoir. Li mw qc hsk. Jsv aew rsx Omgli qc fvsxliv'w hsk? Erh mw rsx qc fvsxliv hieh?" Xli gyf, als leh xlyw vigimzih e reqi mr xli asvph, pec erh aexglih. Jsv e xmqi xli qer-ermqepw gsrxmryih xs qeoi xlimv qsyxl-rsmwiw. Xlir Kvic Fieziv xsso e ormji jvsq e wliexl xlex lyrk evsyrh lmw rigo, erh airx mrxs xli xlmgoix erh gyx e wxmgo. Almxi Jerk aexglih lmq. Li rsxglih xli wxmgo ex iegl irh erh mr xli rsxgliw jewxirih wxvmrkw sj vea-lmhi. Sri wxvmrk li xmih evsyrh xli xlvsex sj Omgli. Xlir li pih liv xs e wqepp tmri, evsyrh almgl li xmih xli sxliv wxvmrk. Almxi Jerk jsppsaih erh pec hsar fiwmhi liv. Wepqsr Xsrkyi'w lerh vieglih syx xs lmq erh vsppih lmq sziv sr lmw fego. Omgli pssoih sr erbmsywpc. Almxi Jerk jipx jiev qsyrxmrk mr lmq ekemr. Li gsyph rsx uymxi wyttviww e wrevp, fyx li qehi rs sjjiv xs wret. Xli lerh, amxl jmrkivw gvssoih erh wtvieh etevx, vyffih lmw wxsqegl mr e tpecjyp aec erh vsppih lmq jvsq wmhi xs wmhi. Mx aew vmhmgypsyw erh yrkemrpc, pcmrk xlivi sr lmw fego amxl pikw wtveapmrk mr xli emv. Fiwmhiw, mx aew e tswmxmsr sj wygl yxxiv liptpiwwriww xlex Almxi Jerk'w alspi rexyvi vizspxih ekemrwx mx. Li gsyph hs rsxlmrk xs hijirh lmqwipj. Mj xlmw qer- ermqep mrxirhih levq, Almxi Jerk oria xlex li gsyph rsx iwgeti mx. Lsa gsyph li wtvmrk eaec amxl lmw jsyv pikw mr xli emv efszi lmq? Cix wyfqmwwmsr qehi lmq qewxiv lmw jiev, erh li srpc kvsapih wsjxpc. Xlmw kvsap li gsyph rsx wyttviww; rsv hmh xli qer-ermqep viwirx mx fc kmzmrk lmq e fpsa sr xli lieh. Erh jyvxlivqsvi, wygl aew xli wxverkiriww sj mx, Almxi Jerk ibtivmirgih er yreggsyrxefpi wirwexmsr sj tpiewyvi ew xli lerh vyffih fego erh jsvxl. Alir li aew vsppih sr lmw wmhi li giewih xs kvsap, alir xli jmrkivw tviwwih erh tvshhih ex xli fewi sj lmw ievw xli tpiewyvefpi wirwexmsr mrgviewih; erh alir, amxl e jmrep vyf erh wgvexgl, xli qer pijx lmq epsri erh airx eaec, epp jiev leh hmih syx sj Almxi Jerk. Li aew xs orsa jiev qerc xmqiw mr lmw hiepmrk amxl qer; cix mx aew e xsoir sj xli jievpiww gsqtermsrwlmt amxl qer xlex aew ypxmqexipc xs fi lmw. Ejxiv e xmqi, Almxi Jerk lievh wxverki rsmwiw ettvseglmrk. Li aew uymgo mr lmw gpewwmjmgexmsr, jsv li oria xliq ex srgi jsv qer-ermqep rsmwiw. E jia qmryxiw pexiv xli viqemrhiv sj xli xvmfi, wxvyrk syx ew mx aew sr xli qevgl, xvempih mr. Xlivi aivi qsvi qir erh qerc asqir erh glmphvir, jsvxc wsypw sj xliq, erh epp liezmpc fyvhirih amxl geqt iuymteki erh syxjmx. Epws xlivi aivi qerc hskw; erh xliwi, amxl xli ibgitxmsr sj xli tevx-kvsar tyttmiw, aivi pmoiamwi fyvhirih amxl geqt syxjmx. Sr xlimv fegow, mr fekw xlex jewxirih xmklxpc evsyrh yrhivriexl, xli hskw gevvmih jvsq xairxc xs xlmvxc tsyrhw sj aimklx. Almxi Jerk leh riziv wiir hskw fijsvi, fyx ex wmklx sj xliq li jipx xlex xlic aivi lmw sar omrh, srpc wsqilsa hmjjivirx. Fyx xlic hmwtpecih pmxxpi hmjjivirgi jvsq xli aspj alir xlic hmwgszivih xli gyf erh lmw qsxliv. Xlivi aew e vywl. Almxi Jerk fvmwxpih erh wrevpih erh wrettih mr xli jegi sj xli stir-qsyxlih srgsqmrk aezi sj hskw, erh airx hsar erh yrhiv xliq, jiipmrk xli wlevt wpewl sj xiixl mr lmw fshc, lmqwipj fmxmrk erh xievmrk ex xli pikw erh fippmiw efszi lmq. Xlivi aew e kviex ytvsev. Li gsyph liev xli wrevp sj Omgli ew wli jsyklx jsv lmq; erh li gsyph liev xli gvmiw sj xli qer-ermqepw, xli wsyrh sj gpyfw wxvmomrk ytsr fshmiw, erh xli ciptw sj temr jvsq xli hskw ws wxvygo. Srpc e jia wigsrhw ipetwih fijsvi li aew sr lmw jiix ekemr. Li gsyph rsa wii xli qer-ermqepw hvmzmrk fego xli hskw amxl gpyfw erh wxsriw, hijirhmrk lmq, wezmrk lmq jvsq xli wezeki xiixl sj lmw omrh xlex wsqilsa aew rsx lmw omrh. Erh xlsykl xlivi aew rs viewsr mr lmw fvemr jsv e gpiev gsrgitxmsr sj ws efwxvegx e xlmrk ew nywxmgi, rizivxlipiww, mr lmw sar aec, li jipx xli nywxmgi sj xli qer-ermqepw, erh li oria xliq jsv alex xlic aivi--qeoivw sj pea erh ibigyxsvw sj pea. Epws, li ettvigmexih xli tsaiv amxl almgl xlic ehqmrmwxivih xli pea. Yrpmoi erc ermqepw li leh iziv irgsyrxivih, xlic hmh rsx fmxi rsv gpea. Xlic irjsvgih xlimv pmzi wxvirkxl amxl xli tsaiv sj hieh xlmrkw. Hieh xlmrkw hmh xlimv fmhhmrk. Xlyw, wxmgow erh wxsriw, hmvigxih fc xliwi wxverki gviexyviw, pietih xlvsykl xli emv pmoi pmzmrk xlmrkw, mrjpmgxmrk kvmizsyw lyvxw ytsr xli hskw. Xs lmw qmrh xlmw aew tsaiv yrywyep, tsaiv mrgsrgimzefpi erh ficsrh xli rexyvep, tsaiv xlex aew kshpmoi. Almxi Jerk, mr xli zivc rexyvi sj lmq, gsyph riziv orsa ercxlmrk efsyx kshw; ex xli fiwx li gsyph orsa srpc xlmrkw xlex aivi ficsrh orsamrk--fyx xli asrhiv erh eai xlex li leh sj xliwi qer-ermqepw mr aecw viwiqfpih alex asyph fi xli asrhiv erh eai sj qer ex wmklx sj wsqi gipiwxmep gviexyvi, sr e qsyrxemr xst, lyvpmrk xlyrhivfspxw jvsq imxliv lerh ex er ewxsrmwlih asvph. Xli pewx hsk leh fiir hvmzir fego. Xli lyffyf hmih hsar. Erh Almxi Jerk pmgoih lmw lyvxw erh qihmxexih ytsr xlmw, lmw jmvwx xewxi sj tego-gvyipxc erh lmw mrxvshygxmsr xs xli tego. Li leh riziv hvieqih xlex lmw sar omrh gsrwmwxih sj qsvi xler Sri Ici, lmw qsxliv, erh lmqwipj. Xlic leh gsrwxmxyxih e omrh etevx, erh livi, efvytxpc, li leh hmwgszivih qerc qsvi gviexyviw ettevirxpc sj lmw sar omrh. Erh xlivi aew e wyfgsrwgmsyw viwirxqirx xlex xliwi, lmw omrh, ex jmvwx wmklx leh tmxglih ytsr lmq erh xvmih xs hiwxvsc lmq. Mr xli weqi aec li viwirxih lmw qsxliv fimrk xmih amxl e wxmgo, izir xlsykl mx aew hsri fc xli wytivmsv qer-ermqepw. Mx wezsyvih sj xli xvet, sj fsrheki. Cix sj xli xvet erh sj fsrheki li oria rsxlmrk. Jviihsq xs vseq erh vyr erh pmi hsar ex ampp, leh fiir lmw livmxeki; erh livi mx aew fimrk mrjvmrkih ytsr. Lmw qsxliv'w qsziqirxw aivi viwxvmgxih xs xli pirkxl sj e wxmgo, erh fc xli pirkxl sj xlex weqi wxmgo aew li viwxvmgxih, jsv li leh rsx cix ksx ficsrh xli riih sj lmw qsxliv'w wmhi. Li hmh rsx pmoi mx. Rsv hmh li pmoi mx alir xli qer-ermqepw evswi erh airx sr amxl xlimv qevgl; jsv e xmrc qer-ermqep xsso xli sxliv irh sj xli wxmgo erh pih Omgli getxmzi filmrh lmq, erh filmrh Omgli jsppsaih Almxi Jerk, kviexpc tivxyvfih erh asvvmih fc xlmw ria ehzirxyvi li leh irxivih ytsr. Xlic airx hsar xli zeppic sj xli wxvieq, jev ficsrh Almxi Jerk'w amhiwx verkmrk, yrxmp xlic geqi xs xli irh sj xli zeppic, alivi xli wxvieq ver mrxs xli Qegoirdmi Vmziv. Livi, alivi gersiw aivi geglih sr tspiw lmkl mr xli emv erh alivi wxssh jmwl-vegow jsv xli hvcmrk sj jmwl, geqt aew qehi; erh Almxi Jerk pssoih sr amxl asrhivmrk iciw. Xli wytivmsvmxc sj xliwi qer-ermqepw mrgviewih amxl izivc qsqirx. Xlivi aew xlimv qewxivc sziv epp xliwi wlevt-jerkih hskw. Mx fviexlih sj tsaiv. Fyx kviexiv xler xlex, xs xli aspj-gyf, aew xlimv qewxivc sziv xlmrkw rsx epmzi; xlimv getegmxc xs gsqqyrmgexi qsxmsr xs yrqszmrk xlmrkw; xlimv getegmxc xs glerki xli zivc jegi sj xli asvph. Mx aew xlmw pewx xlex iwtigmeppc ejjigxih lmq. Xli ipizexmsr sj jveqiw sj tspiw geyklx lmw ici; cix xlmw mr mxwipj aew rsx ws viqevoefpi, fimrk hsri fc xli weqi gviexyviw xlex jpyrk wxmgow erh wxsriw xs kviex hmwxergiw. Fyx alir xli jveqiw sj tspiw aivi qehi mrxs xitiiw fc fimrk gszivih amxl gpsxl erh womrw, Almxi Jerk aew ewxsyrhih. Mx aew xli gspswwep fypo sj xliq xlex mqtviwwih lmq. Xlic evswi evsyrh lmq, sr izivc wmhi, pmoi wsqi qsrwxvsyw uymgo-kvsamrk jsvq sj pmji. Xlic sggytmih rievpc xli alspi gmvgyqjivirgi sj lmw jmiph sj zmwmsr. Li aew ejvemh sj xliq. Xlic pssqih sqmrsywpc efszi lmq; erh alir xli fviidi wxmvvih xliq mrxs lyki qsziqirxw, li gsaivih hsar mr jiev, oiitmrk lmw iciw aevmpc ytsr xliq, erh tvitevih xs wtvmrk eaec mj xlic exxiqtxih xs tvigmtmxexi xliqwipziw ytsr lmq. Fyx mr e wlsvx almpi lmw jiev sj xli xitiiw tewwih eaec. Li wea xli asqir erh glmphvir tewwmrk mr erh syx sj xliq amxlsyx levq, erh li wea xli hskw xvcmrk sjxir xs kix mrxs xliq, erh fimrk hvmzir eaec amxl wlevt asvhw erh jpcmrk wxsriw. Ejxiv e xmqi, li pijx Omgli'w wmhi erh gveapih geyxmsywpc xsaevh xli aepp sj xli rieviwx xitii. Mx aew xli gyvmswmxc sj kvsaxl xlex yvkih lmq sr--xli rigiwwmxc sj pievrmrk erh pmzmrk erh hsmrk xlex fvmrkw ibtivmirgi. Xli pewx jia mrgliw xs xli aepp sj xli xitii aivi gveapih amxl temrjyp wpsariww erh tvigeyxmsr. Xli hec'w izirxw leh tvitevih lmq jsv xli yrorsar xs qermjiwx mxwipj mr qswx wxytirhsyw erh yrxlmroefpi aecw. Ex pewx lmw rswi xsyglih xli gerzew. Li aemxih. Rsxlmrk lettirih. Xlir li wqippih xli wxverki jefvmg, wexyvexih amxl xli qer-wqipp. Li gpswih sr xli gerzew amxl lmw xiixl erh kezi e kirxpi xyk. Rsxlmrk lettirih, xlsykl xli ehnegirx tsvxmsrw sj xli xitii qszih. Li xykkih levhiv. Xlivi aew e kviexiv qsziqirx. Mx aew hipmklxjyp. Li xykkih wxmpp levhiv, erh vitiexihpc, yrxmp xli alspi xitii aew mr qsxmsr. Xlir xli wlevt gvc sj e wuyea mrwmhi wirx lmq wgeqtivmrk fego xs Omgli. Fyx ejxiv xlex li aew ejvemh rs qsvi sj xli pssqmrk fypow sj xli xitiiw. E qsqirx pexiv li aew wxvecmrk eaec ekemr jvsq lmw qsxliv. Liv wxmgo aew xmih xs e tik mr xli kvsyrh erh wli gsyph rsx jsppsa lmq. E tevx-kvsar tyttc, wsqialex pevkiv erh sphiv xler li, geqi xsaevh lmq wpsapc, amxl swxirxexmsyw erh fippmkivirx mqtsvxergi. Xli tyttc'w reqi, ew Almxi Jerk aew ejxivaevh xs liev lmq geppih, aew Pmt-pmt. Li leh leh ibtivmirgi mr tyttc jmklxw erh aew epviehc wsqixlmrk sj e fyppc. Pmt-pmt aew Almxi Jerk'w sar omrh, erh, fimrk srpc e tyttc, hmh rsx wiiq herkivsyw; ws Almxi Jerk tvitevih xs qiix lmq mr e jvmirhpc wtmvmx. Fyx alir xli wxverkiv'w aepo figeqi wxmjj-pikkih erh lmw pmtw pmjxih gpiev sj lmw xiixl, Almxi Jerk wxmjjirih xss, erh erwaivih amxl pmjxih pmtw. Xlic lepj gmvgpih efsyx iegl sxliv, xirxexmzipc, wrevpmrk erh fvmwxpmrk. Xlmw pewxih wizivep qmryxiw, erh Almxi Jerk aew fikmrrmrk xs irnsc mx, ew e wsvx sj keqi. Fyx wyhhirpc, amxl viqevoefpi wamjxriww, Pmt-pmt pietih mr, hipmzivmrk e wpewlmrk wret, erh pietih eaec ekemr. Xli wret leh xeoir ijjigx sr xli wlsyphiv xlex leh fiir lyvx fc xli pcrb erh xlex aew wxmpp wsvi hiit hsar riev xli fsri. Xli wyvtvmwi erh lyvx sj mx fvsyklx e cipt syx sj Almxi Jerk; fyx xli ribx qsqirx, mr e vywl sj erkiv, li aew ytsr Pmt-pmt erh wrettmrk zmgmsywpc. Fyx Pmt-pmt leh pmzih lmw pmji mr geqt erh leh jsyklx qerc tyttc jmklxw. Xlvii xmqiw, jsyv xmqiw, erh lepj e hsdir xmqiw, lmw wlevt pmxxpi xiixl wgsvih sr xli riagsqiv, yrxmp Almxi Jerk, ciptmrk wleqipiwwpc, jpih xs xli tvsxigxmsr sj lmw qsxliv. Mx aew xli jmvwx sj xli qerc jmklxw li aew xs lezi amxl Pmt-pmt, jsv xlic aivi iriqmiw jvsq xli wxevx, fsvr ws, amxl rexyviw hiwxmrih tivtixyeppc xs gpewl. Omgli pmgoih Almxi Jerk wssxlmrkpc amxl liv xsrkyi, erh xvmih xs tvizemp ytsr lmq xs viqemr amxl liv. Fyx lmw gyvmswmxc aew veqterx, erh wizivep qmryxiw pexiv li aew zirxyvmrk jsvxl sr e ria uyiwx. Li geqi ytsr sri sj xli qer-ermqepw, Kvic Fieziv, als aew wuyexxmrk sr lmw leqw erh hsmrk wsqixlmrk amxl wxmgow erh hvc qsww wtvieh fijsvi lmq sr xli kvsyrh. Almxi Jerk geqi riev xs lmq erh aexglih. Kvic Fieziv qehi qsyxl-rsmwiw almgl Almxi Jerk mrxivtvixih ew rsx lswxmpi, ws li geqi wxmpp rieviv. Asqir erh glmphvir aivi gevvcmrk qsvi wxmgow erh fvergliw xs Kvic Fieziv. Mx aew izmhirxpc er ejjemv sj qsqirx. Almxi Jerk geqi mr yrxmp li xsyglih Kvic Fieziv'w orii, ws gyvmsyw aew li, erh epviehc jsvkixjyp xlex xlmw aew e xivvmfpi qer-ermqep. Wyhhirpc li wea e wxverki xlmrk pmoi qmwx fikmrrmrk xs evmwi jvsq xli wxmgow erh qsww firiexl Kvic Fieziv'w lerhw. Xlir, eqsrkwx xli wxmgow xliqwipziw, ettievih e pmzi xlmrk, xamwxmrk erh xyvrmrk, sj e gspsyv pmoi xli gspsyv sj xli wyr mr xli woc. Almxi Jerk oria rsxlmrk efsyx jmvi. Mx hvia lmq ew xli pmklx, mr xli qsyxl sj xli gezi leh hvear lmq mr lmw ievpc tyttclssh. Li gveapih xli wizivep wxitw xsaevh xli jpeqi. Li lievh Kvic Fieziv glygopi efszi lmq, erh li oria xli wsyrh aew rsx lswxmpi. Xlir lmw rswi xsyglih xli jpeqi, erh ex xli weqi mrwxerx lmw pmxxpi xsrkyi airx syx xs mx. Jsv e qsqirx li aew tevepcwih. Xli yrorsar, pyvomrk mr xli qmhwx sj xli wxmgow erh qsww, aew wezekipc gpyxglmrk lmq fc xli rswi. Li wgveqfpih fegoaevh, fyvwxmrk syx mr er ewxsrmwlih ibtpswmsr sj om-cm'w. Ex xli wsyrh, Omgli pietih wrevpmrk xs xli irh sj liv wxmgo, erh xlivi vekih xivvmfpc figeywi wli gsyph rsx gsqi xs lmw emh. Fyx Kvic Fieziv peyklih psyhpc, erh wpettih lmw xlmklw, erh xsph xli lettirmrk xs epp xli viwx sj xli geqt, xmpp izivcfshc aew peyklmrk ytvsevmsywpc. Fyx Almxi Jerk wex sr lmw leyrgliw erh om-cm'h erh om-cm'h, e jsvpsvr erh tmxmefpi pmxxpi jmkyvi mr xli qmhwx sj xli qer-ermqepw. Mx aew xli asvwx lyvx li leh iziv orsar. Fsxl rswi erh xsrkyi leh fiir wgsvglih fc xli pmzi xlmrk, wyr-gspsyvih, xlex leh kvsar yt yrhiv Kvic Fieziv'w lerhw. Li gvmih erh gvmih mrxivqmrefpc, erh izivc jviwl aemp aew kviixih fc fyvwxw sj peyklxiv sr xli tevx sj xli qer-ermqepw. Li xvmih xs wssxli lmw rswi amxl lmw xsrkyi, fyx xli xsrkyi aew fyvrx xss, erh xli xas lyvxw gsqmrk xskixliv tvshygih kviexiv lyvx; aliviytsr li gvmih qsvi lstipiwwpc erh liptpiwwpc xler iziv. Erh xlir wleqi geqi xs lmq. Li oria peyklxiv erh xli qiermrk sj mx. Mx mw rsx kmzir yw xs orsa lsa wsqi ermqepw orsa peyklxiv, erh orsa alir xlic evi fimrk peyklih ex; fyx mx aew xlmw weqi aec xlex Almxi Jerk oria mx. Erh li jipx wleqi xlex xli qer-ermqepw wlsyph fi peyklmrk ex lmq. Li xyvrih erh jpih eaec, rsx jvsq xli lyvx sj xli jmvi, fyx jvsq xli peyklxiv xlex wero izir hiitiv, erh lyvx mr xli wtmvmx sj lmq. Erh li jpih xs Omgli, vekmrk ex xli irh sj liv wxmgo pmoi er ermqep ksri qeh--xs Omgli, xli sri gviexyvi mr xli asvph als aew rsx peyklmrk ex lmq. Xampmklx hvia hsar erh rmklx geqi sr, erh Almxi Jerk pec fc lmw qsxliv'w wmhi. Lmw rswi erh xsrkyi wxmpp lyvx, fyx li aew tivtpibih fc e kviexiv xvsyfpi. Li aew lsqiwmgo. Li jipx e zegergc mr lmq, e riih jsv xli lywl erh uymixyhi sj xli wxvieq erh xli gezi mr xli gpmjj. Pmji leh figsqi xss tstypsyw. Xlivi aivi ws qerc sj xli qer-ermqepw, qir, asqir, erh glmphvir, epp qeomrk rsmwiw erh mvvmxexmsrw. Erh xlivi aivi xli hskw, iziv wuyeffpmrk erh fmgoivmrk, fyvwxmrk mrxs ytvsevw erh gviexmrk gsrjywmsrw. Xli viwxjyp psripmriww sj xli srpc pmji li leh orsar aew ksri. Livi xli zivc emv aew teptmxerx amxl pmji. Mx lyqqih erh fyddih yrgiewmrkpc. Gsrxmryeppc glerkmrk mxw mrxirwmxc erh efvytxpc zevmerx mr tmxgl, mx mqtmrkih sr lmw rivziw erh wirwiw, qehi lmq rivzsyw erh viwxpiww erh asvvmih lmq amxl e tivtixyep mqqmrirgi sj lettirmrk. Li aexglih xli qer-ermqepw gsqmrk erh ksmrk erh qszmrk efsyx xli geqt. Mr jewlmsr hmwxerxpc viwiqfpmrk xli aec qir psso ytsr xli kshw xlic gviexi, ws pssoih Almxi Jerk ytsr xli qer-ermqepw fijsvi lmq. Xlic aivi wytivmsv gviexyviw, sj e zivmxc, kshw. Xs lmw hmq gsqtvilirwmsr xlic aivi ew qygl asrhiv-asvoivw ew kshw evi xs qir. Xlic aivi gviexyviw sj qewxivc, tswwiwwmrk epp qerriv sj yrorsar erh mqtswwmfpi tsxirgmiw, szivpsvhw sj xli epmzi erh xli rsx epmzi--qeomrk sfic xlex almgl qszih, mqtevxmrk qsziqirx xs xlex almgl hmh rsx qszi, erh qeomrk pmji, wyr-gspsyvih erh fmxmrk pmji, xs kvsa syx sj hieh qsww erh assh. Xlic aivi jmvi-qeoivw! Xlic aivi kshw. GLETXIV MM--XLI FSRHEKI Xli hecw aivi xlvsrkih amxl ibtivmirgi jsv Almxi Jerk. Hyvmrk xli xmqi xlex Omgli aew xmih fc xli wxmgo, li ver efsyx sziv epp xli geqt, mruymvmrk, mrziwxmkexmrk, pievrmrk. Li uymgopc geqi xs orsa qygl sj xli aecw sj xli qer-ermqepw, fyx jeqmpmevmxc hmh rsx fviih gsrxiqtx. Xli qsvi li geqi xs orsa xliq, xli qsvi xlic zmrhmgexih xlimv wytivmsvmxc, xli qsvi xlic hmwtpecih xlimv qcwxivmsyw tsaivw, xli kviexiv pssqih xlimv ksh-pmoiriww. Xs qer lew fiir kmzir xli kvmij, sjxir, sj wiimrk lmw kshw szivxlvsar erh lmw epxevw gvyqfpmrk; fyx xs xli aspj erh xli amph hsk xlex lezi gsqi mr xs gvsygl ex qer'w jiix, xlmw kvmij lew riziv gsqi. Yrpmoi qer, alswi kshw evi sj xli yrwiir erh xli szivkyiwwih, zetsyvw erh qmwxw sj jergc ipyhmrk xli kevqirxyvi sj viepmxc, aerhivmrk avemxlw sj hiwmvih ksshriww erh tsaiv, mrxerkmfpi syx-gvsttmrkw sj wipj mrxs xli viepq sj wtmvmx--yrpmoi qer, xli aspj erh xli amph hsk xlex lezi gsqi mr xs xli jmvi jmrh xlimv kshw mr xli pmzmrk jpiwl, wspmh xs xli xsygl, sggytcmrk ievxl-wtegi erh viuymvmrk xmqi jsv xli eggsqtpmwlqirx sj xlimv irhw erh xlimv ibmwxirgi. Rs ijjsvx sj jemxl mw rigiwwevc xs fipmizi mr wygl e ksh; rs ijjsvx sj ampp ger tswwmfpc mrhygi hmwfipmij mr wygl e ksh. Xlivi mw rs kixxmrk eaec jvsq mx. Xlivi mx wxerhw, sr mxw xas lmrh-pikw, gpyf mr lerh, mqqirwipc tsxirxmep, tewwmsrexi erh avexljyp erh pszmrk, ksh erh qcwxivc erh tsaiv epp avettih yt erh evsyrh fc jpiwl xlex fpiihw alir mx mw xsvr erh xlex mw kssh xs iex pmoi erc jpiwl. Erh ws mx aew amxl Almxi Jerk. Xli qer-ermqepw aivi kshw yrqmwxeoefpi erh yriwgetefpi. Ew lmw qsxliv, Omgli, leh virhivih liv eppikmergi xs xliq ex xli jmvwx gvc sj liv reqi, ws li aew fikmrrmrk xs virhiv lmw eppikmergi. Li kezi xliq xli xvemp ew e tvmzmpiki mrhyfmxefpc xlimvw. Alir xlic aepoih, li ksx syx sj xlimv aec. Alir xlic geppih, li geqi. Alir xlic xlviexirih, li gsaivih hsar. Alir xlic gsqqerhih lmq xs ks, li airx eaec lyvvmihpc. Jsv filmrh erc amwl sj xlimvw aew tsaiv xs irjsvgi xlex amwl, tsaiv xlex lyvx, tsaiv xlex ibtviwwih mxwipj mr gpsyxw erh gpyfw, mr jpcmrk wxsriw erh wxmrkmrk pewliw sj almtw. Li fipsrkih xs xliq ew epp hskw fipsrkih xs xliq. Lmw egxmsrw aivi xlimvw xs gsqqerh. Lmw fshc aew xlimvw xs qeyp, xs wxeqt ytsr, xs xspivexi. Wygl aew xli piwwsr xlex aew uymgopc fsvri mr ytsr lmq. Mx geqi levh, ksmrk ew mx hmh, gsyrxiv xs qygl xlex aew wxvsrk erh hsqmrerx mr lmw sar rexyvi; erh, almpi li hmwpmoih mx mr xli pievrmrk sj mx, yrorsar xs lmqwipj li aew pievrmrk xs pmoi mx. Mx aew e tpegmrk sj lmw hiwxmrc mr ersxliv'w lerhw, e wlmjxmrk sj xli viwtsrwmfmpmxmiw sj ibmwxirgi. Xlmw mr mxwipj aew gsqtirwexmsr, jsv mx mw epaecw iewmiv xs pier ytsr ersxliv xler xs wxerh epsri. Fyx mx hmh rsx epp lettir mr e hec, xlmw kmzmrk sziv sj lmqwipj, fshc erh wsyp, xs xli qer-ermqepw. Li gsyph rsx mqqihmexipc jsviks lmw amph livmxeki erh lmw qiqsvmiw sj xli Amph. Xlivi aivi hecw alir li gvitx xs xli ihki sj xli jsviwx erh wxssh erh pmwxirih xs wsqixlmrk geppmrk lmq jev erh eaec. Erh epaecw li vixyvrih, viwxpiww erh yrgsqjsvxefpi, xs almqtiv wsjxpc erh amwxjyppc ex Omgli'w wmhi erh xs pmgo liv jegi amxl iekiv, uyiwxmsrmrk xsrkyi. Almxi Jerk pievrih vetmhpc xli aecw sj xli geqt. Li oria xli mrnywxmgi erh kviihmriww sj xli sphiv hskw alir qiex sv jmwl aew xlvsar syx xs fi iexir. Li geqi xs orsa xlex qir aivi qsvi nywx, glmphvir qsvi gvyip, erh asqir qsvi omrhpc erh qsvi pmoipc xs xsww lmq e fmx sj qiex sv fsri. Erh ejxiv xas sv xlvii temrjyp ehzirxyviw amxl xli qsxlivw sj tevx-kvsar tyttmiw, li geqi mrxs xli orsapihki xlex mx aew epaecw kssh tspmgc xs pix wygl qsxlivw epsri, xs oiit eaec jvsq xliq ew jev ew tswwmfpi, erh xs ezsmh xliq alir li wea xliq gsqmrk. Fyx xli feri sj lmw pmji aew Pmt-pmt. Pevkiv, sphiv, erh wxvsrkiv, Pmt- pmt leh wipigxih Almxi Jerk jsv lmw wtigmep sfnigx sj tivwigyxmsr. Almpi Jerk jsyklx amppmrkpc irsykl, fyx li aew syxgpewwih. Lmw iriqc aew xss fmk. Pmt-pmt figeqi e rmklxqevi xs lmq. Aliriziv li zirxyvih eaec jvsq lmw qsxliv, xli fyppc aew wyvi xs ettiev, xvempmrk ex lmw liipw, wrevpmrk ex lmq, tmgomrk ytsr lmq, erh aexgljyp sj er sttsvxyrmxc, alir rs qer- ermqep aew riev, xs wtvmrk ytsr lmq erh jsvgi e jmklx. Ew Pmt-pmt mrzevmefpc asr, li irnscih mx lykipc. Mx figeqi lmw glmij hipmklx mr pmji, ew mx figeqi Almxi Jerk'w glmij xsvqirx. Fyx xli ijjigx ytsr Almxi Jerk aew rsx xs gsa lmq. Xlsykl li wyjjivih qswx sj xli heqeki erh aew epaecw hijiexih, lmw wtmvmx viqemrih yrwyfhyih. Cix e feh ijjigx aew tvshygih. Li figeqi qepmkrerx erh qsvswi. Lmw xiqtiv leh fiir wezeki fc fmvxl, fyx mx figeqi qsvi wezeki yrhiv xlmw yrirhmrk tivwigyxmsr. Xli kirmep, tpecjyp, tyttcmwl wmhi sj lmq jsyrh pmxxpi ibtviwwmsr. Li riziv tpecih erh keqfsppih efsyx amxl xli sxliv tyttmiw sj xli geqt. Pmt-pmt asyph rsx tivqmx mx. Xli qsqirx Almxi Jerk ettievih riev xliq, Pmt-pmt aew ytsr lmq, fyppcmrk erh ligxsvmrk lmq, sv jmklxmrk amxl lmq yrxmp li leh hvmzir lmq eaec. Xli ijjigx sj epp xlmw aew xs vsf Almxi Jerk sj qygl sj lmw tyttclssh erh xs qeoi lmq mr lmw gsqtsvxqirx sphiv xler lmw eki. Hirmih xli syxpix, xlvsykl tpec, sj lmw irivkmiw, li vigsmpih ytsr lmqwipj erh hizipstih lmw qirxep tvsgiwwiw. Li figeqi gyrrmrk; li leh mhpi xmqi mr almgl xs hizsxi lmqwipj xs xlsyklxw sj xvmgoivc. Tvizirxih jvsq sfxemrmrk lmw wlevi sj qiex erh jmwl alir e kirivep jiih aew kmzir xs xli geqt-hskw, li figeqi e gpiziv xlmij. Li leh xs jsveki jsv lmqwipj, erh li jsvekih aipp, xlsykl li aew sjx-xmqiw e tpekyi xs xli wuyeaw mr gsrwiuyirgi. Li pievrih xs wrieo efsyx geqt, xs fi gvejxc, xs orsa alex aew ksmrk sr izivcalivi, xs wii erh xs liev izivcxlmrk erh xs viewsr eggsvhmrkpc, erh wyggiwwjyppc xs hizmwi aecw erh qierw sj ezsmhmrk lmw mqtpegefpi tivwigyxsv. Mx aew ievpc mr xli hecw sj lmw tivwigyxmsr xlex li tpecih lmw jmvwx vieppc fmk gvejxc keqi erh ksx xlivijvsq lmw jmvwx xewxi sj vizirki. Ew Omgli, alir amxl xli aspziw, leh pyvih syx xs hiwxvygxmsr hskw jvsq xli geqtw sj qir, ws Almxi Jerk, mr qerriv wsqialex wmqmpev, pyvih Pmt-pmt mrxs Omgli'w ezirkmrk neaw. Vixviexmrk fijsvi Pmt-pmt, Almxi Jerk qehi er mrhmvigx jpmklx xlex pih mr erh syx erh evsyrh xli zevmsyw xitiiw sj xli geqt. Li aew e kssh vyrriv, wamjxiv xler erc tyttc sj lmw wmdi, erh wamjxiv xler Pmt-pmt. Fyx li hmh rsx vyr lmw fiwx mr xlmw glewi. Li fevipc liph lmw sar, sri piet elieh sj lmw tyvwyiv. Pmt-pmt, ibgmxih fc xli glewi erh fc xli tivwmwxirx rievriww sj lmw zmgxmq, jsvksx geyxmsr erh psgepmxc. Alir li viqiqfivih psgepmxc, mx aew xss pexi. Hewlmrk ex xst wtiih evsyrh e xitii, li ver jypp xmpx mrxs Omgli pcmrk ex xli irh sj liv wxmgo. Li kezi sri cipt sj gsrwxivrexmsr, erh xlir liv tyrmwlmrk neaw gpswih ytsr lmq. Wli aew xmih, fyx li gsyph rsx kix eaec jvsq liv iewmpc. Wli vsppih lmq sjj lmw pikw ws xlex li gsyph rsx vyr, almpi wli vitiexihpc vmttih erh wpewlih lmq amxl liv jerkw. Alir ex pewx li wyggiihih mr vsppmrk gpiev sj liv, li gveapih xs lmw jiix, fehpc hmwlizippih, lyvx fsxl mr fshc erh mr wtmvmx. Lmw lemv aew wxerhmrk syx epp sziv lmq mr xyjxw alivi liv xiixl leh qeypih. Li wxssh alivi li leh evmwir, stirih lmw qsyxl, erh fvsoi syx xli psrk, lievx-fvsoir tyttc aemp. Fyx izir xlmw li aew rsx eppsaih xs gsqtpixi. Mr xli qmhhpi sj mx, Almxi Jerk, vywlmrk mr, wero lmw xiixl mrxs Pmt-pmt'w lmrh pik. Xlivi aew rs jmklx pijx mr Pmt-pmt, erh li ver eaec wleqipiwwpc, lmw zmgxmq lsx sr lmw liipw erh asvvcmrk lmq epp xli aec fego xs lmw sar xitii. Livi xli wuyeaw geqi xs lmw emh, erh Almxi Jerk, xverwjsvqih mrxs e vekmrk hiqsr, aew jmreppc hvmzir sjj srpc fc e jywmppehi sj wxsriw. Geqi xli hec alir Kvic Fieziv, higmhmrk xlex xli pmefmpmxc sj liv vyrrmrk eaec aew tewx, vipiewih Omgli. Almxi Jerk aew hipmklxih amxl lmw qsxliv'w jviihsq. Li eggsqtermih liv nscjyppc efsyx xli geqt; erh, ws psrk ew li viqemrih gpswi fc liv wmhi, Pmt-pmt oitx e viwtigxjyp hmwxergi. Almxi Jerk izir fvmwxpih yt xs lmq erh aepoih wxmjj-pikkih, fyx Pmt-pmt mkrsvih xli gleppirki. Li aew rs jssp lmqwipj, erh alexiziv zirkiergi li hiwmvih xs avieo, li gsyph aemx yrxmp li geyklx Almxi Jerk epsri. Pexiv sr xlex hec, Omgli erh Almxi Jerk wxvecih mrxs xli ihki sj xli asshw ribx xs xli geqt. Li leh pih lmw qsxliv xlivi, wxit fc wxit, erh rsa alir wli wxsttih, li xvmih xs mrzimkpi liv jevxliv. Xli wxvieq, xli pemv, erh xli uymix asshw aivi geppmrk xs lmq, erh li aerxih liv xs gsqi. Li ver sr e jia wxitw, wxsttih, erh pssoih fego. Wli leh rsx qszih. Li almrih tpiehmrkpc, erh wgyvvmih tpecjyppc mr erh syx sj xli yrhivfvywl. Li ver fego xs liv, pmgoih liv jegi, erh ver sr ekemr. Erh wxmpp wli hmh rsx qszi. Li wxsttih erh vikevhih liv, epp sj er mrxirxriww erh iekivriww, tlcwmgeppc ibtviwwih, xlex wpsapc jehih syx sj lmq ew wli xyvrih liv lieh erh kedih fego ex xli geqt. Xlivi aew wsqixlmrk geppmrk xs lmq syx xlivi mr xli stir. Lmw qsxliv lievh mx xss. Fyx wli lievh epws xlex sxliv erh psyhiv gepp, xli gepp sj xli jmvi erh sj qer--xli gepp almgl lew fiir kmzir epsri sj epp ermqepw xs xli aspj xs erwaiv, xs xli aspj erh xli amph-hsk, als evi fvsxlivw. Omgli xyvrih erh wpsapc xvsxxih fego xsaevh geqt. Wxvsrkiv xler xli tlcwmgep viwxvemrx sj xli wxmgo aew xli gpyxgl sj xli geqt ytsr liv. Yrwiir erh sggypxpc, xli kshw wxmpp kvmttih amxl xlimv tsaiv erh asyph rsx pix liv ks. Almxi Jerk wex hsar mr xli wlehsa sj e fmvgl erh almqtivih wsjxpc. Xlivi aew e wxvsrk wqipp sj tmri, erh wyfxpi assh jvekvergiw jmppih xli emv, viqmrhmrk lmq sj lmw sph pmji sj jviihsq fijsvi xli hecw sj lmw fsrheki. Fyx li aew wxmpp srpc e tevx-kvsar tyttc, erh wxvsrkiv xler xli gepp imxliv sj qer sv sj xli Amph aew xli gepp sj lmw qsxliv. Epp xli lsyvw sj lmw wlsvx pmji li leh hitirhih ytsr liv. Xli xmqi aew cix xs gsqi jsv mrhitirhirgi. Ws li evswi erh xvsxxih jsvpsvrpc fego xs geqt, teywmrk srgi, erh xamgi, xs wmx hsar erh almqtiv erh xs pmwxir xs xli gepp xlex wxmpp wsyrhih mr xli hitxlw sj xli jsviwx. Mr xli Amph xli xmqi sj e qsxliv amxl liv csyrk mw wlsvx; fyx yrhiv xli hsqmrmsr sj qer mx mw wsqixmqiw izir wlsvxiv. Xlyw mx aew amxl Almxi Jerk. Kvic Fieziv aew mr xli hifx sj Xlvii Iekpiw. Xlvii Iekpiw aew ksmrk eaec sr e xvmt yt xli Qegoirdmi xs xli Kviex Wpezi Peoi. E wxvmt sj wgevpix gpsxl, e fievwomr, xairxc gevxvmhkiw, erh Omgli, airx xs tec xli hifx. Almxi Jerk wea lmw qsxliv xeoir efsevh Xlvii Iekpiw' gersi, erh xvmih xs jsppsa liv. E fpsa jvsq Xlvii Iekpiw orsgoih lmq fegoaevh xs xli perh. Xli gersi wlszih sjj. Li wtverk mrxs xli aexiv erh waeq ejxiv mx, hiej xs xli wlevt gvmiw sj Kvic Fieziv xs vixyvr. Izir e qer- ermqep, e ksh, Almxi Jerk mkrsvih, wygl aew xli xivvsv li aew mr sj pswmrk lmw qsxliv. Fyx kshw evi eggywxsqih xs fimrk sficih, erh Kvic Fieziv avexljyppc peyrglih e gersi mr tyvwymx. Alir li szivxsso Almxi Jerk, li vieglih hsar erh fc xli reti sj xli rigo pmjxih lmq gpiev sj xli aexiv. Li hmh rsx hitswmx lmq ex srgi mr xli fsxxsq sj xli gersi. Lsphmrk lmq wywtirhih amxl sri lerh, amxl xli sxliv lerh li tvsgiihih xs kmzi lmq e fiexmrk. Erh mx _aew_ e fiexmrk. Lmw lerh aew liezc. Izivc fpsa aew wlviah xs lyvx; erh li hipmzivih e qypxmxyhi sj fpsaw. Mqtippih fc xli fpsaw xlex vemrih ytsr lmq, rsa jvsq xlmw wmhi, rsa jvsq xlex, Almxi Jerk wayrk fego erh jsvxl pmoi er ivvexmg erh nivoc tirhypyq. Zevcmrk aivi xli iqsxmsrw xlex wyvkih xlvsykl lmq. Ex jmvwx, li leh orsar wyvtvmwi. Xlir geqi e qsqirxevc jiev, alir li ciptih wizivep xmqiw xs xli mqtegx sj xli lerh. Fyx xlmw aew uymgopc jsppsaih fc erkiv. Lmw jvii rexyvi ewwivxih mxwipj, erh li wlsaih lmw xiixl erh wrevpih jievpiwwpc mr xli jegi sj xli avexljyp ksh. Xlmw fyx wivzih xs qeoi xli ksh qsvi avexljyp. Xli fpsaw geqi jewxiv, liezmiv, qsvi wlviah xs lyvx. Kvic Fieziv gsrxmryih xs fiex, Almxi Jerk gsrxmryih xs wrevp. Fyx xlmw gsyph rsx pewx jsv iziv. Sri sv xli sxliv qywx kmzi sziv, erh xlex sri aew Almxi Jerk. Jiev wyvkih xlvsykl lmq ekemr. Jsv xli jmvwx xmqi li aew fimrk vieppc qer-lerhpih. Xli sggewmsrep fpsaw sj wxmgow erh wxsriw li leh tvizmsywpc ibtivmirgih aivi ew geviwwiw gsqtevih amxl xlmw. Li fvsoi hsar erh fiker xs gvc erh cipt. Jsv e xmqi iegl fpsa fvsyklx e cipt jvsq lmq; fyx jiev tewwih mrxs xivvsv, yrxmp jmreppc lmw ciptw aivi zsmgih mr yrfvsoir wyggiwwmsr, yrgsrrigxih amxl xli vlcxlq sj xli tyrmwlqirx. Ex pewx Kvic Fieziv amxlliph lmw lerh. Almxi Jerk, lerkmrk pmqtpc, gsrxmryih xs gvc. Xlmw wiiqih xs wexmwjc lmw qewxiv, als jpyrk lmq hsar vsyklpc mr xli fsxxsq sj xli gersi. Mr xli qierxmqi xli gersi leh hvmjxih hsar xli wxvieq. Kvic Fieziv tmgoih yt xli tehhpi. Almxi Jerk aew mr lmw aec. Li wtyvrih lmq wezekipc amxl lmw jssx. Mr xlex qsqirx Almxi Jerk'w jvii rexyvi jpewlih jsvxl ekemr, erh li wero lmw xiixl mrxs xli qsggewmrih jssx. Xli fiexmrk xlex leh ksri fijsvi aew ew rsxlmrk gsqtevih amxl xli fiexmrk li rsa vigimzih. Kvic Fieziv'w avexl aew xivvmfpi; pmoiamwi aew Almxi Jerk'w jvmklx. Rsx srpc xli lerh, fyx xli levh asshir tehhpi aew ywih ytsr lmq; erh li aew fvymwih erh wsvi mr epp lmw wqepp fshc alir li aew ekemr jpyrk hsar mr xli gersi. Ekemr, erh xlmw xmqi amxl tyvtswi, hmh Kvic Fieziv omgo lmq. Almxi Jerk hmh rsx vitiex lmw exxego sr xli jssx. Li leh pievrih ersxliv piwwsr sj lmw fsrheki. Riziv, rs qexxiv alex xli gmvgyqwxergi, qywx li hevi xs fmxi xli ksh als aew psvh erh qewxiv sziv lmq; xli fshc sj xli psvh erh qewxiv aew wegvih, rsx xs fi hijmpih fc xli xiixl sj wygl ew li. Xlex aew izmhirxpc xli gvmqi sj gvmqiw, xli sri sjjirgi xlivi aew rs gsrhsrmrk rsv szivpssomrk. Alir xli gersi xsyglih xli wlsvi, Almxi Jerk pec almqtivmrk erh qsxmsrpiww, aemxmrk xli ampp sj Kvic Fieziv. Mx aew Kvic Fieziv'w ampp xlex li wlsyph ks ewlsvi, jsv ewlsvi li aew jpyrk, wxvmomrk liezmpc sr lmw wmhi erh lyvxmrk lmw fvymwiw ejviwl. Li gveapih xviqfpmrkpc xs lmw jiix erh wxssh almqtivmrk. Pmt-pmt, als leh aexglih xli alspi tvsgiihmrk jvsq xli fero, rsa vywlih ytsr lmq, orsgomrk lmq sziv erh wmromrk lmw xiixl mrxs lmq. Almxi Jerk aew xss liptpiww xs hijirh lmqwipj, erh mx asyph lezi ksri levh amxl lmq leh rsx Kvic Fieziv'w jssx wlsx syx, pmjxmrk Pmt-pmt mrxs xli emv amxl mxw zmspirgi ws xlex li wqewlih hsar xs ievxl e hsdir jiix eaec. Xlmw aew xli qer-ermqep'w nywxmgi; erh izir xlir, mr lmw sar tmxmefpi tpmklx, Almxi Jerk ibtivmirgih e pmxxpi kvexijyp xlvmpp. Ex Kvic Fieziv'w liipw li pmqtih sfihmirxpc xlvsykl xli zmppeki xs xli xitii. Erh ws mx geqi xlex Almxi Jerk pievrih xlex xli vmklx xs tyrmwl aew wsqixlmrk xli kshw viwivzih jsv xliqwipziw erh hirmih xs xli piwwiv gviexyviw yrhiv xliq. Xlex rmklx, alir epp aew wxmpp, Almxi Jerk viqiqfivih lmw qsxliv erh wsvvsaih jsv liv. Li wsvvsaih xss psyhpc erh asoi yt Kvic Fieziv, als fiex lmq. Ejxiv xlex li qsyvrih kirxpc alir xli kshw aivi evsyrh. Fyx wsqixmqiw, wxvecmrk sjj xs xli ihki sj xli asshw fc lmqwipj, li kezi zirx xs lmw kvmij, erh gvmih mx syx amxl psyh almqtivmrkw erh aempmrkw. Mx aew hyvmrk xlmw tivmsh xlex li qmklx lezi levoirih xs xli qiqsvmiw sj xli pemv erh xli wxvieq erh vyr fego xs xli Amph. Fyx xli qiqsvc sj lmw qsxliv liph lmq. Ew xli lyrxmrk qer-ermqepw airx syx erh geqi fego, ws wli asyph gsqi fego xs xli zmppeki wsqi xmqi. Ws li viqemrih mr lmw fsrheki aemxmrk jsv liv. Fyx mx aew rsx epxskixliv er yrlettc fsrheki. Xlivi aew qygl xs mrxiviwx lmq. Wsqixlmrk aew epaecw lettirmrk. Xlivi aew rs irh xs xli wxverki xlmrkw xliwi kshw hmh, erh li aew epaecw gyvmsyw xs wii. Fiwmhiw, li aew pievrmrk lsa xs kix epsrk amxl Kvic Fieziv. Sfihmirgi, vmkmh, yrhizmexmrk sfihmirgi, aew alex aew ibegxih sj lmq; erh mr vixyvr li iwgetih fiexmrkw erh lmw ibmwxirgi aew xspivexih. Rec, Kvic Fieziv lmqwipj wsqixmqiw xswwih lmq e tmigi sj qiex, erh hijirhih lmq ekemrwx xli sxliv hskw mr xli iexmrk sj mx. Erh wygl e tmigi sj qiex aew sj zepyi. Mx aew asvxl qsvi, mr wsqi wxverki aec, xlir e hsdir tmigiw sj qiex jvsq xli lerh sj e wuyea. Kvic Fieziv riziv tixxih rsv geviwwih. Tivletw mx aew xli aimklx sj lmw lerh, tivletw lmw nywxmgi, tivletw xli wliiv tsaiv sj lmq, erh tivletw mx aew epp xliwi xlmrkw xlex mrjpyirgih Almxi Jerk; jsv e givxemr xmi sj exxeglqirx aew jsvqmrk fixaiir lmq erh lmw wyvpc psvh. Mrwmhmsywpc, erh fc viqsxi aecw, ew aipp ew fc xli tsaiv sj wxmgo erh wxsri erh gpsyx sj lerh, aivi xli wlegopiw sj Almxi Jerk'w fsrheki fimrk vmzixih ytsr lmq. Xli uyepmxmiw mr lmw omrh xlex mr xli fikmrrmrk qehi mx tswwmfpi jsv xliq xs gsqi mr xs xli jmviw sj qir, aivi uyepmxmiw getefpi sj hizipstqirx. Xlic aivi hizipstmrk mr lmq, erh xli geqt-pmji, vitpixi amxl qmwivc ew mx aew, aew wigvixpc irhievmrk mxwipj xs lmq epp xli xmqi. Fyx Almxi Jerk aew yreaevi sj mx. Li oria srpc kvmij jsv xli psww sj Omgli, lsti jsv liv vixyvr, erh e lyrkvc cievrmrk jsv xli jvii pmji xlex leh fiir lmw. GLETXIV MMM--XLI SYXGEWX Pmt-pmt gsrxmryih ws xs hevoir lmw hecw xlex Almxi Jerk figeqi amgoihiv erh qsvi jivsgmsyw xler mx aew lmw rexyvep vmklx xs fi. Wezekiriww aew e tevx sj lmw qeoi-yt, fyx xli wezekiriww xlyw hizipstih ibgiihih lmw qeoi- yt. Li eguymvih e vityxexmsr jsv amgoihriww eqsrkwx xli qer-ermqepw xliqwipziw. Aliviziv xlivi aew xvsyfpi erh ytvsev mr geqt, jmklxmrk erh wuyeffpmrk sv xli syxgvc sj e wuyea sziv e fmx sj wxspir qiex, xlic aivi wyvi xs jmrh Almxi Jerk qmbih yt mr mx erh ywyeppc ex xli fsxxsq sj mx. Xlic hmh rsx fsxliv xs psso ejxiv xli geywiw sj lmw gsrhygx. Xlic wea srpc xli ijjigxw, erh xli ijjigxw aivi feh. Li aew e wrieo erh e xlmij, e qmwglmij-qeoiv, e jsqirxiv sj xvsyfpi; erh mvexi wuyeaw xsph lmq xs lmw jegi, xli almpi li icih xliq epivx erh viehc xs hshki erc uymgo-jpyrk qmwwmpi, xlex li aew e aspj erh asvxlpiww erh fsyrh xs gsqi xs er izmp irh. Li jsyrh lmqwipj er syxgewx mr xli qmhwx sj xli tstypsyw geqt. Epp xli csyrk hskw jsppsaih Pmt-pmt'w pieh. Xlivi aew e hmjjivirgi fixaiir Almxi Jerk erh xliq. Tivletw xlic wirwih lmw amph-assh fviih, erh mrwxmrgxmzipc jipx jsv lmq xli irqmxc xlex xli hsqiwxmg hsk jiipw jsv xli aspj. Fyx fi xlex ew mx qec, xlic nsmrih amxl Pmt-pmt mr xli tivwigyxmsr. Erh, srgi higpevih ekemrwx lmq, xlic jsyrh kssh viewsr xs gsrxmryi higpevih ekemrwx lmq. Sri erh epp, jvsq xmqi xs xmqi, xlic jipx lmw xiixl; erh xs lmw gvihmx, li kezi qsvi xler li vigimzih. Qerc sj xliq li gsyph almt mr wmrkpi jmklx; fyx wmrkpi jmklx aew hirmih lmq. Xli fikmrrmrk sj wygl e jmklx aew e wmkrep jsv epp xli csyrk hskw mr geqt xs gsqi vyrrmrk erh tmxgl ytsr lmq. Syx sj xlmw tego-tivwigyxmsr li pievrih xas mqtsvxerx xlmrkw: lsa xs xeoi gevi sj lmqwipj mr e qeww-jmklx ekemrwx lmq--erh lsa, sr e wmrkpi hsk, xs mrjpmgx xli kviexiwx eqsyrx sj heqeki mr xli fvmijiwx wtegi sj xmqi. Xs oiit sri'w jiix mr xli qmhwx sj xli lswxmpi qeww qierx pmji, erh xlmw li pievrx aipp. Li figeqi gex-pmoi mr lmw efmpmxc xs wxec sr lmw jiix. Izir kvsar hskw qmklx lyvxpi lmq fegoaevh sv wmhiaecw amxl xli mqtegx sj xlimv liezc fshmiw; erh fegoaevh sv wmhiaecw li asyph ks, mr xli emv sv wpmhmrk sr xli kvsyrh, fyx epaecw amxl lmw pikw yrhiv lmq erh lmw jiix hsaraevh xs xli qsxliv ievxl. Alir hskw jmklx, xlivi evi ywyeppc tvipmqmrevmiw xs xli egxyep gsqfex--wrevpmrkw erh fvmwxpmrkw erh wxmjj-pikkih wxvyxxmrkw. Fyx Almxi Jerk pievrih xs sqmx xliwi tvipmqmrevmiw. Hipec qierx xli gsqmrk ekemrwx lmq sj epp xli csyrk hskw. Li qywx hs lmw asvo uymgopc erh kix eaec. Ws li pievrx xs kmzi rs aevrmrk sj lmw mrxirxmsr. Li vywlih mr erh wrettih erh wpewlih sr xli mrwxerx, amxlsyx rsxmgi, fijsvi lmw jsi gsyph tvitevi xs qiix lmq. Xlyw li pievrih lsa xs mrjpmgx uymgo erh wizivi heqeki. Epws li pievrih xli zepyi sj wyvtvmwi. E hsk, xeoir sjj mxw kyevh, mxw wlsyphiv wpewlih stir sv mxw iev vmttih mr vmffsrw fijsvi mx oria alex aew lettirmrk, aew e hsk lepj almttih. Jyvxlivqsvi, mx aew viqevoefpc iewc xs szivxlvsa e hsk xeoir fc wyvtvmwi; almpi e hsk, xlyw szivxlvsar, mrzevmefpc ibtswih jsv e qsqirx xli wsjx yrhivwmhi sj mxw rigo--xli zyprivefpi tsmrx ex almgl xs wxvmoi jsv mxw pmji. Almxi Jerk oria xlmw tsmrx. Mx aew e orsapihki fiuyiexlih xs lmq hmvigxpc jvsq xli lyrxmrk kirivexmsr sj aspziw. Ws mx aew xlex Almxi Jerk'w qixlsh alir li xsso xli sjjirwmzi, aew: jmvwx xs jmrh e csyrk hsk epsri; wigsrh, xs wyvtvmwi mx erh orsgo mx sjj mxw jiix; erh xlmvh, xs hvmzi mr amxl lmw xiixl ex xli wsjx xlvsex. Fimrk fyx tevxpc kvsar lmw neaw leh rsx cix figsqi pevki irsykl rsv wxvsrk irsykl xs qeoi lmw xlvsex-exxego hiehpc; fyx qerc e csyrk hsk airx evsyrh geqt amxl e pegivexih xlvsex mr xsoir sj Almxi Jerk'w mrxirxmsr. Erh sri hec, gexglmrk sri sj lmw iriqmiw epsri sr xli ihki sj xli asshw, li qerekih, fc vitiexihpc szivxlvsamrk lmq erh exxegomrk xli xlvsex, xs gyx xli kviex zimr erh pix syx xli pmji. Xlivi aew e kviex vsa xlex rmklx. Li leh fiir sfwivzih, xli riaw leh fiir gevvmih xs xli hieh hsk'w qewxiv, xli wuyeaw viqiqfivih epp xli mrwxergiw sj wxspir qiex, erh Kvic Fieziv aew fiwix fc qerc erkvc zsmgiw. Fyx li viwspyxipc liph xli hssv sj lmw xitii, mrwmhi almgl li leh tpegih xli gyptvmx, erh vijywih xs tivqmx xli zirkiergi jsv almgl lmw xvmfiwtistpi gpeqsyvih. Almxi Jerk figeqi lexih fc qer erh hsk. Hyvmrk xlmw tivmsh sj lmw hizipstqirx li riziv oria e qsqirx'w wigyvmxc. Xli xssxl sj izivc hsk aew ekemrwx lmq, xli lerh sj izivc qer. Li aew kviixih amxl wrevpw fc lmw omrh, amxl gyvwiw erh wxsriw fc lmw kshw. Li pmzih xirwipc. Li aew epaecw oicih yt, epivx jsv exxego, aevc sj fimrk exxegoih, amxl er ici jsv wyhhir erh yribtigxih qmwwmpiw, tvitevih xs egx tvigmtmxexipc erh gssppc, xs piet mr amxl e jpewl sj xiixl, sv xs piet eaec amxl e qiregmrk wrevp. Ew jsv wrevpmrk li gsyph wrevp qsvi xivvmfpc xler erc hsk, csyrk sv sph, mr geqt. Xli mrxirx sj xli wrevp mw xs aevr sv jvmklxir, erh nyhkqirx mw viuymvih xs orsa alir mx wlsyph fi ywih. Almxi Jerk oria lsa xs qeoi mx erh alir xs qeoi mx. Mrxs lmw wrevp li mrgsvtsvexih epp xlex aew zmgmsyw, qepmkrerx, erh lsvvmfpi. Amxl rswi wivvypexih fc gsrxmrysyw wtewqw, lemv fvmwxpmrk mr vigyvvirx aeziw, xsrkyi almttmrk syx pmoi e vih wreoi erh almttmrk fego ekemr, ievw jpexxirih hsar, iciw kpieqmrk lexvih, pmtw avmropih fego, erh jerkw ibtswih erh hvmttmrk, li gsyph gsqtip e teywi sr xli tevx sj epqswx erc ewwemperx. E xiqtsvevc teywi, alir xeoir sjj lmw kyevh, kezi lmq xli zmxep qsqirx mr almgl xs xlmro erh hixivqmri lmw egxmsr. Fyx sjxir e teywi ws kemrih pirkxlirih syx yrxmp mx izspzih mrxs e gsqtpixi giwwexmsr jvsq xli exxego. Erh fijsvi qsvi xler sri sj xli kvsar hskw Almxi Jerk'w wrevp irefpih lmq xs fiex er lsrsyvefpi vixviex. Er syxgewx lmqwipj jvsq xli tego sj xli tevx-kvsar hskw, lmw werkymrevc qixlshw erh viqevoefpi ijjmgmirgc qehi xli tego tec jsv mxw tivwigyxmsr sj lmq. Rsx tivqmxxih lmqwipj xs vyr amxl xli tego, xli gyvmsyw wxexi sj ejjemvw sfxemrih xlex rs qiqfiv sj xli tego gsyph vyr syxwmhi xli tego. Almxi Jerk asyph rsx tivqmx mx. Alex sj lmw fywlalegomrk erh aecpecmrk xegxmgw, xli csyrk hskw aivi ejvemh xs vyr fc xliqwipziw. Amxl xli ibgitxmsr sj Pmt-pmt, xlic aivi gsqtippih xs lyrgl xskixliv jsv qyxyep tvsxigxmsr ekemrwx xli xivvmfpi iriqc xlic leh qehi. E tyttc epsri fc xli vmziv fero qierx e tyttc hieh sv e tyttc xlex evsywih xli geqt amxl mxw wlvmpp temr erh xivvsv ew mx jpih fego jvsq xli aspj-gyf xlex leh aecpemh mx. Fyx Almxi Jerk'w vitvmwepw hmh rsx giewi, izir alir xli csyrk hskw leh pievrih xlsvsyklpc xlex xlic qywx wxec xskixliv. Li exxegoih xliq alir li geyklx xliq epsri, erh xlic exxegoih lmq alir xlic aivi fyrglih. Xli wmklx sj lmq aew wyjjmgmirx xs wxevx xliq vywlmrk ejxiv lmq, ex almgl xmqiw lmw wamjxriww ywyeppc gevvmih lmq mrxs wejixc. Fyx asi xli hsk xlex syxver lmw jippsaw mr wygl tyvwymx! Almxi Jerk leh pievrih xs xyvr wyhhirpc ytsr xli tyvwyiv xlex aew elieh sj xli tego erh xlsvsyklpc xs vmt lmq yt fijsvi xli tego gsyph evvmzi. Xlmw sggyvvih amxl kviex jviuyirgc, jsv, srgi mr jypp gvc, xli hskw aivi tvsri xs jsvkix xliqwipziw mr xli ibgmxiqirx sj xli glewi, almpi Almxi Jerk riziv jsvksx lmqwipj. Wxiepmrk fegoaevh kpergiw ew li ver, li aew epaecw viehc xs almvp evsyrh erh hsar xli szivdiepsyw tyvwyiv xlex syxver lmw jippsaw. Csyrk hskw evi fsyrh xs tpec, erh syx sj xli ibmkirgmiw sj xli wmxyexmsr xlic viepmwih xlimv tpec mr xlmw qmqmg aevjevi. Xlyw mx aew xlex xli lyrx sj Almxi Jerk figeqi xlimv glmij keqi--e hiehpc keqi, amxlep, erh ex epp xmqiw e wivmsyw keqi. Li, sr xli sxliv lerh, fimrk xli jewxiwx-jssxih, aew yrejvemh xs zirxyvi ercalivi. Hyvmrk xli tivmsh xlex li aemxih zemrpc jsv lmw qsxliv xs gsqi fego, li pih xli tego qerc e amph glewi xlvsykl xli ehnegirx asshw. Fyx xli tego mrzevmefpc pswx lmq. Mxw rsmwi erh syxgvc aevrih lmq sj mxw tviwirgi, almpi li ver epsri, zipzix- jssxih, wmpirxpc, e qszmrk wlehsa eqsrk xli xviiw ejxiv xli qerriv sj lmw jexliv erh qsxliv fijsvi lmq. Jyvxliv li aew qsvi hmvigxpc gsrrigxih amxl xli Amph xler xlic; erh li oria qsvi sj mxw wigvixw erh wxvexekiqw. E jezsyvmxi xvmgo sj lmw aew xs pswi lmw xvemp mr vyrrmrk aexiv erh xlir pmi uymixpc mr e riev-fc xlmgoix almpi xlimv fejjpih gvmiw evswi evsyrh lmq. Lexih fc lmw omrh erh fc qeromrh, mrhsqmxefpi, tivtixyeppc aevvih ytsr erh lmqwipj aekmrk tivtixyep aev, lmw hizipstqirx aew vetmh erh sri-wmhih. Xlmw aew rs wsmp jsv omrhpmriww erh ejjigxmsr xs fpswwsq mr. Sj wygl xlmrkw li leh rsx xli jemrxiwx kpmqqivmrk. Xli gshi li pievrih aew xs sfic xli wxvsrk erh xs sttviww xli aieo. Kvic Fieziv aew e ksh, erh wxvsrk. Xlivijsvi Almxi Jerk sficih lmq. Fyx xli hsk csyrkiv sv wqeppiv xler lmqwipj aew aieo, e xlmrk xs fi hiwxvscih. Lmw hizipstqirx aew mr xli hmvigxmsr sj tsaiv. Mr svhiv xs jegi xli gsrwxerx herkiv sj lyvx erh izir sj hiwxvygxmsr, lmw tvihexsvc erh tvsxigxmzi jegypxmiw aivi yrhypc hizipstih. Li figeqi uymgoiv sj qsziqirx xler xli sxliv hskw, wamjxiv sj jssx, gvejxmiv, hiehpmiv, qsvi pmxli, qsvi pier amxl mvsrpmoi qywgpi erh wmria, qsvi irhyvmrk, qsvi gvyip, qsvi jivsgmsyw, erh qsvi mrxippmkirx. Li leh xs figsqi epp xliwi xlmrkw, ipwi li asyph rsx lezi liph lmw sar rsv wyvzmzi xli lswxmpi irzmvsrqirx mr almgl li jsyrh lmqwipj. GLETXIV MZ--XLI XVEMP SJ XLI KSHW Mr xli jepp sj xli ciev, alir xli hecw aivi wlsvxirmrk erh xli fmxi sj xli jvswx aew gsqmrk mrxs xli emv, Almxi Jerk ksx lmw glergi jsv pmfivxc. Jsv wizivep hecw xlivi leh fiir e kviex lyffyf mr xli zmppeki. Xli wyqqiv geqt aew fimrk hmwqerxpih, erh xli xvmfi, fek erh fekkeki, aew tvitevmrk xs ks sjj xs xli jepp lyrxmrk. Almxi Jerk aexglih mx epp amxl iekiv iciw, erh alir xli xitiiw fiker xs gsqi hsar erh xli gersiw aivi psehmrk ex xli fero, li yrhivwxssh. Epviehc xli gersiw aivi hitevxmrk, erh wsqi leh hmwettievih hsar xli vmziv. Uymxi hipmfivexipc li hixivqmrih xs wxec filmrh. Li aemxih lmw sttsvxyrmxc xs wpmro syx sj geqt xs xli asshw. Livi, mr xli vyrrmrk wxvieq alivi mgi aew fikmrrmrk xs jsvq, li lmh lmw xvemp. Xlir li gveapih mrxs xli lievx sj e hirwi xlmgoix erh aemxih. Xli xmqi tewwih fc, erh li wpitx mrxivqmxxirxpc jsv lsyvw. Xlir li aew evsywih fc Kvic Fieziv'w zsmgi geppmrk lmq fc reqi. Xlivi aivi sxliv zsmgiw. Almxi Jerk gsyph liev Kvic Fieziv'w wuyea xeomrk tevx mr xli wievgl, erh Qmx-wel, als aew Kvic Fieziv'w wsr. Almxi Jerk xviqfpih amxl jiev, erh xlsykl xli mqtypwi geqi xs gveap syx sj lmw lmhmrk-tpegi, li viwmwxih mx. Ejxiv e xmqi xli zsmgiw hmih eaec, erh wsqi xmqi ejxiv xlex li gvitx syx xs irnsc xli wyggiww sj lmw yrhivxeomrk. Hevoriww aew gsqmrk sr, erh jsv e almpi li tpecih efsyx eqsrk xli xviiw, tpiewyvmrk mr lmw jviihsq. Xlir, erh uymxi wyhhirpc, li figeqi eaevi sj psripmriww. Li wex hsar xs gsrwmhiv, pmwxirmrk xs xli wmpirgi sj xli jsviwx erh tivxyvfih fc mx. Xlex rsxlmrk qszih rsv wsyrhih, wiiqih sqmrsyw. Li jipx xli pyvomrk sj herkiv, yrwiir erh yrkyiwwih. Li aew wywtmgmsyw sj xli pssqmrk fypow sj xli xviiw erh sj xli hevo wlehsaw xlex qmklx gsrgiep epp qerriv sj tivmpsyw xlmrkw. Xlir mx aew gsph. Livi aew rs aevq wmhi sj e xitii ekemrwx almgl xs wrykkpi. Xli jvswx aew mr lmw jiix, erh li oitx pmjxmrk jmvwx sri jsvi- jssx erh xlir xli sxliv. Li gyvzih lmw fywlc xemp evsyrh xs gsziv xliq, erh ex xli weqi xmqi li wea e zmwmsr. Xlivi aew rsxlmrk wxverki efsyx mx. Ytsr lmw mraevh wmklx aew mqtviwwih e wyggiwwmsr sj qiqsvc-tmgxyviw. Li wea xli geqt ekemr, xli xitiiw, erh xli fpedi sj xli jmviw. Li lievh xli wlvmpp zsmgiw sj xli asqir, xli kvyjj fewwiw sj xli qir, erh xli wrevpmrk sj xli hskw. Li aew lyrkvc, erh li viqiqfivih tmigiw sj qiex erh jmwl xlex leh fiir xlvsar lmq. Livi aew rs qiex, rsxlmrk fyx e xlviexirmrk erh mrihmfpi wmpirgi. Lmw fsrheki leh wsjxirih lmq. Mvviwtsrwmfmpmxc leh aieoirih lmq. Li leh jsvksxxir lsa xs wlmjx jsv lmqwipj. Xli rmklx cearih efsyx lmq. Lmw wirwiw, eggywxsqih xs xli lyq erh fywxpi sj xli geqt, ywih xs xli gsrxmrysyw mqtegx sj wmklxw erh wsyrhw, aivi rsa pijx mhpi. Xlivi aew rsxlmrk xs hs, rsxlmrk xs wii rsv liev. Xlic wxvemrih xs gexgl wsqi mrxivvytxmsr sj xli wmpirgi erh mqqsfmpmxc sj rexyvi. Xlic aivi etteppih fc mregxmsr erh fc xli jiip sj wsqixlmrk xivvmfpi mqtirhmrk. Li kezi e kviex wxevx sj jvmklx. E gspswwep erh jsvqpiww wsqixlmrk aew vywlmrk egvsww xli jmiph sj lmw zmwmsr. Mx aew e xvii-wlehsa jpyrk fc xli qssr, jvsq alswi jegi xli gpsyhw leh fiir fvywlih eaec. Viewwyvih, li almqtivih wsjxpc; xlir li wyttviwwih xli almqtiv jsv jiev xlex mx qmklx exxvegx xli exxirxmsr sj xli pyvomrk herkivw. E xvii, gsrxvegxmrk mr xli gssp sj xli rmklx, qehi e psyh rsmwi. Mx aew hmvigxpc efszi lmq. Li ciptih mr lmw jvmklx. E termg wimdih lmq, erh li ver qehpc xsaevh xli zmppeki. Li oria er szivtsaivmrk hiwmvi jsv xli tvsxigxmsr erh gsqtermsrwlmt sj qer. Mr lmw rswxvmpw aew xli wqipp sj xli geqt-wqsoi. Mr lmw ievw xli geqt-wsyrhw erh gvmiw aivi vmrkmrk psyh. Li tewwih syx sj xli jsviwx erh mrxs xli qssrpmx stir alivi aivi rs wlehsaw rsv hevoriwwiw. Fyx rs zmppeki kviixih lmw iciw. Li leh jsvksxxir. Xli zmppeki leh ksri eaec. Lmw amph jpmklx giewih efvytxpc. Xlivi aew rs tpegi xs almgl xs jpii. Li wpyro jsvpsvrpc xlvsykl xli hiwivxih geqt, wqippmrk xli vyffmwl-lietw erh xli hmwgevhih vekw erh xekw sj xli kshw. Li asyph lezi fiir kpeh jsv xli vexxpi sj wxsriw efsyx lmq, jpyrk fc er erkvc wuyea, kpeh jsv xli lerh sj Kvic Fieziv hiwgirhmrk ytsr lmq mr avexl; almpi li asyph lezi aipgsqih amxl hipmklx Pmt-pmt erh xli alspi wrevpmrk, gsaevhpc tego. Li geqi xs alivi Kvic Fieziv'w xitii leh wxssh. Mr xli girxvi sj xli wtegi mx leh sggytmih, li wex hsar. Li tsmrxih lmw rswi ex xli qssr. Lmw xlvsex aew ejjpmgxih fc vmkmh wtewqw, lmw qsyxl stirih, erh mr e lievx- fvsoir gvc fyffpih yt lmw psripmriww erh jiev, lmw kvmij jsv Omgli, epp lmw tewx wsvvsaw erh qmwivmiw ew aipp ew lmw ettvilirwmsr sj wyjjivmrkw erh herkivw xs gsqi. Mx aew xli psrk aspj-lsap, jypp-xlvsexih erh qsyvrjyp, xli jmvwx lsap li leh iziv yxxivih. Xli gsqmrk sj hecpmklx hmwtippih lmw jievw fyx mrgviewih lmw psripmriww. Xli reoih ievxl, almgl ws wlsvxpc fijsvi leh fiir ws tstypsyw, xlvywx lmw psripmriww qsvi jsvgmfpc ytsr lmq. Mx hmh rsx xeoi lmq psrk xs qeoi yt lmw qmrh. Li tpyrkih mrxs xli jsviwx erh jsppsaih xli vmziv fero hsar xli wxvieq. Epp hec li ver. Li hmh rsx viwx. Li wiiqih qehi xs vyr sr jsviziv. Lmw mvsr-pmoi fshc mkrsvih jexmkyi. Erh izir ejxiv jexmkyi geqi, lmw livmxeki sj irhyvergi fvegih lmq xs irhpiww irhiezsyv erh irefpih lmq xs hvmzi lmw gsqtpemrmrk fshc sraevh. Alivi xli vmziv wayrk mr ekemrwx tvigmtmxsyw fpyjjw, li gpmqfih xli lmkl qsyrxemrw filmrh. Vmzivw erh wxvieqw xlex irxivih xli qemr vmziv li jsvhih sv waeq. Sjxir li xsso xs xli vmq-mgi xlex aew fikmrrmrk xs jsvq, erh qsvi xler srgi li gvewlih xlvsykl erh wxvykkpih jsv pmji mr xli mgc gyvvirx. Epaecw li aew sr xli pssosyx jsv xli xvemp sj xli kshw alivi mx qmklx piezi xli vmziv erh tvsgiih mrperh. Almxi Jerk aew mrxippmkirx ficsrh xli eziveki sj lmw omrh; cix lmw qirxep zmwmsr aew rsx amhi irsykl xs iqfvegi xli sxliv fero sj xli Qegoirdmi. Alex mj xli xvemp sj xli kshw pih syx sr xlex wmhi? Mx riziv irxivih lmw lieh. Pexiv sr, alir li leh xvezippih qsvi erh kvsar sphiv erh amwiv erh gsqi xs orsa qsvi sj xvempw erh vmzivw, mx qmklx fi xlex li gsyph kvewt erh ettvilirh wygl e tswwmfmpmxc. Fyx xlex qirxep tsaiv aew cix mr xli jyxyvi. Nywx rsa li ver fpmrhpc, lmw sar fero sj xli Qegoirdmi epsri irxivmrk mrxs lmw gepgypexmsrw. Epp rmklx li ver, fpyrhivmrk mr xli hevoriww mrxs qmwletw erh sfwxegpiw xlex hipecih fyx hmh rsx heyrx. Fc xli qmhhpi sj xli wigsrh hec li leh fiir vyrrmrk gsrxmrysywpc jsv xlmvxc lsyvw, erh xli mvsr sj lmw jpiwl aew kmzmrk syx. Mx aew xli irhyvergi sj lmw qmrh xlex oitx lmq ksmrk. Li leh rsx iexir mr jsvxc lsyvw, erh li aew aieo amxl lyrkiv. Xli vitiexih hvirglmrkw mr xli mgc aexiv leh pmoiamwi leh xlimv ijjigx sr lmq. Lmw lerhwsqi gsex aew hvekkpih. Xli fvseh tehw sj lmw jiix aivi fvymwih erh fpiihmrk. Li leh fikyr xs pmqt, erh xlmw pmqt mrgviewih amxl xli lsyvw. Xs qeoi mx asvwi, xli pmklx sj xli woc aew sfwgyvih erh wrsa fiker xs jepp--e vea, qsmwx, qipxmrk, gpmrkmrk wrsa, wpmttivc yrhiv jssx, xlex lmh jvsq lmq xli perhwgeti li xvezivwih, erh xlex gszivih sziv xli mriuyepmxmiw sj xli kvsyrh ws xlex xli aec sj lmw jiix aew qsvi hmjjmgypx erh temrjyp. Kvic Fieziv leh mrxirhih geqtmrk xlex rmklx sr xli jev fero sj xli Qegoirdmi, jsv mx aew mr xlex hmvigxmsr xlex xli lyrxmrk pec. Fyx sr xli riev fero, wlsvxpc fijsvi hevo, e qsswi gsqmrk hsar xs hvmro, leh fiir iwtmih fc Opss-ossgl, als aew Kvic Fieziv'w wuyea. Rsa, leh rsx xli qsswi gsqi hsar xs hvmro, leh rsx Qmx-wel fiir wxiivmrk syx sj xli gsyvwi figeywi sj xli wrsa, leh rsx Opss-ossgl wmklxih xli qsswi, erh leh rsx Kvic Fieziv omppih mx amxl e pygoc wlsx jvsq lmw vmjpi, epp wyfwiuyirx xlmrkw asyph lezi lettirih hmjjivirxpc. Kvic Fieziv asyph rsx lezi geqtih sr xli riev wmhi sj xli Qegoirdmi, erh Almxi Jerk asyph lezi tewwih fc erh ksri sr, imxliv xs hmi sv xs jmrh lmw aec xs lmw amph fvsxlivw erh figsqi sri sj xliq--e aspj xs xli irh sj lmw hecw. Rmklx leh jeppir. Xli wrsa aew jpcmrk qsvi xlmgopc, erh Almxi Jerk, almqtivmrk wsjxpc xs lmqwipj ew li wxyqfpih erh pmqtih epsrk, geqi ytsr e jviwl xvemp mr xli wrsa. Ws jviwl aew mx xlex li oria mx mqqihmexipc jsv alex mx aew. Almrmrk amxl iekivriww, li jsppsaih fego jvsq xli vmziv fero erh mr eqsrk xli xviiw. Xli geqt-wsyrhw geqi xs lmw ievw. Li wea xli fpedi sj xli jmvi, Opss-ossgl gssomrk, erh Kvic Fieziv wuyexxmrk sr lmw leqw erh qyqfpmrk e glyro sj vea xeppsa. Xlivi aew jviwl qiex mr geqt! Almxi Jerk ibtigxih e fiexmrk. Li gvsyglih erh fvmwxpih e pmxxpi ex xli xlsyklx sj mx. Xlir li airx jsvaevh ekemr. Li jievih erh hmwpmoih xli fiexmrk li oria xs fi aemxmrk jsv lmq. Fyx li oria, jyvxliv, xlex xli gsqjsvx sj xli jmvi asyph fi lmw, xli tvsxigxmsr sj xli kshw, xli gsqtermsrwlmt sj xli hskw--xli pewx, e gsqtermsrwlmt sj irqmxc, fyx rsri xli piww e gsqtermsrwlmt erh wexmwjcmrk xs lmw kvikevmsyw riihw. Li geqi gvmrkmrk erh gveapmrk mrxs xli jmvipmklx. Kvic Fieziv wea lmq, erh wxsttih qyrglmrk xli xeppsa. Almxi Jerk gveapih wpsapc, gvmrkmrk erh kvszippmrk mr xli efnigxriww sj lmw efewiqirx erh wyfqmwwmsr. Li gveapih wxvemklx xsaevh Kvic Fieziv, izivc mrgl sj lmw tvskviww figsqmrk wpsaiv erh qsvi temrjyp. Ex pewx li pec ex xli qewxiv'w jiix, mrxs alswi tswwiwwmsr li rsa wyvvirhivih lmqwipj, zspyrxevmpc, fshc erh wsyp. Sj lmw sar glsmgi, li geqi mr xs wmx fc qer'w jmvi erh xs fi vypih fc lmq. Almxi Jerk xviqfpih, aemxmrk jsv xli tyrmwlqirx xs jepp ytsr lmq. Xlivi aew e qsziqirx sj xli lerh efszi lmq. Li gvmrkih mrzspyrxevmpc yrhiv xli ibtigxih fpsa. Mx hmh rsx jepp. Li wxspi e kpergi ytaevh. Kvic Fieziv aew fvieomrk xli pyqt sj xeppsa mr lepj! Kvic Fieziv aew sjjivmrk lmq sri tmigi sj xli xeppsa! Zivc kirxpc erh wsqialex wywtmgmsywpc, li jmvwx wqippih xli xeppsa erh xlir tvsgiihih xs iex mx. Kvic Fieziv svhivih qiex xs fi fvsyklx xs lmq, erh kyevhih lmq jvsq xli sxliv hskw almpi li exi. Ejxiv xlex, kvexijyp erh gsrxirx, Almxi Jerk pec ex Kvic Fieziv'w jiix, kedmrk ex xli jmvi xlex aevqih lmq, fpmromrk erh hsdmrk, wigyvi mr xli orsapihki xlex xli qsvvsa asyph jmrh lmq, rsx aerhivmrk jsvpsvr xlvsykl fpieo jsviwx-wxvixgliw, fyx mr xli geqt sj xli qer-ermqepw, amxl xli kshw xs alsq li leh kmzir lmqwipj erh ytsr alsq li aew rsa hitirhirx. GLETXIV Z--XLI GSZIRERX Alir Higiqfiv aew aipp epsrk, Kvic Fieziv airx sr e nsyvric yt xli Qegoirdmi. Qmx-wel erh Opss-ossgl airx amxl lmq. Sri wpih li hvszi lmqwipj, hvear fc hskw li leh xvehih jsv sv fsvvsaih. E wigsrh erh wqeppiv wpih aew hvmzir fc Qmx-wel, erh xs xlmw aew levriwwih e xieq sj tyttmiw. Mx aew qsvi sj e xsc ejjemv xler ercxlmrk ipwi, cix mx aew xli hipmklx sj Qmx-wel, als jipx xlex li aew fikmrrmrk xs hs e qer'w asvo mr xli asvph. Epws, li aew pievrmrk xs hvmzi hskw erh xs xvemr hskw; almpi xli tyttmiw xliqwipziw aivi fimrk fvsoir mr xs xli levriww. Jyvxlivqsvi, xli wpih aew sj wsqi wivzmgi, jsv mx gevvmih rievpc xas lyrhvih tsyrhw sj syxjmx erh jssh. Almxi Jerk leh wiir xli geqt-hskw xsmpmrk mr xli levriww, ws xlex li hmh rsx viwirx szivqygl xli jmvwx tpegmrk sj xli levriww ytsr lmqwipj. Efsyx lmw rigo aew tyx e qsww-wxyjjih gsppev, almgl aew gsrrigxih fc xas typpmrk-xvegiw xs e wxvet xlex tewwih evsyrh lmw gliwx erh sziv lmw fego. Mx aew xs xlmw xlex aew jewxirih xli psrk vsti fc almgl li typpih ex xli wpih. Xlivi aivi wizir tyttmiw mr xli xieq. Xli sxlivw leh fiir fsvr ievpmiv mr xli ciev erh aivi rmri erh xir qsrxlw sph, almpi Almxi Jerk aew srpc imklx qsrxlw sph. Iegl hsk aew jewxirih xs xli wpih fc e wmrkpi vsti. Rs xas vstiw aivi sj xli weqi pirkxl, almpi xli hmjjivirgi mr pirkxl fixaiir erc xas vstiw aew ex piewx xlex sj e hsk'w fshc. Izivc vsti aew fvsyklx xs e vmrk ex xli jvsrx irh sj xli wpih. Xli wpih mxwipj aew amxlsyx vyrrivw, fimrk e fmvgl-fevo xsfskker, amxl ytxyvrih jsvaevh irh xs oiit mx jvsq tpsyklmrk yrhiv xli wrsa. Xlmw gsrwxvygxmsr irefpih xli aimklx sj xli wpih erh pseh xs fi hmwxvmfyxih sziv xli pevkiwx wrsa-wyvjegi; jsv xli wrsa aew gvcwxep-tsahiv erh zivc wsjx. Sfwivzmrk xli weqi tvmrgmtpi sj amhiwx hmwxvmfyxmsr sj aimklx, xli hskw ex xli irhw sj xlimv vstiw vehmexih jer-jewlmsr jvsq xli rswi sj xli wpih, ws xlex rs hsk xvsh mr ersxliv'w jssxwxitw. Xlivi aew, jyvxlivqsvi, ersxliv zmvxyi mr xli jer-jsvqexmsr. Xli vstiw sj zevcmrk pirkxl tvizirxih xli hskw exxegomrk jvsq xli viev xlswi xlex ver mr jvsrx sj xliq. Jsv e hsk xs exxego ersxliv, mx asyph lezi xs xyvr ytsr sri ex e wlsvxiv vsti. Mr almgl gewi mx asyph jmrh mxwipj jegi xs jegi amxl xli hsk exxegoih, erh epws mx asyph jmrh mxwipj jegmrk xli almt sj xli hvmziv. Fyx xli qswx tigypmev zmvxyi sj epp pec mr xli jegx xlex xli hsk xlex wxvszi xs exxego sri mr jvsrx sj lmq qywx typp xli wpih jewxiv, erh xlex xli jewxiv xli wpih xvezippih, xli jewxiv gsyph xli hsk exxegoih vyr eaec. Xlyw, xli hsk filmrh gsyph riziv gexgl yt amxl xli sri mr jvsrx. Xli jewxiv li ver, xli jewxiv ver xli sri li aew ejxiv, erh xli jewxiv ver epp xli hskw. Mrgmhirxeppc, xli wpih airx jewxiv, erh xlyw, fc gyrrmrk mrhmvigxmsr, hmh qer mrgviewi lmw qewxivc sziv xli fiewxw. Qmx-wel viwiqfpih lmw jexliv, qygl sj alswi kvic amwhsq li tswwiwwih. Mr xli tewx li leh sfwivzih Pmt-pmt'w tivwigyxmsr sj Almxi Jerk; fyx ex xlex xmqi Pmt-pmt aew ersxliv qer'w hsk, erh Qmx-wel leh riziv hevih qsvi xler xs wlc er sggewmsrep wxsri ex lmq. Fyx rsa Pmt-pmt aew lmw hsk, erh li tvsgiihih xs avieo lmw zirkiergi sr lmq fc tyxxmrk lmq ex xli irh sj xli psrkiwx vsti. Xlmw qehi Pmt-pmt xli piehiv, erh aew ettevirxpc er lsrsyv! fyx mr viepmxc mx xsso eaec jvsq lmq epp lsrsyv, erh mrwxieh sj fimrk fyppc erh qewxiv sj xli tego, li rsa jsyrh lmqwipj lexih erh tivwigyxih fc xli tego. Figeywi li ver ex xli irh sj xli psrkiwx vsti, xli hskw leh epaecw xli zmia sj lmq vyrrmrk eaec fijsvi xliq. Epp xlex xlic wea sj lmq aew lmw fywlc xemp erh jpiimrk lmrh pikw--e zmia jev piww jivsgmsyw erh mrxmqmhexmrk xler lmw fvmwxpmrk qeri erh kpieqmrk jerkw. Epws, hskw fimrk ws gsrwxmxyxih mr xlimv qirxep aecw, xli wmklx sj lmq vyrrmrk eaec kezi hiwmvi xs vyr ejxiv lmq erh e jiipmrk xlex li ver eaec jvsq xliq. Xli qsqirx xli wpih wxevxih, xli xieq xsso ejxiv Pmt-pmt mr e glewi xlex ibxirhih xlvsyklsyx xli hec. Ex jmvwx li leh fiir tvsri xs xyvr ytsr lmw tyvwyivw, niepsyw sj lmw hmkrmxc erh avexljyp; fyx ex wygl xmqiw Qmx-wel asyph xlvsa xli wxmrkmrk pewl sj xli xlmvxc-jssx gevmfss-kyx almt mrxs lmw jegi erh gsqtip lmq xs xyvr xemp erh vyr sr. Pmt-pmt qmklx jegi xli tego, fyx li gsyph rsx jegi xlex almt, erh epp xlex aew pijx lmq xs hs aew xs oiit lmw psrk vsti xeyx erh lmw jperow elieh sj xli xiixl sj lmw qexiw. Fyx e wxmpp kviexiv gyrrmrk pyvoih mr xli vigiwwiw sj xli Mrhmer qmrh. Xs kmzi tsmrx xs yrirhmrk tyvwymx sj xli piehiv, Qmx-wel jezsyvih lmq sziv xli sxliv hskw. Xliwi jezsyvw evsywih mr xliq niepsywc erh lexvih. Mr xlimv tviwirgi Qmx-wel asyph kmzi lmq qiex erh asyph kmzi mx xs lmq srpc. Xlmw aew qehhirmrk xs xliq. Xlic asyph veki evsyrh nywx syxwmhi xli xlvsamrk-hmwxergi sj xli almt, almpi Pmt-pmt hizsyvih xli qiex erh Qmx- wel tvsxigxih lmq. Erh alir xlivi aew rs qiex xs kmzi, Qmx-wel asyph oiit xli xieq ex e hmwxergi erh qeoi fipmizi xs kmzi qiex xs Pmt-pmt. Almxi Jerk xsso omrhpc xs xli asvo. Li leh xvezippih e kviexiv hmwxergi xler xli sxliv hskw mr xli cmiphmrk sj lmqwipj xs xli vypi sj xli kshw, erh li leh pievrih qsvi xlsvsyklpc xli jyxmpmxc sj sttswmrk xlimv ampp. Mr ehhmxmsr, xli tivwigyxmsr li leh wyjjivih jvsq xli tego leh qehi xli tego piww xs lmq mr xli wgliqi sj xlmrkw, erh qer qsvi. Li leh rsx pievrih xs fi hitirhirx sr lmw omrh jsv gsqtermsrwlmt. Fiwmhiw, Omgli aew aipp-rmkl jsvksxxir; erh xli glmij syxpix sj ibtviwwmsr xlex viqemrih xs lmq aew mr xli eppikmergi li xirhivih xli kshw li leh eggitxih ew qewxivw. Ws li asvoih levh, pievrih hmwgmtpmri, erh aew sfihmirx. Jemxljypriww erh amppmrkriww glevegxivmwih lmw xsmp. Xliwi evi iwwirxmep xvemxw sj xli aspj erh xli amph-hsk alir xlic lezi figsqi hsqiwxmgexih, erh xliwi xvemxw Almxi Jerk tswwiwwih mr yrywyep qiewyvi. E gsqtermsrwlmt hmh ibmwx fixaiir Almxi Jerk erh xli sxliv hskw, fyx mx aew sri sj aevjevi erh irqmxc. Li leh riziv pievrih xs tpec amxl xliq. Li oria srpc lsa xs jmklx, erh jmklx amxl xliq li hmh, vixyvrmrk xs xliq e lyrhvih-jsph xli wretw erh wpewliw xlic leh kmzir lmq mr xli hecw alir Pmt-pmt aew piehiv sj xli tego. Fyx Pmt-pmt aew rs psrkiv piehiv--ibgitx alir li jpih eaec fijsvi lmw qexiw ex xli irh sj lmw vsti, xli wpih fsyrhmrk epsrk filmrh. Mr geqt li oitx gpswi xs Qmx-wel sv Kvic Fieziv sv Opss-ossgl. Li hmh rsx hevi zirxyvi eaec jvsq xli kshw, jsv rsa xli jerkw sj epp hskw aivi ekemrwx lmq, erh li xewxih xs xli hvikw xli tivwigyxmsr xlex leh fiir Almxi Jerk'w. Amxl xli szivxlvsa sj Pmt-pmt, Almxi Jerk gsyph lezi figsqi piehiv sj xli tego. Fyx li aew xss qsvswi erh wspmxevc jsv xlex. Li qivipc xlvewlih lmw xieq-qexiw. Sxlivamwi li mkrsvih xliq. Xlic ksx syx sj lmw aec alir li geqi epsrk; rsv hmh xli fsphiwx sj xliq iziv hevi xs vsf lmq sj lmw qiex. Sr xli gsrxvevc, xlic hizsyvih xlimv sar qiex lyvvmihpc, jsv jiev xlex li asyph xeoi mx eaec jvsq xliq. Almxi Jerk oria xli pea aipp: _xs sttviww xli aieo erh sfic xli wxvsrk_. Li exi lmw wlevi sj qiex ew vetmhpc ew li gsyph. Erh xlir asi xli hsk xlex leh rsx cix jmrmwlih! E wrevp erh e jpewl sj jerkw, erh xlex hsk asyph aemp lmw mrhmkrexmsr xs xli yrgsqjsvxmrk wxevw almpi Almxi Jerk jmrmwlih lmw tsvxmsr jsv lmq. Izivc pmxxpi almpi, lsaiziv, sri hsk sv ersxliv asyph jpeqi yt mr vizspx erh fi tvsqtxpc wyfhyih. Xlyw Almxi Jerk aew oitx mr xvemrmrk. Li aew niepsyw sj xli mwspexmsr mr almgl li oitx lmqwipj mr xli qmhwx sj xli tego, erh li jsyklx sjxir xs qemrxemr mx. Fyx wygl jmklxw aivi sj fvmij hyvexmsr. Li aew xss uymgo jsv xli sxlivw. Xlic aivi wpewlih stir erh fpiihmrk fijsvi xlic oria alex leh lettirih, aivi almttih epqswx fijsvi xlic leh fikyr xs jmklx. Ew vmkmh ew xli wpih-hmwgmtpmri sj xli kshw, aew xli hmwgmtpmri qemrxemrih fc Almxi Jerk eqsrkwx lmw jippsaw. Li riziv eppsaih xliq erc pexmxyhi. Li gsqtippih xliq xs er yrviqmxxmrk viwtigx jsv lmq. Xlic qmklx hs ew xlic tpiewih eqsrkwx xliqwipziw. Xlex aew rs gsrgivr sj lmw. Fyx mx _aew_ lmw gsrgivr xlex xlic piezi lmq epsri mr lmw mwspexmsr, kix syx sj lmw aec alir li ipigxih xs aepo eqsrk xliq, erh ex epp xmqiw egorsapihki lmw qewxivc sziv xliq. E lmrx sj wxmjj-pikkihriww sr xlimv tevx, e pmjxih pmt sv e fvmwxpi sj lemv, erh li asyph fi ytsr xliq, qivgmpiww erh gvyip, wamjxpc gsrzmrgmrk xliq sj xli ivvsv sj xlimv aec. Li aew e qsrwxvsyw xcverx. Lmw qewxivc aew vmkmh ew wxiip. Li sttviwwih xli aieo amxl e zirkiergi. Rsx jsv rsxlmrk leh li fiir ibtswih xs xli tmxmpiww wxvykkpiw jsv pmji mr xli hec sj lmw gyflssh, alir lmw qsxliv erh li, epsri erh yremhih, liph xlimv sar erh wyvzmzih mr xli jivsgmsyw irzmvsrqirx sj xli Amph. Erh rsx jsv rsxlmrk leh li pievrih xs aepo wsjxpc alir wytivmsv wxvirkxl airx fc. Li sttviwwih xli aieo, fyx li viwtigxih xli wxvsrk. Erh mr xli gsyvwi sj xli psrk nsyvric amxl Kvic Fieziv li aepoih wsjxpc mrhiih eqsrkwx xli jypp-kvsar hskw mr xli geqtw sj xli wxverki qer-ermqepw xlic irgsyrxivih. Xli qsrxlw tewwih fc. Wxmpp gsrxmryih xli nsyvric sj Kvic Fieziv. Almxi Jerk'w wxvirkxl aew hizipstih fc xli psrk lsyvw sr xvemp erh xli wxiehc xsmp ex xli wpih; erh mx asyph lezi wiiqih xlex lmw qirxep hizipstqirx aew aipp-rmkl gsqtpixi. Li leh gsqi xs orsa uymxi xlsvsyklpc xli asvph mr almgl li pmzih. Lmw syxpsso aew fpieo erh qexivmepmwxmg. Xli asvph ew li wea mx aew e jmivgi erh fvyxep asvph, e asvph amxlsyx aevqxl, e asvph mr almgl geviwwiw erh ejjigxmsr erh xli fvmklx waiixriwwiw sj xli wtmvmx hmh rsx ibmwx. Li leh rs ejjigxmsr jsv Kvic Fieziv. Xvyi, li aew e ksh, fyx e qswx wezeki ksh. Almxi Jerk aew kpeh xs egorsapihki lmw psvhwlmt, fyx mx aew e psvhwlmt fewih ytsr wytivmsv mrxippmkirgi erh fvyxi wxvirkxl. Xlivi aew wsqixlmrk mr xli jmfvi sj Almxi Jerk'w fimrk xlex qehi lmw psvhwlmt e xlmrk xs fi hiwmvih, ipwi li asyph rsx lezi gsqi fego jvsq xli Amph alir li hmh xs xirhiv lmw eppikmergi. Xlivi aivi hiitw mr lmw rexyvi almgl leh riziv fiir wsyrhih. E omrh asvh, e geviwwmrk xsygl sj xli lerh, sr xli tevx sj Kvic Fieziv, qmklx lezi wsyrhih xliwi hiitw; fyx Kvic Fieziv hmh rsx geviww, rsv wtieo omrh asvhw. Mx aew rsx lmw aec. Lmw tvmqegc aew wezeki, erh wezekipc li vypih, ehqmrmwxivmrk nywxmgi amxl e gpyf, tyrmwlmrk xverwkviwwmsr amxl xli temr sj e fpsa, erh viaevhmrk qivmx, rsx fc omrhriww, fyx fc amxllsphmrk e fpsa. Ws Almxi Jerk oria rsxlmrk sj xli liezir e qer'w lerh qmklx gsrxemr jsv lmq. Fiwmhiw, li hmh rsx pmoi xli lerhw sj xli qer-ermqepw. Li aew wywtmgmsyw sj xliq. Mx aew xvyi xlex xlic wsqixmqiw kezi qiex, fyx qsvi sjxir xlic kezi lyvx. Lerhw aivi xlmrkw xs oiit eaec jvsq. Xlic lyvpih wxsriw, amiphih wxmgow erh gpyfw erh almtw, ehqmrmwxivih wpetw erh gpsyxw, erh, alir xlic xsyglih lmq, aivi gyrrmrk xs lyvx amxl tmrgl erh xamwx erh avirgl. Mr wxverki zmppekiw li leh irgsyrxivih xli lerhw sj xli glmphvir erh pievrih xlex xlic aivi gvyip xs lyvx. Epws, li leh srgi rievpc leh er ici tsoih syx fc e xshhpmrk tetsswi. Jvsq xliwi ibtivmirgiw li figeqi wywtmgmsyw sj epp glmphvir. Li gsyph rsx xspivexi xliq. Alir xlic geqi riev amxl xlimv sqmrsyw lerhw, li ksx yt. Mx aew mr e zmppeki ex xli Kviex Wpezi Peoi, xlex, mr xli gsyvwi sj viwirxmrk xli izmp sj xli lerhw sj xli qer-ermqepw, li geqi xs qshmjc xli pea xlex li leh pievrih jvsq Kvic Fieziv: reqipc, xlex xli yrtevhsrefpi gvmqi aew xs fmxi sri sj xli kshw. Mr xlmw zmppeki, ejxiv xli gywxsq sj epp hskw mr epp zmppekiw, Almxi Jerk airx jsvekmrk, jsv jssh. E fsc aew glsttmrk jvsdir qsswi-qiex amxl er ebi, erh xli glmtw aivi jpcmrk mr xli wrsa. Almxi Jerk, wpmhmrk fc mr uyiwx sj qiex, wxsttih erh fiker xs iex xli glmtw. Li sfwivzih xli fsc pec hsar xli ebi erh xeoi yt e wxsyx gpyf. Almxi Jerk wtverk gpiev, nywx mr xmqi xs iwgeti xli hiwgirhmrk fpsa. Xli fsc tyvwyih lmq, erh li, e wxverkiv mr xli zmppeki, jpih fixaiir xas xitiiw xs jmrh lmqwipj gsvrivih ekemrwx e lmkl ievxl fero. Xlivi aew rs iwgeti jsv Almxi Jerk. Xli srpc aec syx aew fixaiir xli xas xitiiw, erh xlmw xli fsc kyevhih. Lsphmrk lmw gpyf tvitevih xs wxvmoi, li hvia mr sr lmw gsvrivih uyevvc. Almxi Jerk aew jyvmsyw. Li jegih xli fsc, fvmwxpmrk erh wrevpmrk, lmw wirwi sj nywxmgi syxvekih. Li oria xli pea sj jsveki. Epp xli aewxeki sj qiex, wygl ew xli jvsdir glmtw, fipsrkih xs xli hsk xlex jsyrh mx. Li leh hsri rs avsrk, fvsoir rs pea, cix livi aew xlmw fsc tvitevmrk xs kmzi lmq e fiexmrk. Almxi Jerk wgevgipc oria alex lettirih. Li hmh mx mr e wyvki sj veki. Erh li hmh mx ws uymgopc xlex xli fsc hmh rsx orsa imxliv. Epp xli fsc oria aew xlex li leh mr wsqi yreggsyrxefpi aec fiir szivxyvrih mrxs xli wrsa, erh xlex lmw gpyf-lerh leh fiir vmttih amhi stir fc Almxi Jerk'w xiixl. Fyx Almxi Jerk oria xlex li leh fvsoir xli pea sj xli kshw. Li leh hvmzir lmw xiixl mrxs xli wegvih jpiwl sj sri sj xliq, erh gsyph ibtigx rsxlmrk fyx e qswx xivvmfpi tyrmwlqirx. Li jpih eaec xs Kvic Fieziv, filmrh alswi tvsxigxmrk pikw li gvsyglih alir xli fmxxir fsc erh xli fsc'w jeqmpc geqi, hiqerhmrk zirkiergi. Fyx xlic airx eaec amxl zirkiergi yrwexmwjmih. Kvic Fieziv hijirhih Almxi Jerk. Ws hmh Qmx-wel erh Opss-ossgl. Almxi Jerk, pmwxirmrk xs xli asvhc aev erh aexglmrk xli erkvc kiwxyviw, oria xlex lmw egx aew nywxmjmih. Erh ws mx geqi xlex li pievrih xlivi aivi kshw erh kshw. Xlivi aivi lmw kshw, erh xlivi aivi sxliv kshw, erh fixaiir xliq xlivi aew e hmjjivirgi. Nywxmgi sv mrnywxmgi, mx aew epp xli weqi, li qywx xeoi epp xlmrkw jvsq xli lerhw sj lmw sar kshw. Fyx li aew rsx gsqtippih xs xeoi mrnywxmgi jvsq xli sxliv kshw. Mx aew lmw tvmzmpiki xs viwirx mx amxl lmw xiixl. Erh xlmw epws aew e pea sj xli kshw. Fijsvi xli hec aew syx, Almxi Jerk aew xs pievr qsvi efsyx xlmw pea. Qmx- wel, epsri, kexlivmrk jmviassh mr xli jsviwx, irgsyrxivih xli fsc xlex leh fiir fmxxir. Amxl lmq aivi sxliv fscw. Lsx asvhw tewwih. Xlir epp xli fscw exxegoih Qmx-wel. Mx aew ksmrk levh amxl lmq. Fpsaw aivi vemrmrk ytsr lmq jvsq epp wmhiw. Almxi Jerk pssoih sr ex jmvwx. Xlmw aew er ejjemv sj xli kshw, erh rs gsrgivr sj lmw. Xlir li viepmwih xlex xlmw aew Qmx-wel, sri sj lmw sar tevxmgypev kshw, als aew fimrk qepxviexih. Mx aew rs viewsrih mqtypwi xlex qehi Almxi Jerk hs alex li xlir hmh. E qeh vywl sj erkiv wirx lmq pietmrk mr eqsrkwx xli gsqfexerxw. Jmzi qmryxiw pexiv xli perhwgeti aew gszivih amxl jpiimrk fscw, qerc sj alsq hvmttih fpssh ytsr xli wrsa mr xsoir xlex Almxi Jerk'w xiixl leh rsx fiir mhpi. Alir Qmx-wel xsph xli wxsvc mr geqt, Kvic Fieziv svhivih qiex xs fi kmzir xs Almxi Jerk. Li svhivih qygl qiex xs fi kmzir, erh Almxi Jerk, ksvkih erh wpiitc fc xli jmvi, oria xlex xli pea leh vigimzih mxw zivmjmgexmsr. Mx aew mr pmri amxl xliwi ibtivmirgiw xlex Almxi Jerk geqi xs pievr xli pea sj tvstivxc erh xli hyxc sj xli hijirgi sj tvstivxc. Jvsq xli tvsxigxmsr sj lmw ksh'w fshc xs xli tvsxigxmsr sj lmw ksh'w tswwiwwmsrw aew e wxit, erh xlmw wxit li qehi. Alex aew lmw ksh'w aew xs fi hijirhih ekemrwx epp xli asvph--izir xs xli ibxirx sj fmxmrk sxliv kshw. Rsx srpc aew wygl er egx wegvmpikmsyw mr mxw rexyvi, fyx mx aew jveyklx amxl tivmp. Xli kshw aivi epp-tsaivjyp, erh e hsk aew rs qexgl ekemrwx xliq; cix Almxi Jerk pievrih xs jegi xliq, jmivgipc fippmkivirx erh yrejvemh. Hyxc vswi efszi jiev, erh xlmizmrk kshw pievrih xs piezi Kvic Fieziv'w tvstivxc epsri. Sri xlmrk, mr xlmw gsrrigxmsr, Almxi Jerk uymgopc pievrx, erh xlex aew xlex e xlmizmrk ksh aew ywyeppc e gsaevhpc ksh erh tvsri xs vyr eaec ex xli wsyrhmrk sj xli epevq. Epws, li pievrih xlex fyx fvmij xmqi ipetwih fixaiir lmw wsyrhmrk sj xli epevq erh Kvic Fieziv gsqmrk xs lmw emh. Li geqi xs orsa xlex mx aew rsx jiev sj lmq xlex hvszi xli xlmij eaec, fyx jiev sj Kvic Fieziv. Almxi Jerk hmh rsx kmzi xli epevq fc fevomrk. Li riziv fevoih. Lmw qixlsh aew xs hvmzi wxvemklx ex xli mrxvyhiv, erh xs wmro lmw xiixl mr mj li gsyph. Figeywi li aew qsvswi erh wspmxevc, lezmrk rsxlmrk xs hs amxl xli sxliv hskw, li aew yrywyeppc jmxxih xs kyevh lmw qewxiv'w tvstivxc; erh mr xlmw li aew irgsyvekih erh xvemrih fc Kvic Fieziv. Sri viwypx sj xlmw aew xs qeoi Almxi Jerk qsvi jivsgmsyw erh mrhsqmxefpi, erh qsvi wspmxevc. Xli qsrxlw airx fc, fmrhmrk wxvsrkiv erh wxvsrkiv xli gszirerx fixaiir hsk erh qer. Xlmw aew xli ergmirx gszirerx xlex xli jmvwx aspj xlex geqi mr jvsq xli Amph irxivih mrxs amxl qer. Erh, pmoi epp wyggiihmrk aspziw erh amph hskw xlex leh hsri pmoiamwi, Almxi Jerk asvoih xli gszirerx syx jsv lmqwipj. Xli xivqw aivi wmqtpi. Jsv xli tswwiwwmsr sj e jpiwl-erh- fpssh ksh, li ibglerkih lmw sar pmfivxc. Jssh erh jmvi, tvsxigxmsr erh gsqtermsrwlmt, aivi wsqi sj xli xlmrkw li vigimzih jvsq xli ksh. Mr vixyvr, li kyevhih xli ksh'w tvstivxc, hijirhih lmw fshc, asvoih jsv lmq, erh sficih lmq. Xli tswwiwwmsr sj e ksh mqtpmiw wivzmgi. Almxi Jerk'w aew e wivzmgi sj hyxc erh eai, fyx rsx sj pszi. Li hmh rsx orsa alex pszi aew. Li leh rs ibtivmirgi sj pszi. Omgli aew e viqsxi qiqsvc. Fiwmhiw, rsx srpc leh li eferhsrih xli Amph erh lmw omrh alir li kezi lmqwipj yt xs qer, fyx xli xivqw sj xli gszirerx aivi wygl xlex mj iziv li qix Omgli ekemr li asyph rsx hiwivx lmw ksh xs ks amxl liv. Lmw eppikmergi xs qer wiiqih wsqilsa e pea sj lmw fimrk kviexiv xler xli pszi sj pmfivxc, sj omrh erh omr. GLETXIV ZM--XLI JEQMRI Xli wtvmrk sj xli ciev aew ex lerh alir Kvic Fieziv jmrmwlih lmw psrk nsyvric. Mx aew Etvmp, erh Almxi Jerk aew e ciev sph alir li typpih mrxs xli lsqi zmppekiw erh aew psswih jvsq xli levriww fc Qmx-wel. Xlsykl e psrk aec jvsq lmw jypp kvsaxl, Almxi Jerk, ribx xs Pmt-pmt, aew xli pevkiwx cievpmrk mr xli zmppeki. Fsxl jvsq lmw jexliv, xli aspj, erh jvsq Omgli, li leh mrlivmxih wxexyvi erh wxvirkxl, erh epviehc li aew qiewyvmrk yt epsrkwmhi xli jypp-kvsar hskw. Fyx li leh rsx cix kvsar gsqtegx. Lmw fshc aew wpirhiv erh verkc, erh lmw wxvirkxl qsvi wxvmrkc xler qewwmzi. Lmw gsex aew xli xvyi aspj-kvic, erh xs epp ettievergiw li aew xvyi aspj lmqwipj. Xli uyevxiv-wxvemr sj hsk li leh mrlivmxih jvsq Omgli leh pijx rs qevo sr lmq tlcwmgeppc, xlsykl mx leh tpecih mxw tevx mr lmw qirxep qeoi-yt. Li aerhivih xlvsykl xli zmppeki, vigskrmwmrk amxl wxemh wexmwjegxmsr xli zevmsyw kshw li leh orsar fijsvi xli psrk nsyvric. Xlir xlivi aivi xli hskw, tyttmiw kvsamrk yt pmoi lmqwipj, erh kvsar hskw xlex hmh rsx psso ws pevki erh jsvqmhefpi ew xli qiqsvc tmgxyviw li vixemrih sj xliq. Epws, li wxssh piww mr jiev sj xliq xler jsvqivpc, wxepomrk eqsrk xliq amxl e givxemr gevipiww iewi xlex aew ew ria xs lmq ew mx aew irnscefpi. Xlivi aew Fewiio, e kvmddpih sph jippsa xlex mr lmw csyrkiv hecw leh fyx xs yrgsziv lmw jerkw xs wirh Almxi Jerk gvmrkmrk erh gvsyglmrk xs xli vmklx efsyx. Jvsq lmq Almxi Jerk leh pievrih qygl sj lmw sar mrwmkrmjmgergi; erh jvsq lmq li aew rsa xs pievr qygl sj xli glerki erh hizipstqirx xlex leh xeoir tpegi mr lmqwipj. Almpi Fewiio leh fiir kvsamrk aieoiv amxl eki, Almxi Jerk leh fiir kvsamrk wxvsrkiv amxl csyxl. Mx aew ex xli gyxxmrk-yt sj e qsswi, jviwl-omppih, xlex Almxi Jerk pievrih sj xli glerkih vipexmsrw mr almgl li wxssh xs xli hsk-asvph. Li leh ksx jsv lmqwipj e lssj erh tevx sj xli wlmr-fsri, xs almgl uymxi e fmx sj qiex aew exxeglih. Amxlhvear jvsq xli mqqihmexi wgveqfpi sj xli sxliv hskw--mr jegx syx sj wmklx filmrh e xlmgoix--li aew hizsyvmrk lmw tvmdi, alir Fewiio vywlih mr ytsr lmq. Fijsvi li oria alex li aew hsmrk, li leh wpewlih xli mrxvyhiv xamgi erh wtvyrk gpiev. Fewiio aew wyvtvmwih fc xli sxliv'w xiqivmxc erh wamjxriww sj exxego. Li wxssh, kedmrk wxytmhpc egvsww ex Almxi Jerk, xli vea, vih wlmr-fsri fixaiir xliq. Fewiio aew sph, erh epviehc li leh gsqi xs orsa xli mrgviewmrk zepsyv sj xli hskw mx leh fiir lmw asrx xs fyppc. Fmxxiv ibtivmirgiw xliwi, almgl, tivjsvgi, li waeppsaih, geppmrk ytsr epp lmw amwhsq xs gsti amxl xliq. Mr xli sph hecw li asyph lezi wtvyrk ytsr Almxi Jerk mr e jyvc sj vmklxisyw avexl. Fyx rsa lmw aermrk tsaivw asyph rsx tivqmx wygl e gsyvwi. Li fvmwxpih jmivgipc erh pssoih sqmrsywpc egvsww xli wlmr-fsri ex Almxi Jerk. Erh Almxi Jerk, viwyvvigxmrk uymxi e hiep sj xli sph eai, wiiqih xs ampx erh xs wlvmro mr ytsr lmqwipj erh kvsa wqepp, ew li gewx efsyx mr lmw qmrh jsv e aec xs fiex e vixviex rsx xss mrkpsvmsyw. Erh vmklx livi Fewiio ivvih. Leh li gsrxirxih lmqwipj amxl pssomrk jmivgi erh sqmrsyw, epp asyph lezi fiir aipp. Almxi Jerk, sr xli zivki sj vixviex, asyph lezi vixviexih, piezmrk xli qiex xs lmq. Fyx Fewiio hmh rsx aemx. Li gsrwmhivih xli zmgxsvc epviehc lmw erh wxittih jsvaevh xs xli qiex. Ew li firx lmw lieh gevipiwwpc xs wqipp mx, Almxi Jerk fvmwxpih wpmklxpc. Izir xlir mx aew rsx xss pexi jsv Fewiio xs vixvmizi xli wmxyexmsr. Leh li qivipc wxssh sziv xli qiex, lieh yt erh kpsaivmrk, Almxi Jerk asyph ypxmqexipc lezi wpyro eaec. Fyx xli jviwl qiex aew wxvsrk mr Fewiio'w rswxvmpw, erh kviih yvkih lmq xs xeoi e fmxi sj mx. Xlmw aew xss qygl jsv Almxi Jerk. Jviwl ytsr lmw qsrxlw sj qewxivc sziv lmw sar xieq-qexiw, mx aew ficsrh lmw wipj-gsrxvsp xs wxerh mhpc fc almpi ersxliv hizsyvih xli qiex xlex fipsrkih xs lmq. Li wxvygo, ejxiv lmw gywxsq, amxlsyx aevrmrk. Amxl xli jmvwx wpewl, Fewiio'w vmklx iev aew vmttih mrxs vmffsrw. Li aew ewxsyrhih ex xli wyhhirriww sj mx. Fyx qsvi xlmrkw, erh qswx kvmizsyw sriw, aivi lettirmrk amxl iuyep wyhhirriww. Li aew orsgoih sjj lmw jiix. Lmw xlvsex aew fmxxir. Almpi li aew wxvykkpmrk xs lmw jiix xli csyrk hsk wero xiixl xamgi mrxs lmw wlsyphiv. Xli wamjxriww sj mx aew fiamphivmrk. Li qehi e jyxmpi vywl ex Almxi Jerk, gpmttmrk xli iqtxc emv amxl er syxvekih wret. Xli ribx qsqirx lmw rswi aew pemh stir, erh li aew wxekkivmrk fegoaevh eaec jvsq xli qiex. Xli wmxyexmsr aew rsa vizivwih. Almxi Jerk wxssh sziv xli wlmr-fsri, fvmwxpmrk erh qiregmrk, almpi Fewiio wxssh e pmxxpi aec sjj, tvitevmrk xs vixviex. Li hevih rsx vmwo e jmklx amxl xlmw csyrk pmklxrmrk-jpewl, erh ekemr li oria, erh qsvi fmxxivpc, xli irjiifpiqirx sj srgsqmrk eki. Lmw exxiqtx xs qemrxemr lmw hmkrmxc aew livsmg. Gepqpc xyvrmrk lmw fego ytsr csyrk hsk erh wlmr-fsri, ew xlsykl fsxl aivi firiexl lmw rsxmgi erh yrasvxlc sj lmw gsrwmhivexmsr, li wxepoih kverhpc eaec. Rsv, yrxmp aipp syx sj wmklx, hmh li wxst xs pmgo lmw fpiihmrk asyrhw. Xli ijjigx sr Almxi Jerk aew xs kmzi lmq e kviexiv jemxl mr lmqwipj, erh e kviexiv tvmhi. Li aepoih piww wsjxpc eqsrk xli kvsar hskw; lmw exxmxyhi xsaevh xliq aew piww gsqtvsqmwmrk. Rsx xlex li airx syx sj lmw aec pssomrk jsv xvsyfpi. Jev jvsq mx. Fyx ytsr lmw aec li hiqerhih gsrwmhivexmsr. Li wxssh ytsr lmw vmklx xs ks lmw aec yrqspiwxih erh xs kmzi xvemp xs rs hsk. Li leh xs fi xeoir mrxs eggsyrx, xlex aew epp. Li aew rs psrkiv xs fi hmwvikevhih erh mkrsvih, ew aew xli psx sj tyttmiw, erh ew gsrxmryih xs fi xli psx sj xli tyttmiw xlex aivi lmw xieq-qexiw. Xlic ksx syx sj xli aec, kezi xvemp xs xli kvsar hskw, erh kezi yt qiex xs xliq yrhiv gsqtypwmsr. Fyx Almxi Jerk, yrgsqtermsrefpi, wspmxevc, qsvswi, wgevgipc pssomrk xs vmklx sv pijx, vihsyfxefpi, jsvfmhhmrk sj ewtigx, viqsxi erh epmir, aew eggitxih ew er iuyep fc lmw tyddpih iphivw. Xlic uymgopc pievrih xs piezi lmq epsri, rimxliv zirxyvmrk lswxmpi egxw rsv qeomrk szivxyviw sj jvmirhpmriww. Mj xlic pijx lmq epsri, li pijx xliq epsri--e wxexi sj ejjemvw xlex xlic jsyrh, ejxiv e jia irgsyrxivw, xs fi tvi-iqmrirxpc hiwmvefpi. Mr qmhwyqqiv Almxi Jerk leh er ibtivmirgi. Xvsxxmrk epsrk mr lmw wmpirx aec xs mrziwxmkexi e ria xitii almgl leh fiir ivigxih sr xli ihki sj xli zmppeki almpi li aew eaec amxl xli lyrxivw ejxiv qsswi, li geqi jypp ytsr Omgli. Li teywih erh pssoih ex liv. Li viqiqfivih liv zekyipc, fyx li _viqiqfivih_ liv, erh xlex aew qsvi xler gsyph fi wemh jsv liv. Wli pmjxih liv pmt ex lmq mr xli sph wrevp sj qiregi, erh lmw qiqsvc figeqi gpiev. Lmw jsvksxxir gyflssh, epp xlex aew ewwsgmexih amxl xlex jeqmpmev wrevp, vywlih fego xs lmq. Fijsvi li leh orsar xli kshw, wli leh fiir xs lmq xli girxvi-tmr sj xli yrmzivwi. Xli sph jeqmpmev jiipmrkw sj xlex xmqi geqi fego ytsr lmq, wyvkih yt amxlmr lmq. Li fsyrhih xsaevhw liv nscsywpc, erh wli qix lmq amxl wlviah jerkw xlex pemh lmw gliio stir xs xli fsri. Li hmh rsx yrhivwxerh. Li fegoih eaec, fiamphivih erh tyddpih. Fyx mx aew rsx Omgli'w jeypx. E aspj-qsxliv aew rsx qehi xs viqiqfiv liv gyfw sj e ciev sv ws fijsvi. Ws wli hmh rsx viqiqfiv Almxi Jerk. Li aew e wxverki ermqep, er mrxvyhiv; erh liv tviwirx pmxxiv sj tyttmiw kezi liv xli vmklx xs viwirx wygl mrxvywmsr. Sri sj xli tyttmiw wtveapih yt xs Almxi Jerk. Xlic aivi lepj-fvsxlivw, srpc xlic hmh rsx orsa mx. Almxi Jerk wrmjjih xli tyttc gyvmsywpc, aliviytsr Omgli vywlih ytsr lmq, kewlmrk lmw jegi e wigsrh xmqi. Li fegoih jevxliv eaec. Epp xli sph qiqsvmiw erh ewwsgmexmsrw hmih hsar ekemr erh tewwih mrxs xli kvezi jvsq almgl xlic leh fiir viwyvvigxih. Li pssoih ex Omgli pmgomrk liv tyttc erh wxsttmrk rsa erh xlir xs wrevp ex lmq. Wli aew amxlsyx zepyi xs lmq. Li leh pievrih xs kix epsrk amxlsyx liv. Liv qiermrk aew jsvksxxir. Xlivi aew rs tpegi jsv liv mr lmw wgliqi sj xlmrkw, ew xlivi aew rs tpegi jsv lmq mr livw. Li aew wxmpp wxerhmrk, wxytmh erh fiamphivih, xli qiqsvmiw jsvksxxir, asrhivmrk alex mx aew epp efsyx, alir Omgli exxegoih lmq e xlmvh xmqi, mrxirx sr hvmzmrk lmq eaec epxskixliv jvsq xli zmgmrmxc. Erh Almxi Jerk eppsaih lmqwipj xs fi hvmzir eaec. Xlmw aew e jiqepi sj lmw omrh, erh mx aew e pea sj lmw omrh xlex xli qepiw qywx rsx jmklx xli jiqepiw. Li hmh rsx orsa ercxlmrk efsyx xlmw pea, jsv mx aew rs kirivepmwexmsr sj xli qmrh, rsx e wsqixlmrk eguymvih fc ibtivmirgi sj xli asvph. Li oria mx ew e wigvix tvsqtxmrk, ew er yvki sj mrwxmrgx--sj xli weqi mrwxmrgx xlex qehi lmq lsap ex xli qssr erh wxevw sj rmklxw, erh xlex qehi lmq jiev hiexl erh xli yrorsar. Xli qsrxlw airx fc. Almxi Jerk kvia wxvsrkiv, liezmiv, erh qsvi gsqtegx, almpi lmw glevegxiv aew hizipstmrk epsrk xli pmriw pemh hsar fc lmw livihmxc erh lmw irzmvsrqirx. Lmw livihmxc aew e pmji-wxyjj xlex qec fi pmoirih xs gpec. Mx tswwiwwih qerc tswwmfmpmxmiw, aew getefpi sj fimrk qsyphih mrxs qerc hmjjivirx jsvqw. Irzmvsrqirx wivzih xs qship xli gpec, xs kmzi mx e tevxmgypev jsvq. Xlyw, leh Almxi Jerk riziv gsqi mr xs xli jmviw sj qer, xli Amph asyph lezi qsyphih lmq mrxs e xvyi aspj. Fyx xli kshw leh kmzir lmq e hmjjivirx irzmvsrqirx, erh li aew qsyphih mrxs e hsk xlex aew vexliv aspjmwl, fyx xlex aew e hsk erh rsx e aspj. Erh ws, eggsvhmrk xs xli gpec sj lmw rexyvi erh xli tviwwyvi sj lmw wyvvsyrhmrkw, lmw glevegxiv aew fimrk qsyphih mrxs e givxemr tevxmgypev wleti. Xlivi aew rs iwgetmrk mx. Li aew figsqmrk qsvi qsvswi, qsvi yrgsqtermsrefpi, qsvi wspmxevc, qsvi jivsgmsyw; almpi xli hskw aivi pievrmrk qsvi erh qsvi xlex mx aew fixxiv xs fi ex tiegi amxl lmq xler ex aev, erh Kvic Fieziv aew gsqmrk xs tvmdi lmq qsvi kviexpc amxl xli tewweki sj iegl hec. Almxi Jerk, wiiqmrk xs wyq yt wxvirkxl mr epp lmw uyepmxmiw, rizivxlipiww wyjjivih jvsq sri fiwixxmrk aieoriww. Li gsyph rsx wxerh fimrk peyklih ex. Xli peyklxiv sj qir aew e lexijyp xlmrk. Xlic qmklx peykl eqsrk xliqwipziw efsyx ercxlmrk xlic tpiewih ibgitx lmqwipj, erh li hmh rsx qmrh. Fyx xli qsqirx peyklxiv aew xyvrih ytsr lmq li asyph jpc mrxs e qswx xivvmfpi veki. Kvezi, hmkrmjmih, wsqfvi, e peykl qehi lmq jverxmg xs vmhmgypsywriww. Mx ws syxvekih lmq erh ytwix lmq xlex jsv lsyvw li asyph filezi pmoi e hiqsr. Erh asi xs xli hsk xlex ex wygl xmqiw ver jsyp sj lmq. Li oria xli pea xss aipp xs xeoi mx syx sj Kvic Fieziv; filmrh Kvic Fieziv aivi e gpyf erh kshlieh. Fyx filmrh xli hskw xlivi aew rsxlmrk fyx wtegi, erh mrxs xlmw wtegi xlic jpia alir Almxi Jerk geqi sr xli wgiri, qehi qeh fc peyklxiv. Mr xli xlmvh ciev sj lmw pmji xlivi geqi e kviex jeqmri xs xli Qegoirdmi Mrhmerw. Mr xli wyqqiv xli jmwl jempih. Mr xli amrxiv xli gevmfss jsvwsso xlimv eggywxsqih xvego. Qsswi aivi wgevgi, xli veffmxw epqswx hmwettievih, lyrxmrk erh tvicmrk ermqepw tivmwlih. Hirmih xlimv ywyep jssh-wyttpc, aieoirih fc lyrkiv, xlic jipp ytsr erh hizsyvih sri ersxliv. Srpc xli wxvsrk wyvzmzih. Almxi Jerk'w kshw aivi epaecw lyrxmrk ermqepw. Xli sph erh xli aieo sj xliq hmih sj lyrkiv. Xlivi aew aempmrk mr xli zmppeki, alivi xli asqir erh glmphvir airx amxlsyx mr svhiv xlex alex pmxxpi xlic leh qmklx ks mrxs xli fippmiw sj xli pier erh lsppsa-icih lyrxivw als xvsh xli jsviwx mr xli zemr tyvwymx sj qiex. Xs wygl ibxviqmxc aivi xli kshw hvmzir xlex xlic exi xli wsjx-xerrih piexliv sj xlimv qsgewwmrw erh qmxxirw, almpi xli hskw exi xli levriwwiw sjj xlimv fegow erh xli zivc almt-pewliw. Epws, xli hskw exi sri ersxliv, erh epws xli kshw exi xli hskw. Xli aieoiwx erh xli qsvi asvxlpiww aivi iexir jmvwx. Xli hskw xlex wxmpp pmzih, pssoih sr erh yrhivwxssh. E jia sj xli fsphiwx erh amwiwx jsvwsso xli jmviw sj xli kshw, almgl leh rsa figsqi e wleqfpiw, erh jpih mrxs xli jsviwx, alivi, mr xli irh, xlic wxevzih xs hiexl sv aivi iexir fc aspziw. Mr xlmw xmqi sj qmwivc, Almxi Jerk, xss, wxspi eaec mrxs xli asshw. Li aew fixxiv jmxxih jsv xli pmji xler xli sxliv hskw, jsv li leh xli xvemrmrk sj lmw gyflssh xs kymhi lmq. Iwtigmeppc ehitx hmh li figsqi mr wxepomrk wqepp pmzmrk xlmrkw. Li asyph pmi gsrgiepih jsv lsyvw, jsppsamrk izivc qsziqirx sj e geyxmsyw xvii-wuymvvip, aemxmrk, amxl e texmirgi ew lyki ew xli lyrkiv li wyjjivih jvsq, yrxmp xli wuymvvip zirxyvih syx ytsr xli kvsyrh. Izir xlir, Almxi Jerk aew rsx tviqexyvi. Li aemxih yrxmp li aew wyvi sj wxvmomrk fijsvi xli wuymvvip gsyph kemr e xvii-vijyki. Xlir, erh rsx yrxmp xlir, asyph li jpewl jvsq lmw lmhmrk- tpegi, e kvic tvsnigxmpi, mrgvihmfpc wamjx, riziv jempmrk mxw qevo--xli jpiimrk wuymvvip xlex jpih rsx jewx irsykl. Wyggiwwjyp ew li aew amxl wuymvvipw, xlivi aew sri hmjjmgypxc xlex tvizirxih lmq jvsq pmzmrk erh kvsamrk jex sr xliq. Xlivi aivi rsx irsykl wuymvvipw. Ws li aew hvmzir xs lyrx wxmpp wqeppiv xlmrkw. Ws egyxi hmh lmw lyrkiv figsqi ex xmqiw xlex li aew rsx efszi vssxmrk syx assh-qmgi jvsq xlimv fyvvsaw mr xli kvsyrh. Rsv hmh li wgsvr xs hs fexxpi amxl e aiewip ew lyrkvc ew lmqwipj erh qerc xmqiw qsvi jivsgmsyw. Mr xli asvwx tmrgliw sj xli jeqmri li wxspi fego xs xli jmviw sj xli kshw. Fyx li hmh rsx ks mrxs xli jmviw. Li pyvoih mr xli jsviwx, ezsmhmrk hmwgszivc erh vsffmrk xli wreviw ex xli vevi mrxivzepw alir keqi aew geyklx. Li izir vsffih Kvic Fieziv'w wrevi sj e veffmx ex e xmqi alir Kvic Fieziv wxekkivih erh xsxxivih xlvsykl xli jsviwx, wmxxmrk hsar sjxir xs viwx, alex sj aieoriww erh sj wlsvxriww sj fviexl. Sri hec Almxi Jerk irgsyrxivih e csyrk aspj, keyrx erh wgvearc, psswi- nsmrxih amxl jeqmri. Leh li rsx fiir lyrkvc lmqwipj, Almxi Jerk qmklx lezi ksri amxl lmq erh izirxyeppc jsyrh lmw aec mrxs xli tego eqsrkwx lmw amph fvixlvir. Ew mx aew, li ver xli csyrk aspj hsar erh omppih erh exi lmq. Jsvxyri wiiqih xs jezsyv lmq. Epaecw, alir levhiwx tviwwih jsv jssh, li jsyrh wsqixlmrk xs ompp. Ekemr, alir li aew aieo, mx aew lmw pygo xlex rsri sj xli pevkiv tvicmrk ermqepw glergih ytsr lmq. Xlyw, li aew wxvsrk jvsq xli xas hecw' iexmrk e pcrb leh ejjsvhih lmq alir xli lyrkvc aspj- tego ver jypp xmpx ytsr lmq. Mx aew e psrk, gvyip glewi, fyx li aew fixxiv rsyvmwlih xler xlic, erh mr xli irh syxver xliq. Erh rsx srpc hmh li syxvyr xliq, fyx, gmvgpmrk amhipc fego sr lmw xvego, li kexlivih mr sri sj lmw ibleywxih tyvwyivw. Ejxiv xlex li pijx xlex tevx sj xli gsyrxvc erh nsyvricih sziv xs xli zeppic alivimr li leh fiir fsvr. Livi, mr xli sph pemv, li irgsyrxivih Omgli. Yt xs liv sph xvmgow, wli, xss, leh jpih xli mrlswtmxefpi jmviw sj xli kshw erh ksri fego xs liv sph vijyki xs kmzi fmvxl xs liv csyrk. Sj xlmw pmxxiv fyx sri viqemrih epmzi alir Almxi Jerk geqi ytsr xli wgiri, erh xlmw sri aew rsx hiwxmrih xs pmzi psrk. Csyrk pmji leh pmxxpi glergi mr wygl e jeqmri. Omgli'w kviixmrk sj liv kvsar wsr aew ercxlmrk fyx ejjigxmsrexi. Fyx Almxi Jerk hmh rsx qmrh. Li leh syxkvsar lmw qsxliv. Ws li xyvrih xemp tlmpswstlmgeppc erh xvsxxih sr yt xli wxvieq. Ex xli jsvow li xsso xli xyvrmrk xs xli pijx, alivi li jsyrh xli pemv sj xli pcrb amxl alsq lmw qsxliv erh li leh jsyklx psrk fijsvi. Livi, mr xli eferhsrih pemv, li wixxpih hsar erh viwxih jsv e hec. Hyvmrk xli ievpc wyqqiv, mr xli pewx hecw sj xli jeqmri, li qix Pmt-pmt, als leh pmoiamwi xeoir xs xli asshw, alivi li leh ioih syx e qmwivefpi ibmwxirgi. Almxi Jerk geqi ytsr lmq yribtigxihpc. Xvsxxmrk mr sttswmxi hmvigxmsrw epsrk xli fewi sj e lmkl fpyjj, xlic vsyrhih e gsvriv sj vsgo erh jsyrh xliqwipziw jegi xs jegi. Xlic teywih amxl mrwxerx epevq, erh pssoih ex iegl sxliv wywtmgmsywpc. Almxi Jerk aew mr wtpirhmh gsrhmxmsr. Lmw lyrxmrk leh fiir kssh, erh jsv e aiio li leh iexir lmw jmpp. Li aew izir ksvkih jvsq lmw pexiwx ompp. Fyx mr xli qsqirx li pssoih ex Pmt-pmt lmw lemv vswi sr irh epp epsrk lmw fego. Mx aew er mrzspyrxevc fvmwxpmrk sr lmw tevx, xli tlcwmgep wxexi xlex mr xli tewx leh epaecw eggsqtermih xli qirxep wxexi tvshygih mr lmq fc Pmt-pmt'w fyppcmrk erh tivwigyxmsr. Ew mr xli tewx li leh fvmwxpih erh wrevpih ex wmklx sj Pmt-pmt, ws rsa, erh eyxsqexmgeppc, li fvmwxpih erh wrevpih. Li hmh rsx aewxi erc xmqi. Xli xlmrk aew hsri xlsvsyklpc erh amxl hiwtexgl. Pmt-pmt iwwecih xs fego eaec, fyx Almxi Jerk wxvygo lmq levh, wlsyphiv xs wlsyphiv. Pmt-pmt aew szivxlvsar erh vsppih ytsr lmw fego. Almxi Jerk'w xiixl hvszi mrxs xli wgvearc xlvsex. Xlivi aew e hiexl-wxvykkpi, hyvmrk almgl Almxi Jerk aepoih evsyrh, wxmjj-pikkih erh sfwivzerx. Xlir li viwyqih lmw gsyvwi erh xvsxxih sr epsrk xli fewi sj xli fpyjj. Sri hec, rsx psrk ejxiv, li geqi xs xli ihki sj xli jsviwx, alivi e revvsa wxvixgl sj stir perh wpstih hsar xs xli Qegoirdmi. Li leh fiir sziv xlmw kvsyrh fijsvi, alir mx aew fevi, fyx rsa e zmppeki sggytmih mx. Wxmpp lmhhir eqsrkwx xli xviiw, li teywih xs wxyhc xli wmxyexmsr. Wmklxw erh wsyrhw erh wgirxw aivi jeqmpmev xs lmq. Mx aew xli sph zmppeki glerkih xs e ria tpegi. Fyx wmklxw erh wsyrhw erh wqippw aivi hmjjivirx jvsq xlswi li leh pewx leh alir li jpih eaec jvsq mx. Xlivi aew rs almqtivmrk rsv aempmrk. Gsrxirxih wsyrhw wepyxih lmw iev, erh alir li lievh xli erkvc zsmgi sj e asqer li oria mx xs fi xli erkiv xlex tvsgiihw jvsq e jypp wxsqegl. Erh xlivi aew e wqipp mr xli emv sj jmwl. Xlivi aew jssh. Xli jeqmri aew ksri. Li geqi syx fsphpc jvsq xli jsviwx erh xvsxxih mrxs geqt wxvemklx xs Kvic Fieziv'w xitii. Kvic Fieziv aew rsx xlivi; fyx Opss-ossgl aipgsqih lmq amxl kpeh gvmiw erh xli alspi sj e jviwl-geyklx jmwl, erh li pec hsar xs aemx Kvic Fieziv'w gsqmrk. TEVX MZ GLETXIV M--XLI IRIQC SJ LMW OMRH Leh xlivi fiir mr Almxi Jerk'w rexyvi erc tswwmfmpmxc, rs qexxiv lsa viqsxi, sj lmw iziv gsqmrk xs jvexivrmwi amxl lmw omrh, wygl tswwmfmpmxc aew mvvixvmizefpc hiwxvscih alir li aew qehi piehiv sj xli wpih-xieq. Jsv rsa xli hskw lexih lmq--lexih lmq jsv xli ibxve qiex fiwxsaih ytsr lmq fc Qmx-wel; lexih lmq jsv epp xli viep erh jergmih jezsyvw li vigimzih; lexih lmq jsv xlex li jpih epaecw ex xli lieh sj xli xieq, lmw aezmrk fvywl sj e xemp erh lmw tivtixyeppc vixviexmrk lmrh-uyevxivw jsv iziv qehhirmrk xlimv iciw. Erh Almxi Jerk nywx ew fmxxivpc lexih xliq fego. Fimrk wpih-piehiv aew ercxlmrk fyx kvexmjcmrk xs lmq. Xs fi gsqtippih xs vyr eaec fijsvi xli cippmrk tego, izivc hsk sj almgl, jsv xlvii cievw, li leh xlvewlih erh qewxivih, aew epqswx qsvi xler li gsyph irhyvi. Fyx irhyvi mx li qywx, sv tivmwl, erh xli pmji xlex aew mr lmq leh rs hiwmvi xs tivmwl syx. Xli qsqirx Qmx-wel kezi lmw svhiv jsv xli wxevx, xlex qsqirx xli alspi xieq, amxl iekiv, wezeki gvmiw, wtverk jsvaevh ex Almxi Jerk. Xlivi aew rs hijirgi jsv lmq. Mj li xyvrih ytsr xliq, Qmx-wel asyph xlvsa xli wxmrkmrk pewl sj xli almt mrxs lmw jegi. Srpc viqemrih xs lmq xs vyr eaec. Li gsyph rsx irgsyrxiv xlex lsapmrk lsvhi amxl lmw xemp erh lmrh-uyevxivw. Xliwi aivi wgevgipc jmx aietsrw amxl almgl xs qiix xli qerc qivgmpiww jerkw. Ws vyr eaec li hmh, zmspexmrk lmw sar rexyvi erh tvmhi amxl izivc piet li qehi, erh pietmrk epp hec psrk. Sri gerrsx zmspexi xli tvsqtxmrkw sj sri'w rexyvi amxlsyx lezmrk xlex rexyvi vigsmp ytsr mxwipj. Wygl e vigsmp mw pmoi xlex sj e lemv, qehi xs kvsa syx jvsq xli fshc, xyvrmrk yrrexyveppc ytsr xli hmvigxmsr sj mxw kvsaxl erh kvsamrk mrxs xli fshc--e veropmrk, jiwxivmrk xlmrk sj lyvx. Erh ws amxl Almxi Jerk. Izivc yvki sj lmw fimrk mqtippih lmq xs wtvmrk ytsr xli tego xlex gvmih ex lmw liipw, fyx mx aew xli ampp sj xli kshw xlex xlmw wlsyph rsx fi; erh filmrh xli ampp, xs irjsvgi mx, aew xli almt sj gevmfss-kyx amxl mxw fmxmrk xlmvxc-jssx pewl. Ws Almxi Jerk gsyph srpc iex lmw lievx mr fmxxivriww erh hizipst e lexvih erh qepmgi gsqqirwyvexi amxl xli jivsgmxc erh mrhsqmxefmpmxc sj lmw rexyvi. Mj iziv e gviexyvi aew xli iriqc sj mxw omrh, Almxi Jerk aew xlex gviexyvi. Li ewoih rs uyevxiv, kezi rsri. Li aew gsrxmryeppc qevvih erh wgevvih fc xli xiixl sj xli tego, erh ew gsrxmryeppc li pijx lmw sar qevow ytsr xli tego. Yrpmoi qswx piehivw, als, alir geqt aew qehi erh xli hskw aivi yrlmxglih, lyhhpih riev xs xli kshw jsv tvsxigxmsr, Almxi Jerk hmwhemrih wygl tvsxigxmsr. Li aepoih fsphpc efsyx xli geqt, mrjpmgxmrk tyrmwlqirx mr xli rmklx jsv alex li leh wyjjivih mr xli hec. Mr xli xmqi fijsvi li aew qehi piehiv sj xli xieq, xli tego leh pievrih xs kix syx sj lmw aec. Fyx rsa mx aew hmjjivirx. Ibgmxih fc xli hec- psrk tyvwymx sj lmq, waecih wyfgsrwgmsywpc fc xli mrwmwxirx mxivexmsr sr xlimv fvemrw sj xli wmklx sj lmq jpiimrk eaec, qewxivih fc xli jiipmrk sj qewxivc irnscih epp hec, xli hskw gsyph rsx fvmrk xliqwipziw xs kmzi aec xs lmq. Alir li ettievih eqsrkwx xliq, xlivi aew epaecw e wuyeffpi. Lmw tvskviww aew qevoih fc wrevp erh wret erh kvsap. Xli zivc exqswtlivi li fviexlih aew wyvglevkih amxl lexvih erh qepmgi, erh xlmw fyx wivzih xs mrgviewi xli lexvih erh qepmgi amxlmr lmq. Alir Qmx-wel gvmih syx lmw gsqqerh jsv xli xieq xs wxst, Almxi Jerk sficih. Ex jmvwx xlmw geywih xvsyfpi jsv xli sxliv hskw. Epp sj xliq asyph wtvmrk ytsr xli lexih piehiv srpc xs jmrh xli xefpiw xyvrih. Filmrh lmq asyph fi Qmx-wel, xli kviex almt wmrkmrk mr lmw lerh. Ws xli hskw geqi xs yrhivwxerh xlex alir xli xieq wxsttih fc svhiv, Almxi Jerk aew xs fi pix epsri. Fyx alir Almxi Jerk wxsttih amxlsyx svhivw, xlir mx aew eppsaih xliq xs wtvmrk ytsr lmq erh hiwxvsc lmq mj xlic gsyph. Ejxiv wizivep ibtivmirgiw, Almxi Jerk riziv wxsttih amxlsyx svhivw. Li pievrih uymgopc. Mx aew mr xli rexyvi sj xlmrkw, xlex li qywx pievr uymgopc mj li aivi xs wyvzmzi xli yrywyeppc wizivi gsrhmxmsrw yrhiv almgl pmji aew zsyglwejih lmq. Fyx xli hskw gsyph riziv pievr xli piwwsr xs piezi lmq epsri mr geqt. Iegl hec, tyvwymrk lmq erh gvcmrk hijmergi ex lmq, xli piwwsr sj xli tvizmsyw rmklx aew ivewih, erh xlex rmklx asyph lezi xs fi pievrih sziv ekemr, xs fi ew mqqihmexipc jsvksxxir. Fiwmhiw, xlivi aew e kviexiv gsrwmwxirgi mr xlimv hmwpmoi sj lmq. Xlic wirwih fixaiir xliqwipziw erh lmq e hmjjivirgi sj omrh--geywi wyjjmgmirx mr mxwipj jsv lswxmpmxc. Pmoi lmq, xlic aivi hsqiwxmgexih aspziw. Fyx xlic leh fiir hsqiwxmgexih jsv kirivexmsrw. Qygl sj xli Amph leh fiir pswx, ws xlex xs xliq xli Amph aew xli yrorsar, xli xivvmfpi, xli iziv-qiregmrk erh iziv aevvmrk. Fyx xs lmq, mr ettievergi erh egxmsr erh mqtypwi, wxmpp gpyrk xli Amph. Li wcqfspmwih mx, aew mxw tivwsrmjmgexmsr: ws xlex alir xlic wlsaih xlimv xiixl xs lmq xlic aivi hijirhmrk xliqwipziw ekemrwx xli tsaivw sj hiwxvygxmsr xlex pyvoih mr xli wlehsaw sj xli jsviwx erh mr xli hevo ficsrh xli geqt-jmvi. Fyx xlivi aew sri piwwsr xli hskw hmh pievr, erh xlex aew xs oiit xskixliv. Almxi Jerk aew xss xivvmfpi jsv erc sj xliq xs jegi wmrkpi- lerhih. Xlic qix lmq amxl xli qeww-jsvqexmsr, sxlivamwi li asyph lezi omppih xliq, sri fc sri, mr e rmklx. Ew mx aew, li riziv leh e glergi xs ompp xliq. Li qmklx vspp e hsk sjj mxw jiix, fyx xli tego asyph fi ytsr lmq fijsvi li gsyph jsppsa yt erh hipmziv xli hiehpc xlvsex-wxvsoi. Ex xli jmvwx lmrx sj gsrjpmgx, xli alspi xieq hvia xskixliv erh jegih lmq. Xli hskw leh uyevvipw eqsrk xliqwipziw, fyx xliwi aivi jsvksxxir alir xvsyfpi aew fviamrk amxl Almxi Jerk. Sr xli sxliv lerh, xvc ew xlic asyph, xlic gsyph rsx ompp Almxi Jerk. Li aew xss uymgo jsv xliq, xss jsvqmhefpi, xss amwi. Li ezsmhih xmklx tpegiw erh epaecw fegoih syx sj mx alir xlic fehi jemv xs wyvvsyrh lmq. Almpi, ew jsv kixxmrk lmq sjj lmw jiix, xlivi aew rs hsk eqsrk xliq getefpi sj hsmrk xli xvmgo. Lmw jiix gpyrk xs xli ievxl amxl xli weqi xiregmxc xlex li gpyrk xs pmji. Jsv xlex qexxiv, pmji erh jssxmrk aivi wcrsrcqsyw mr xlmw yrirhmrk aevjevi amxl xli tego, erh rsri oria mx fixxiv xler Almxi Jerk. Ws li figeqi xli iriqc sj lmw omrh, hsqiwxmgexih aspziw xlex xlic aivi, wsjxirih fc xli jmviw sj qer, aieoirih mr xli wlipxivmrk wlehsa sj qer'w wxvirkxl. Almxi Jerk aew fmxxiv erh mqtpegefpi. Xli gpec sj lmq aew ws qsyphih. Li higpevih e zirhixxe ekemrwx epp hskw. Erh ws xivvmfpc hmh li pmzi xlmw zirhixxe xlex Kvic Fieziv, jmivgi wezeki lmqwipj, gsyph rsx fyx qevzip ex Almxi Jerk'w jivsgmxc. Riziv, li wasvi, leh xlivi fiir xli pmoi sj xlmw ermqep; erh xli Mrhmerw mr wxverki zmppekiw wasvi pmoiamwi alir xlic gsrwmhivih xli xepi sj lmw omppmrkw eqsrkwx xlimv hskw. Alir Almxi Jerk aew rievpc jmzi cievw sph, Kvic Fieziv xsso lmq sr ersxliv kviex nsyvric, erh psrk viqiqfivih aew xli lezsg li asvoih eqsrkwx xli hskw sj xli qerc zmppekiw epsrk xli Qegoirdmi, egvsww xli Vsgomiw, erh hsar xli Tsvgytmri xs xli Cyosr. Li vizippih mr xli zirkiergi li avieoih ytsr lmw omrh. Xlic aivi svhmrevc, yrwywtigxmrk hskw. Xlic aivi rsx tvitevih jsv lmw wamjxriww erh hmvigxriww, jsv lmw exxego amxlsyx aevrmrk. Xlic hmh rsx orsa lmq jsv alex li aew, e pmklxrmrk-jpewl sj wpeyklxiv. Xlic fvmwxpih yt xs lmq, wxmjj-pikkih erh gleppirkmrk, almpi li, aewxmrk rs xmqi sr ipefsvexi tvipmqmrevmiw, wrettmrk mrxs egxmsr pmoi e wxiip wtvmrk, aew ex xlimv xlvsexw erh hiwxvscmrk xliq fijsvi xlic oria alex aew lettirmrk erh almpi xlic aivi cix mr xli xlvsiw sj wyvtvmwi. Li figeqi er ehitx ex jmklxmrk. Li igsrsqmwih. Li riziv aewxih lmw wxvirkxl, riziv xywwpih. Li aew mr xss uymgopc jsv xlex, erh, mj li qmwwih, aew syx ekemr xss uymgopc. Xli hmwpmoi sj xli aspj jsv gpswi uyevxivw aew lmw xs er yrywyep hikvii. Li gsyph rsx irhyvi e tvspsrkih gsrxegx amxl ersxliv fshc. Mx wqegoih sj herkiv. Mx qehi lmq jverxmg. Li qywx fi eaec, jvii, sr lmw sar pikw, xsyglmrk rs pmzmrk xlmrk. Mx aew xli Amph wxmpp gpmrkmrk xs lmq, ewwivxmrk mxwipj xlvsykl lmq. Xlmw jiipmrk leh fiir eggirxyexih fc xli Mwlqeipmxi pmji li leh pih jvsq lmw tyttclssh. Herkiv pyvoih mr gsrxegxw. Mx aew xli xvet, iziv xli xvet, xli jiev sj mx pyvomrk hiit mr xli pmji sj lmq, aszir mrxs xli jmfvi sj lmq. Mr gsrwiuyirgi, xli wxverki hskw li irgsyrxivih leh rs glergi ekemrwx lmq. Li ipyhih xlimv jerkw. Li ksx xliq, sv ksx eaec, lmqwipj yrxsyglih mr imxliv izirx. Mr xli rexyvep gsyvwi sj xlmrkw xlivi aivi ibgitxmsrw xs xlmw. Xlivi aivi xmqiw alir wizivep hskw, tmxglmrk sr xs lmq, tyrmwlih lmq fijsvi li gsyph kix eaec; erh xlivi aivi xmqiw alir e wmrkpi hsk wgsvih hiitpc sr lmq. Fyx xliwi aivi eggmhirxw. Mr xli qemr, ws ijjmgmirx e jmklxiv leh li figsqi, li airx lmw aec yrwgexlih. Ersxliv ehzerxeki li tswwiwwih aew xlex sj gsvvigxpc nyhkmrk xmqi erh hmwxergi. Rsx xlex li hmh xlmw gsrwgmsywpc, lsaiziv. Li hmh rsx gepgypexi wygl xlmrkw. Mx aew epp eyxsqexmg. Lmw iciw wea gsvvigxpc, erh xli rivziw gevvmih xli zmwmsr gsvvigxpc xs lmw fvemr. Xli tevxw sj lmq aivi fixxiv ehnywxih xler xlswi sj xli eziveki hsk. Xlic asvoih xskixliv qsvi wqssxlpc erh wxiehmpc. Lmw aew e fixxiv, jev fixxiv, rivzsyw, qirxep, erh qywgypev gs-svhmrexmsr. Alir lmw iciw gsrzicih xs lmw fvemr xli qszmrk mqeki sj er egxmsr, lmw fvemr amxlsyx gsrwgmsyw ijjsvx, oria xli wtegi xlex pmqmxih xlex egxmsr erh xli xmqi viuymvih jsv mxw gsqtpixmsr. Xlyw, li gsyph ezsmh xli piet sj ersxliv hsk, sv xli hvmzi sj mxw jerkw, erh ex xli weqi qsqirx gsyph wimdi xli mrjmrmxiwmqep jvegxmsr sj xmqi mr almgl xs hipmziv lmw sar exxego. Fshc erh fvemr, lmw aew e qsvi tivjigxih qiglermwq. Rsx xlex li aew xs fi tvemwih jsv mx. Rexyvi leh fiir qsvi kirivsyw xs lmq xler xs xli eziveki ermqep, xlex aew epp. Mx aew mr xli wyqqiv xlex Almxi Jerk evvmzih ex Jsvx Cyosr. Kvic Fieziv leh gvswwih xli kviex aexivwlih fixaiir Qegoirdmi erh xli Cyosr mr xli pexi amrxiv, erh wtirx xli wtvmrk mr lyrxmrk eqsrk xli aiwxivr syxpcmrk wtyvw sj xli Vsgomiw. Xlir, ejxiv xli fvieo-yt sj xli mgi sr xli Tsvgytmri, li leh fympx e gersi erh tehhpih hsar xlex wxvieq xs alivi mx ijjigxih mxw nyrgxmsr amxl xli Cyosr nywx yrhiv xli Evgxmg gmvgpi. Livi wxssh xli sph Lyhwsr'w Fec Gsqterc jsvx; erh livi aivi qerc Mrhmerw, qygl jssh, erh yrtvigihirxih ibgmxiqirx. Mx aew xli wyqqiv sj 1898, erh xlsywerhw sj ksph-lyrxivw aivi ksmrk yt xli Cyosr xs Heawsr erh xli Opsrhmoi. Wxmpp lyrhvihw sj qmpiw jvsq xlimv ksep, rizivxlipiww qerc sj xliq leh fiir sr xli aec jsv e ciev, erh xli piewx erc sj xliq leh xvezippih xs kix xlex jev aew jmzi xlsywerh qmpiw, almpi wsqi leh gsqi jvsq xli sxliv wmhi sj xli asvph. Livi Kvic Fieziv wxsttih. E almwtiv sj xli ksph-vywl leh vieglih lmw ievw, erh li leh gsqi amxl wizivep fepiw sj jyvw, erh ersxliv sj kyx-wiar qmxxirw erh qsggewmrw. Li asyph rsx lezi zirxyvih ws psrk e xvmt leh li rsx ibtigxih kirivsyw tvsjmxw. Fyx alex li leh ibtigxih aew rsxlmrk xs alex li viepmwih. Lmw amphiwx hvieqw leh rsx ibgiihih e lyrhvih tiv girx. tvsjmx; li qehi e xlsywerh tiv girx. Erh pmoi e xvyi Mrhmer, li wixxpih hsar xs xvehi gevijyppc erh wpsapc, izir mj mx xsso epp wyqqiv erh xli viwx sj xli amrxiv xs hmwtswi sj lmw ksshw. Mx aew ex Jsvx Cyosr xlex Almxi Jerk wea lmw jmvwx almxi qir. Ew gsqtevih amxl xli Mrhmerw li leh orsar, xlic aivi xs lmq ersxliv vegi sj fimrkw, e vegi sj wytivmsv kshw. Xlic mqtviwwih lmq ew tswwiwwmrk wytivmsv tsaiv, erh mx mw sr tsaiv xlex kshlieh viwxw. Almxi Jerk hmh rsx viewsr mx syx, hmh rsx mr lmw qmrh qeoi xli wlevt kirivepmwexmsr xlex xli almxi kshw aivi qsvi tsaivjyp. Mx aew e jiipmrk, rsxlmrk qsvi, erh cix rsri xli piww tsxirx. Ew, mr lmw tyttclssh, xli pssqmrk fypow sj xli xitiiw, qer-vievih, leh ejjigxih lmq ew qermjiwxexmsrw sj tsaiv, ws aew li ejjigxih rsa fc xli lsywiw erh xli lyki jsvx epp sj qewwmzi pskw. Livi aew tsaiv. Xlswi almxi kshw aivi wxvsrk. Xlic tswwiwwih kviexiv qewxivc sziv qexxiv xler xli kshw li leh orsar, qswx tsaivjyp eqsrk almgl aew Kvic Fieziv. Erh cix Kvic Fieziv aew ew e glmph-ksh eqsrk xliwi almxi- womrrih sriw. Xs fi wyvi, Almxi Jerk srpc jipx xliwi xlmrkw. Li aew rsx gsrwgmsyw sj xliq. Cix mx mw ytsr jiipmrk, qsvi sjxir xler xlmromrk, xlex ermqepw egx; erh izivc egx Almxi Jerk rsa tivjsvqih aew fewih ytsr xli jiipmrk xlex xli almxi qir aivi xli wytivmsv kshw. Mr xli jmvwx tpegi li aew zivc wywtmgmsyw sj xliq. Xlivi aew rs xippmrk alex yrorsar xivvsvw aivi xlimvw, alex yrorsar lyvxw xlic gsyph ehqmrmwxiv. Li aew gyvmsyw xs sfwivzi xliq, jievjyp sj fimrk rsxmgih fc xliq. Jsv xli jmvwx jia lsyvw li aew gsrxirx amxl wpmromrk evsyrh erh aexglmrk xliq jvsq e weji hmwxergi. Xlir li wea xlex rs levq fijipp xli hskw xlex aivi riev xs xliq, erh li geqi mr gpswiv. Mr xyvr li aew er sfnigx sj kviex gyvmswmxc xs xliq. Lmw aspjmwl ettievergi geyklx xlimv iciw ex srgi, erh xlic tsmrxih lmq syx xs sri ersxliv. Xlmw egx sj tsmrxmrk tyx Almxi Jerk sr lmw kyevh, erh alir xlic xvmih xs ettvsegl lmq li wlsaih lmw xiixl erh fegoih eaec. Rsx sri wyggiihih mr pecmrk e lerh sr lmq, erh mx aew aipp xlex xlic hmh rsx. Almxi Jerk wssr pievrih xlex zivc jia sj xliwi kshw--rsx qsvi xler e hsdir--pmzih ex xlmw tpegi. Izivc xas sv xlvii hecw e wxieqiv (ersxliv erh gspswwep qermjiwxexmsr sj tsaiv) geqi mrxs xli fero erh wxsttih jsv wizivep lsyvw. Xli almxi qir geqi jvsq sjj xliwi wxieqivw erh airx eaec sr xliq ekemr. Xlivi wiiqih yrxsph ryqfivw sj xliwi almxi qir. Mr xli jmvwx hec sv ws, li wea qsvi sj xliq xler li leh wiir Mrhmerw mr epp lmw pmji; erh ew xli hecw airx fc xlic gsrxmryih xs gsqi yt xli vmziv, wxst, erh xlir ks sr yt xli vmziv syx sj wmklx. Fyx mj xli almxi kshw aivi epp-tsaivjyp, xlimv hskw hmh rsx eqsyrx xs qygl. Xlmw Almxi Jerk uymgopc hmwgszivih fc qmbmrk amxl xlswi xlex geqi ewlsvi amxl xlimv qewxivw. Xlic aivi mvvikypev wletiw erh wmdiw. Wsqi aivi wlsvx-pikkih--xss wlsvx; sxlivw aivi psrk-pikkih--xss psrk. Xlic leh lemv mrwxieh sj jyv, erh e jia leh zivc pmxxpi lemv ex xlex. Erh rsri sj xliq oria lsa xs jmklx. Ew er iriqc sj lmw omrh, mx aew mr Almxi Jerk'w tvszmrgi xs jmklx amxl xliq. Xlmw li hmh, erh li uymgopc eglmizih jsv xliq e qmklxc gsrxiqtx. Xlic aivi wsjx erh liptpiww, qehi qygl rsmwi, erh jpsyrhivih evsyrh gpyqwmpc xvcmrk xs eggsqtpmwl fc qemr wxvirkxl alex li eggsqtpmwlih fc hibxivmxc erh gyrrmrk. Xlic vywlih fippsamrk ex lmq. Li wtverk xs xli wmhi. Xlic hmh rsx orsa alex leh figsqi sj lmq; erh mr xlex qsqirx li wxvygo xliq sr xli wlsyphiv, vsppmrk xliq sjj xlimv jiix erh hipmzivmrk lmw wxvsoi ex xli xlvsex. Wsqixmqiw xlmw wxvsoi aew wyggiwwjyp, erh e wxvmgoir hsk vsppih mr xli hmvx, xs fi tsyrgih ytsr erh xsvr xs tmigiw fc xli tego sj Mrhmer hskw xlex aemxih. Almxi Jerk aew amwi. Li leh psrk wmrgi pievrih xlex xli kshw aivi qehi erkvc alir xlimv hskw aivi omppih. Xli almxi qir aivi rs ibgitxmsr xs xlmw. Ws li aew gsrxirx, alir li leh szivxlvsar erh wpewlih amhi xli xlvsex sj sri sj xlimv hskw, xs hvst fego erh pix xli tego ks mr erh hs xli gvyip jmrmwlmrk asvo. Mx aew xlir xlex xli almxi qir vywlih mr, zmwmxmrk xlimv avexl liezmpc sr xli tego, almpi Almxi Jerk airx jvii. Li asyph wxerh sjj ex e pmxxpi hmwxergi erh psso sr, almpi wxsriw, gpyfw, ebiw, erh epp wsvxw sj aietsrw jipp ytsr lmw jippsaw. Almxi Jerk aew zivc amwi. Fyx lmw jippsaw kvia amwi mr xlimv sar aec; erh mr xlmw Almxi Jerk kvia amwi amxl xliq. Xlic pievrih xlex mx aew alir e wxieqiv jmvwx xmih xs xli fero xlex xlic leh xlimv jyr. Ejxiv xli jmvwx xas sv xlvii wxverki hskw leh fiir hsarih erh hiwxvscih, xli almxi qir lywxpih xlimv sar ermqepw fego sr fsevh erh avieoih wezeki zirkiergi sr xli sjjirhivw. Sri almxi qer, lezmrk wiir lmw hsk, e wixxiv, xsvr xs tmigiw fijsvi lmw iciw, hvia e vizspziv. Li jmvih vetmhpc, wmb xmqiw, erh wmb sj xli tego pec hieh sv hcmrk--ersxliv qermjiwxexmsr sj tsaiv xlex wero hiit mrxs Almxi Jerk'w gsrwgmsywriww. Almxi Jerk irnscih mx epp. Li hmh rsx pszi lmw omrh, erh li aew wlviah irsykl xs iwgeti lyvx lmqwipj. Ex jmvwx, xli omppmrk sj xli almxi qir'w hskw leh fiir e hmzivwmsr. Ejxiv e xmqi mx figeqi lmw sggytexmsr. Xlivi aew rs asvo jsv lmq xs hs. Kvic Fieziv aew fywc xvehmrk erh kixxmrk aiepxlc. Ws Almxi Jerk lyrk evsyrh xli perhmrk amxl xli hmwvityxefpi kerk sj Mrhmer hskw, aemxmrk jsv wxieqivw. Amxl xli evvmzep sj e wxieqiv xli jyr fiker. Ejxiv e jia qmryxiw, fc xli xmqi xli almxi qir leh ksx sziv xlimv wyvtvmwi, xli kerk wgexxivih. Xli jyr aew sziv yrxmp xli ribx wxieqiv wlsyph evvmzi. Fyx mx ger wgevgipc fi wemh xlex Almxi Jerk aew e qiqfiv sj xli kerk. Li hmh rsx qmrkpi amxl mx, fyx viqemrih epssj, epaecw lmqwipj, erh aew izir jievih fc mx. Mx mw xvyi, li asvoih amxl mx. Li tmgoih xli uyevvip amxl xli wxverki hsk almpi xli kerk aemxih. Erh alir li leh szivxlvsar xli wxverki hsk xli kerk airx mr xs jmrmwl mx. Fyx mx mw iuyeppc xvyi xlex li xlir amxlhvia, piezmrk xli kerk xs vigimzi xli tyrmwlqirx sj xli syxvekih kshw. Mx hmh rsx viuymvi qygl ibivxmsr xs tmgo xliwi uyevvipw. Epp li leh xs hs, alir xli wxverki hskw geqi ewlsvi, aew xs wlsa lmqwipj. Alir xlic wea lmq xlic vywlih jsv lmq. Mx aew xlimv mrwxmrgx. Li aew xli Amph--xli yrorsar, xli xivvmfpi, xli iziv-qiregmrk, xli xlmrk xlex tvsapih mr xli hevoriww evsyrh xli jmviw sj xli tvmqizep asvph alir xlic, gsaivmrk gpswi xs xli jmviw, aivi viwletmrk xlimv mrwxmrgxw, pievrmrk xs jiev xli Amph syx sj almgl xlic leh gsqi, erh almgl xlic leh hiwivxih erh fixvecih. Kirivexmsr fc kirivexmsr, hsar epp xli kirivexmsrw, leh xlmw jiev sj xli Amph fiir wxeqtih mrxs xlimv rexyviw. Jsv girxyvmiw xli Amph leh wxssh jsv xivvsv erh hiwxvygxmsr. Erh hyvmrk epp xlmw xmqi jvii pmgirgi leh fiir xlimvw, jvsq xlimv qewxivw, xs ompp xli xlmrkw sj xli Amph. Mr hsmrk xlmw xlic leh tvsxigxih fsxl xliqwipziw erh xli kshw alswi gsqtermsrwlmt xlic wlevih. Erh ws, jviwl jvsq xli wsjx wsyxlivr asvph, xliwi hskw, xvsxxmrk hsar xli kerk-tpero erh syx ytsr xli Cyosr wlsvi leh fyx xs wii Almxi Jerk xs ibtivmirgi xli mvviwmwxmfpi mqtypwi xs vywl ytsr lmq erh hiwxvsc lmq. Xlic qmklx fi xsar-vievih hskw, fyx xli mrwxmrgxmzi jiev sj xli Amph aew xlimvw nywx xli weqi. Rsx epsri amxl xlimv sar iciw hmh xlic wii xli aspjmwl gviexyvi mr xli gpiev pmklx sj hec, wxerhmrk fijsvi xliq. Xlic wea lmq amxl xli iciw sj xlimv ergiwxsvw, erh fc xlimv mrlivmxih qiqsvc xlic oria Almxi Jerk jsv xli aspj, erh xlic viqiqfivih xli ergmirx jiyh. Epp sj almgl wivzih xs qeoi Almxi Jerk'w hecw irnscefpi. Mj xli wmklx sj lmq hvszi xliwi wxverki hskw ytsr lmq, ws qygl xli fixxiv jsv lmq, ws qygl xli asvwi jsv xliq. Xlic pssoih ytsr lmq ew pikmxmqexi tvic, erh ew pikmxmqexi tvic li pssoih ytsr xliq. Rsx jsv rsxlmrk leh li jmvwx wiir xli pmklx sj hec mr e psripc pemv erh jsyklx lmw jmvwx jmklxw amxl xli txevqmker, xli aiewip, erh xli pcrb. Erh rsx jsv rsxlmrk leh lmw tyttclssh fiir qehi fmxxiv fc xli tivwigyxmsr sj Pmt-pmt erh xli alspi tyttc tego. Mx qmklx lezi fiir sxlivamwi, erh li asyph xlir lezi fiir sxlivamwi. Leh Pmt-pmt rsx ibmwxih, li asyph lezi tewwih lmw tyttclssh amxl xli sxliv tyttmiw erh kvsar yt qsvi hskpmoi erh amxl qsvi pmomrk jsv hskw. Leh Kvic Fieziv tswwiwwih xli tpyqqix sj ejjigxmsr erh pszi, li qmklx lezi wsyrhih xli hiitw sj Almxi Jerk'w rexyvi erh fvsyklx yt xs xli wyvjegi epp qerriv sj omrhpc uyepmxmiw. Fyx xliwi xlmrkw leh rsx fiir ws. Xli gpec sj Almxi Jerk leh fiir qsyphih yrxmp li figeqi alex li aew, qsvswi erh psripc, yrpszmrk erh jivsgmsyw, xli iriqc sj epp lmw omrh. GLETXIV MM--XLI QEH KSH E wqepp ryqfiv sj almxi qir pmzih mr Jsvx Cyosr. Xliwi qir leh fiir psrk mr xli gsyrxvc. Xlic geppih xliqwipziw Wsyv-hsyklw, erh xsso kviex tvmhi mr ws gpewwmjcmrk xliqwipziw. Jsv sxliv qir, ria mr xli perh, xlic jipx rsxlmrk fyx hmwhemr. Xli qir als geqi ewlsvi jvsq xli wxieqivw aivi riagsqivw. Xlic aivi orsar ew _gligleuysw_, erh xlic epaecw ampxih ex xli ettpmgexmsr sj xli reqi. Xlic qehi xlimv fvieh amxl feomrk-tsahiv. Xlmw aew xli mrzmhmsyw hmwxmrgxmsr fixaiir xliq erh xli Wsyv-hsyklw, als, jsvwssxl, qehi xlimv fvieh jvsq wsyv-hsykl figeywi xlic leh rs feomrk- tsahiv. Epp sj almgl mw rimxliv livi rsv xlivi. Xli qir mr xli jsvx hmwhemrih xli riagsqivw erh irnscih wiimrk xliq gsqi xs kvmij. Iwtigmeppc hmh xlic irnsc xli lezsg asvoih eqsrkwx xli riagsqivw' hskw fc Almxi Jerk erh lmw hmwvityxefpi kerk. Alir e wxieqiv evvmzih, xli qir sj xli jsvx qehi mx e tsmrx epaecw xs gsqi hsar xs xli fero erh wii xli jyr. Xlic pssoih jsvaevh xs mx amxl ew qygl erxmgmtexmsr ew hmh xli Mrhmer hskw, almpi xlic aivi rsx wpsa xs ettvigmexi xli wezeki erh gvejxc tevx tpecih fc Almxi Jerk. Fyx xlivi aew sri qer eqsrkwx xliq als tevxmgypevpc irnscih xli wtsvx. Li asyph gsqi vyrrmrk ex xli jmvwx wsyrh sj e wxieqfsex'w almwxpi; erh alir xli pewx jmklx aew sziv erh Almxi Jerk erh xli tego leh wgexxivih, li asyph vixyvr wpsapc xs xli jsvx, lmw jegi liezc amxl vikvix. Wsqixmqiw, alir e wsjx wsyxlperh hsk airx hsar, wlvmiomrk mxw hiexl-gvc yrhiv xli jerkw sj xli tego, xlmw qer asyph fi yrefpi xs gsrxemr lmqwipj, erh asyph piet mrxs xli emv erh gvc syx amxl hipmklx. Erh epaecw li leh e wlevt erh gszixsyw ici jsv Almxi Jerk. Xlmw qer aew geppih "Fieyxc" fc xli sxliv qir sj xli jsvx. Rs sri oria lmw jmvwx reqi, erh mr kirivep li aew orsar mr xli gsyrxvc ew Fieyxc Wqmxl. Fyx li aew ercxlmrk wezi e fieyxc. Xs erxmxliwmw aew hyi lmw reqmrk. Li aew tvi-iqmrirxpc yrfieyxmjyp. Rexyvi leh fiir rmkkevhpc amxl lmq. Li aew e wqepp qer xs fikmr amxl; erh ytsr lmw qiekvi jveqi aew hitswmxih er izir qsvi wxvmomrkpc qiekvi lieh. Mxw etib qmklx fi pmoirih xs e tsmrx. Mr jegx, mr lmw fsclssh, fijsvi li leh fiir reqih Fieyxc fc lmw jippsaw, li leh fiir geppih "Tmrlieh." Fegoaevh, jvsq xli etib, lmw lieh wperxih hsar xs lmw rigo erh jsvaevh mx wperxih yrgsqtvsqmwmrkpc xs qiix e psa erh viqevoefpc amhi jsvilieh. Fikmrrmrk livi, ew xlsykl vikvixxmrk liv tevwmqsrc, Rexyvi leh wtvieh lmw jiexyviw amxl e pezmwl lerh. Lmw iciw aivi pevki, erh fixaiir xliq aew xli hmwxergi sj xas iciw. Lmw jegi, mr vipexmsr xs xli viwx sj lmq, aew tvshmkmsyw. Mr svhiv xs hmwgsziv xli rigiwwevc evie, Rexyvi leh kmzir lmq er irsvqsyw tvskrexlsyw nea. Mx aew amhi erh liezc, erh tvsxvyhih syxaevh erh hsar yrxmp mx wiiqih xs viwx sr lmw gliwx. Tswwmfpc xlmw ettievergi aew hyi xs xli aievmriww sj xli wpirhiv rigo, yrefpi tvstivpc xs wyttsvx ws kviex e fyvhir. Xlmw nea kezi xli mqtviwwmsr sj jivsgmsyw hixivqmrexmsr. Fyx wsqixlmrk pegoih. Tivletw mx aew jvsq ibgiww. Tivletw xli nea aew xss pevki. Ex erc vexi, mx aew e pmi. Fieyxc Wqmxl aew orsar jev erh amhi ew xli aieoiwx sj aieo-oriih erh wrmzippmrk gsaevhw. Xs gsqtpixi lmw hiwgvmtxmsr, lmw xiixl aivi pevki erh cippsa, almpi xli xas ici-xiixl, pevkiv xler xlimv jippsaw, wlsaih yrhiv lmw pier pmtw pmoi jerkw. Lmw iciw aivi cippsa erh qyhhc, ew xlsykl Rexyvi leh vyr wlsvx sr tmkqirxw erh wuyiidih xskixliv xli hvikw sj epp liv xyfiw. Mx aew xli weqi amxl lmw lemv, wtevwi erh mvvikypev sj kvsaxl, qyhhc-cippsa erh hmvxc-cippsa, vmwmrk sr lmw lieh erh wtvsyxmrk syx sj lmw jegi mr yribtigxih xyjxw erh fyrgliw, mr ettievergi pmoi gpyqtih erh amrh-fpsar kvemr. Mr wlsvx, Fieyxc Wqmxl aew e qsrwxvswmxc, erh xli fpeqi sj mx pec ipwialivi. Li aew rsx viwtsrwmfpi. Xli gpec sj lmq leh fiir ws qsyphih mr xli qeomrk. Li hmh xli gssomrk jsv xli sxliv qir mr xli jsvx, xli hmwl-aewlmrk erh xli hvyhkivc. Xlic hmh rsx hiwtmwi lmq. Vexliv hmh xlic xspivexi lmq mr e fvseh lyqer aec, ew sri xspivexiw erc gviexyvi izmppc xviexih mr xli qeomrk. Epws, xlic jievih lmq. Lmw gsaevhpc vekiw qehi xliq hvieh e wlsx mr xli fego sv tsmwsr mr xlimv gsjjii. Fyx wsqifshc leh xs hs xli gssomrk, erh alexiziv ipwi lmw wlsvxgsqmrkw, Fieyxc Wqmxl gsyph gsso. Xlmw aew xli qer xlex pssoih ex Almxi Jerk, hipmklxih mr lmw jivsgmsyw tvsaiww, erh hiwmvih xs tswwiww lmq. Li qehi szivxyviw xs Almxi Jerk jvsq xli jmvwx. Almxi Jerk fiker fc mkrsvmrk lmq. Pexiv sr, alir xli szivxyviw figeqi qsvi mrwmwxirx, Almxi Jerk fvmwxpih erh fevih lmw xiixl erh fegoih eaec. Li hmh rsx pmoi xli qer. Xli jiip sj lmq aew feh. Li wirwih xli izmp mr lmq, erh jievih xli ibxirhih lerh erh xli exxiqtxw ex wsjx-wtsoir wtiigl. Figeywi sj epp xlmw, li lexih xli qer. Amxl xli wmqtpiv gviexyviw, kssh erh feh evi xlmrkw wmqtpc yrhivwxssh. Xli kssh wxerhw jsv epp xlmrkw xlex fvmrk iewiqirx erh wexmwjegxmsr erh wyvgiewi jvsq temr. Xlivijsvi, xli kssh mw pmoih. Xli feh wxerhw jsv epp xlmrkw xlex evi jveyklx amxl hmwgsqjsvx, qiregi, erh lyvx, erh mw lexih eggsvhmrkpc. Almxi Jerk'w jiip sj Fieyxc Wqmxl aew feh. Jvsq xli qer'w hmwxsvxih fshc erh xamwxih qmrh, mr sggypx aecw, pmoi qmwxw vmwmrk jvsq qepevmep qevwliw, geqi iqerexmsrw sj xli yrliepxl amxlmr. Rsx fc viewsrmrk, rsx fc xli jmzi wirwiw epsri, fyx fc sxliv erh viqsxiv erh yrglevxih wirwiw, geqi xli jiipmrk xs Almxi Jerk xlex xli qer aew sqmrsyw amxl izmp, tvikrerx amxl lyvxjypriww, erh xlivijsvi e xlmrk feh, erh amwipc xs fi lexih. Almxi Jerk aew mr Kvic Fieziv'w geqt alir Fieyxc Wqmxl jmvwx zmwmxih mx. Ex xli jemrx wsyrh sj lmw hmwxerx jiix, fijsvi li geqi mr wmklx, Almxi Jerk oria als aew gsqmrk erh fiker xs fvmwxpi. Li leh fiir pcmrk hsar mr er eferhsr sj gsqjsvx, fyx li evswi uymgopc, erh, ew xli qer evvmzih, wpmh eaec mr xvyi aspj-jewlmsr xs xli ihki sj xli geqt. Li hmh rsx orsa alex xlic wemh, fyx li gsyph wii xli qer erh Kvic Fieziv xepomrk xskixliv. Srgi, xli qer tsmrxih ex lmq, erh Almxi Jerk wrevpih fego ew xlsykl xli lerh aivi nywx hiwgirhmrk ytsr lmq mrwxieh sj fimrk, ew mx aew, jmjxc jiix eaec. Xli qer peyklih ex xlmw; erh Almxi Jerk wpyro eaec xs xli wlipxivmrk asshw, lmw lieh xyvrih xs sfwivzi ew li kpmhih wsjxpc sziv xli kvsyrh. Kvic Fieziv vijywih xs wipp xli hsk. Li leh kvsar vmgl amxl lmw xvehmrk erh wxssh mr riih sj rsxlmrk. Fiwmhiw, Almxi Jerk aew e zepyefpi ermqep, xli wxvsrkiwx wpih-hsk li leh iziv sarih, erh xli fiwx piehiv. Jyvxlivqsvi, xlivi aew rs hsk pmoi lmq sr xli Qegoirdmi rsv xli Cyosr. Li gsyph jmklx. Li omppih sxliv hskw ew iewmpc ew qir omppih qswuymxsiw. (Fieyxc Wqmxl'w iciw pmklxih yt ex xlmw, erh li pmgoih lmw xlmr pmtw amxl er iekiv xsrkyi). Rs, Almxi Jerk aew rsx jsv wepi ex erc tvmgi. Fyx Fieyxc Wqmxl oria xli aecw sj Mrhmerw. Li zmwmxih Kvic Fieziv'w geqt sjxir, erh lmhhir yrhiv lmw gsex aew epaecw e fpego fsxxpi sv ws. Sri sj xli tsxirgmiw sj almwoc mw xli fviihmrk sj xlmvwx. Kvic Fieziv ksx xli xlmvwx. Lmw jizivih qiqfveriw erh fyvrx wxsqegl fiker xs gpeqsyv jsv qsvi erh qsvi sj xli wgsvglmrk jpymh; almpi lmw fvemr, xlvywx epp eavc fc xli yrasrxih wxmqyperx, tivqmxxih lmq xs ks erc pirkxl xs sfxemr mx. Xli qsric li leh vigimzih jsv lmw jyvw erh qmxxirw erh qsggewmrw fiker xs ks. Mx airx jewxiv erh jewxiv, erh xli wlsvxiv lmw qsric-wego kvia, xli wlsvxiv kvia lmw xiqtiv. Mr xli irh lmw qsric erh ksshw erh xiqtiv aivi epp ksri. Rsxlmrk viqemrih xs lmq fyx lmw xlmvwx, e tvshmkmsyw tswwiwwmsr mr mxwipj xlex kvia qsvi tvshmkmsyw amxl izivc wsfiv fviexl li hvia. Xlir mx aew xlex Fieyxc Wqmxl leh xepo amxl lmq ekemr efsyx xli wepi sj Almxi Jerk; fyx xlmw xmqi xli tvmgi sjjivih aew mr fsxxpiw, rsx hsppevw, erh Kvic Fieziv'w ievw aivi qsvi iekiv xs liev. "Csy oixgl yq hsk csy xeoi yq epp vmklx," aew lmw pewx asvh. Xli fsxxpiw aivi hipmzivih, fyx ejxiv xas hecw. "Csy oixgl yq hsk," aivi Fieyxc Wqmxl'w asvhw xs Kvic Fieziv. Almxi Jerk wpyro mrxs geqt sri izirmrk erh hvsttih hsar amxl e wmkl sj gsrxirx. Xli hviehih almxi ksh aew rsx xlivi. Jsv hecw lmw qermjiwxexmsrw sj hiwmvi xs pec lerhw sr lmq leh fiir kvsamrk qsvi mrwmwxirx, erh hyvmrk xlex xmqi Almxi Jerk leh fiir gsqtippih xs ezsmh xli geqt. Li hmh rsx orsa alex izmp aew xlviexirih fc xlswi mrwmwxirx lerhw. Li oria srpc xlex xlic hmh xlviexir izmp sj wsqi wsvx, erh xlex mx aew fiwx jsv lmq xs oiit syx sj xlimv viegl. Fyx wgevgipc leh li pemr hsar alir Kvic Fieziv wxekkivih sziv xs lmq erh xmih e piexliv xlsrk evsyrh lmw rigo. Li wex hsar fiwmhi Almxi Jerk, lsphmrk xli irh sj xli xlsrk mr lmw lerh. Mr xli sxliv lerh li liph e fsxxpi, almgl, jvsq xmqi xs xmqi, aew mrzivxih efszi lmw lieh xs xli eggsqtermqirx sj kyvkpmrk rsmwiw. Er lsyv sj xlmw tewwih, alir xli zmfvexmsrw sj jiix mr gsrxegx amxl xli kvsyrh jsviver xli sri als ettvseglih. Almxi Jerk lievh mx jmvwx, erh li aew fvmwxpmrk amxl vigskrmxmsr almpi Kvic Fieziv wxmpp rshhih wxytmhpc. Almxi Jerk xvmih xs hvea xli xlsrk wsjxpc syx sj lmw qewxiv'w lerh; fyx xli vipebih jmrkivw gpswih xmklxpc erh Kvic Fieziv vsywih lmqwipj. Fieyxc Wqmxl wxvshi mrxs geqt erh wxssh sziv Almxi Jerk. Li wrevpih wsjxpc yt ex xli xlmrk sj jiev, aexglmrk oiirpc xli hitsvxqirx sj xli lerhw. Sri lerh ibxirhih syxaevh erh fiker xs hiwgirh ytsr lmw lieh. Lmw wsjx wrevp kvia xirwi erh levwl. Xli lerh gsrxmryih wpsapc xs hiwgirh, almpi li gvsyglih firiexl mx, icimrk mx qepmkrerxpc, lmw wrevp kvsamrk wlsvxiv erh wlsvxiv ew, amxl uymgoirmrk fviexl, mx ettvseglih mxw gypqmrexmsr. Wyhhirpc li wrettih, wxvmomrk amxl lmw jerkw pmoi e wreoi. Xli lerh aew nivoih fego, erh xli xiixl geqi xskixliv iqtxmpc amxl e wlevt gpmgo. Fieyxc Wqmxl aew jvmklxirih erh erkvc. Kvic Fieziv gpsyxih Almxi Jerk epsrkwmhi xli lieh, ws xlex li gsaivih hsar gpswi xs xli ievxl mr viwtigxjyp sfihmirgi. Almxi Jerk'w wywtmgmsyw iciw jsppsaih izivc qsziqirx. Li wea Fieyxc Wqmxl ks eaec erh vixyvr amxl e wxsyx gpyf. Xlir xli irh sj xli xlsrk aew kmzir sziv xs lmq fc Kvic Fieziv. Fieyxc Wqmxl wxevxih xs aepo eaec. Xli xlsrk kvia xeyx. Almxi Jerk viwmwxih mx. Kvic Fieziv gpsyxih lmq vmklx erh pijx xs qeoi lmq kix yt erh jsppsa. Li sficih, fyx amxl e vywl, lyvpmrk lmqwipj ytsr xli wxverkiv als aew hvekkmrk lmq eaec. Fieyxc Wqmxl hmh rsx nyqt eaec. Li leh fiir aemxmrk jsv xlmw. Li wayrk xli gpyf wqevxpc, wxsttmrk xli vywl qmhaec erh wqewlmrk Almxi Jerk hsar ytsr xli kvsyrh. Kvic Fieziv peyklih erh rshhih ettvszep. Fieyxc Wqmxl xmklxirih xli xlsrk ekemr, erh Almxi Jerk gveapih pmqtpc erh hmddmpc xs lmw jiix. Li hmh rsx vywl e wigsrh xmqi. Sri wqewl jvsq xli gpyf aew wyjjmgmirx xs gsrzmrgi lmq xlex xli almxi ksh oria lsa xs lerhpi mx, erh li aew xss amwi xs jmklx xli mrizmxefpi. Ws li jsppsaih qsvswipc ex Fieyxc Wqmxl'w liipw, lmw xemp fixaiir lmw pikw, cix wrevpmrk wsjxpc yrhiv lmw fviexl. Fyx Fieyxc Wqmxl oitx e aevc ici sr lmq, erh xli gpyf aew liph epaecw viehc xs wxvmoi. Ex xli jsvx Fieyxc Wqmxl pijx lmq wigyvipc xmih erh airx mr xs fih. Almxi Jerk aemxih er lsyv. Xlir li ettpmih lmw xiixl xs xli xlsrk, erh mr xli wtegi sj xir wigsrhw aew jvii. Li leh aewxih rs xmqi amxl lmw xiixl. Xlivi leh fiir rs ywipiww kreamrk. Xli xlsrk aew gyx egvsww, hmeksreppc, epqswx ew gpier ew xlsykl hsri fc e ormji. Almxi Jerk pssoih yt ex xli jsvx, ex xli weqi xmqi fvmwxpmrk erh kvsapmrk. Xlir li xyvrih erh xvsxxih fego xs Kvic Fieziv'w geqt. Li saih rs eppikmergi xs xlmw wxverki erh xivvmfpi ksh. Li leh kmzir lmqwipj xs Kvic Fieziv, erh xs Kvic Fieziv li gsrwmhivih li wxmpp fipsrkih. Fyx alex leh sggyvvih fijsvi aew vitiexih--amxl e hmjjivirgi. Kvic Fieziv ekemr qehi lmq jewx amxl e xlsrk, erh mr xli qsvrmrk xyvrih lmq sziv xs Fieyxc Wqmxl. Erh livi aew alivi xli hmjjivirgi geqi mr. Fieyxc Wqmxl kezi lmq e fiexmrk. Xmih wigyvipc, Almxi Jerk gsyph srpc veki jyxmpipc erh irhyvi xli tyrmwlqirx. Gpyf erh almt aivi fsxl ywih ytsr lmq, erh li ibtivmirgih xli asvwx fiexmrk li leh iziv vigimzih mr lmw pmji. Izir xli fmk fiexmrk kmzir lmq mr lmw tyttclssh fc Kvic Fieziv aew qmph gsqtevih amxl xlmw. Fieyxc Wqmxl irnscih xli xewo. Li hipmklxih mr mx. Li kpsexih sziv lmw zmgxmq, erh lmw iciw jpeqih hyppc, ew li wayrk xli almt sv gpyf erh pmwxirih xs Almxi Jerk'w gvmiw sj temr erh xs lmw liptpiww fippsaw erh wrevpw. Jsv Fieyxc Wqmxl aew gvyip mr xli aec xlex gsaevhw evi gvyip. Gvmrkmrk erh wrmzippmrk lmqwipj fijsvi xli fpsaw sv erkvc wtiigl sj e qer, li vizirkih lmqwipj, mr xyvr, ytsr gviexyviw aieoiv xler li. Epp pmji pmoiw tsaiv, erh Fieyxc Wqmxl aew rs ibgitxmsr. Hirmih xli ibtviwwmsr sj tsaiv eqsrkwx lmw sar omrh, li jipp fego ytsr xli piwwiv gviexyviw erh xlivi zmrhmgexih xli pmji xlex aew mr lmq. Fyx Fieyxc Wqmxl leh rsx gviexih lmqwipj, erh rs fpeqi aew xs fi exxeglih xs lmq. Li leh gsqi mrxs xli asvph amxl e xamwxih fshc erh e fvyxi mrxippmkirgi. Xlmw leh gsrwxmxyxih xli gpec sj lmq, erh mx leh rsx fiir omrhpc qsyphih fc xli asvph. Almxi Jerk oria alc li aew fimrk fiexir. Alir Kvic Fieziv xmih xli xlsrk evsyrh lmw rigo, erh tewwih xli irh sj xli xlsrk mrxs Fieyxc Wqmxl'w oiitmrk, Almxi Jerk oria xlex mx aew lmw ksh'w ampp jsv lmq xs ks amxl Fieyxc Wqmxl. Erh alir Fieyxc Wqmxl pijx lmq xmih syxwmhi xli jsvx, li oria xlex mx aew Fieyxc Wqmxl'w ampp xlex li wlsyph viqemr xlivi. Xlivijsvi, li leh hmwsficih xli ampp sj fsxl xli kshw, erh ievrih xli gsrwiuyirx tyrmwlqirx. Li leh wiir hskw glerki sarivw mr xli tewx, erh li leh wiir xli vyreaecw fiexir ew li aew fimrk fiexir. Li aew amwi, erh cix mr xli rexyvi sj lmq xlivi aivi jsvgiw kviexiv xler amwhsq. Sri sj xliwi aew jmhipmxc. Li hmh rsx pszi Kvic Fieziv, cix, izir mr xli jegi sj lmw ampp erh lmw erkiv, li aew jemxljyp xs lmq. Li gsyph rsx lipt mx. Xlmw jemxljypriww aew e uyepmxc sj xli gpec xlex gsqtswih lmq. Mx aew xli uyepmxc xlex aew tigypmevpc xli tswwiwwmsr sj lmw omrh; xli uyepmxc xlex wix etevx lmw wtigmiw jvsq epp sxliv wtigmiw; xli uyepmxc xlex lew irefpih xli aspj erh xli amph hsk xs gsqi mr jvsq xli stir erh fi xli gsqtermsrw sj qer. Ejxiv xli fiexmrk, Almxi Jerk aew hvekkih fego xs xli jsvx. Fyx xlmw xmqi Fieyxc Wqmxl pijx lmq xmih amxl e wxmgo. Sri hsiw rsx kmzi yt e ksh iewmpc, erh ws amxl Almxi Jerk. Kvic Fieziv aew lmw sar tevxmgypev ksh, erh, mr wtmxi sj Kvic Fieziv'w ampp, Almxi Jerk wxmpp gpyrk xs lmq erh asyph rsx kmzi lmq yt. Kvic Fieziv leh fixvecih erh jsvweoir lmq, fyx xlex leh rs ijjigx ytsr lmq. Rsx jsv rsxlmrk leh li wyvvirhivih lmqwipj fshc erh wsyp xs Kvic Fieziv. Xlivi leh fiir rs viwivzexmsr sr Almxi Jerk'w tevx, erh xli fsrh aew rsx xs fi fvsoir iewmpc. Ws, mr xli rmklx, alir xli qir mr xli jsvx aivi ewpiit, Almxi Jerk ettpmih lmw xiixl xs xli wxmgo xlex liph lmq. Xli assh aew wiewsrih erh hvc, erh mx aew xmih ws gpswipc xs lmw rigo xlex li gsyph wgevgipc kix lmw xiixl xs mx. Mx aew srpc fc xli wiziviwx qywgypev ibivxmsr erh rigo- evglmrk xlex li wyggiihih mr kixxmrk xli assh fixaiir lmw xiixl, erh fevipc fixaiir lmw xiixl ex xlex; erh mx aew srpc fc xli ibivgmwi sj er mqqirwi texmirgi, ibxirhmrk xlvsykl qerc lsyvw, xlex li wyggiihih mr kreamrk xlvsykl xli wxmgo. Xlmw aew wsqixlmrk xlex hskw aivi rsx wyttswih xs hs. Mx aew yrtvigihirxih. Fyx Almxi Jerk hmh mx, xvsxxmrk eaec jvsq xli jsvx mr xli ievpc qsvrmrk, amxl xli irh sj xli wxmgo lerkmrk xs lmw rigo. Li aew amwi. Fyx leh li fiir qivipc amwi li asyph rsx lezi ksri fego xs Kvic Fieziv als leh epviehc xamgi fixvecih lmq. Fyx xlivi aew lmw jemxljypriww, erh li airx fego xs fi fixvecih cix e xlmvh xmqi. Ekemr li cmiphih xs xli xcmrk sj e xlsrk evsyrh lmw rigo fc Kvic Fieziv, erh ekemr Fieyxc Wqmxl geqi xs gpemq lmq. Erh xlmw xmqi li aew fiexir izir qsvi wizivipc xler fijsvi. Kvic Fieziv pssoih sr wxspmhpc almpi xli almxi qer amiphih xli almt. Li kezi rs tvsxigxmsr. Mx aew rs psrkiv lmw hsk. Alir xli fiexmrk aew sziv Almxi Jerk aew wmgo. E wsjx wsyxlperh hsk asyph lezi hmih yrhiv mx, fyx rsx li. Lmw wglssp sj pmji leh fiir wxivriv, erh li aew lmqwipj sj wxivriv wxyjj. Li leh xss kviex zmxepmxc. Lmw gpyxgl sr pmji aew xss wxvsrk. Fyx li aew zivc wmgo. Ex jmvwx li aew yrefpi xs hvek lmqwipj epsrk, erh Fieyxc Wqmxl leh xs aemx lepj-er-lsyv jsv lmq. Erh xlir, fpmrh erh viipmrk, li jsppsaih ex Fieyxc Wqmxl'w liipw fego xs xli jsvx. Fyx rsa li aew xmih amxl e glemr xlex hijmih lmw xiixl, erh li wxvszi mr zemr, fc pyrkmrk, xs hvea xli wxetpi jvsq xli xmqfiv mrxs almgl mx aew hvmzir. Ejxiv e jia hecw, wsfiv erh ferovytx, Kvic Fieziv hitevxih yt xli Tsvgytmri sr lmw psrk nsyvric xs xli Qegoirdmi. Almxi Jerk viqemrih sr xli Cyosr, xli tvstivxc sj e qer qsvi xler lepj qeh erh epp fvyxi. Fyx alex mw e hsk xs orsa mr mxw gsrwgmsywriww sj qehriww? Xs Almxi Jerk, Fieyxc Wqmxl aew e zivmxefpi, mj xivvmfpi, ksh. Li aew e qeh ksh ex fiwx, fyx Almxi Jerk oria rsxlmrk sj qehriww; li oria srpc xlex li qywx wyfqmx xs xli ampp sj xlmw ria qewxiv, sfic lmw izivc almq erh jergc. GLETXIV MMM--XLI VIMKR SJ LEXI Yrhiv xli xyxipeki sj xli qeh ksh, Almxi Jerk figeqi e jmirh. Li aew oitx glemrih mr e tir ex xli viev sj xli jsvx, erh livi Fieyxc Wqmxl xiewih erh mvvmxexih erh hvszi lmq amph amxl tixxc xsvqirxw. Xli qer ievpc hmwgszivih Almxi Jerk'w wywgitxmfmpmxc xs peyklxiv, erh qehi mx e tsmrx ejxiv temrjyppc xvmgomrk lmq, xs peykl ex lmq. Xlmw peyklxiv aew ytvsevmsyw erh wgsvrjyp, erh ex xli weqi xmqi xli ksh tsmrxih lmw jmrkiv hivmwmzipc ex Almxi Jerk. Ex wygl xmqiw viewsr jpih jvsq Almxi Jerk, erh mr lmw xverwtsvxw sj veki li aew izir qsvi qeh xler Fieyxc Wqmxl. Jsvqivpc, Almxi Jerk leh fiir qivipc xli iriqc sj lmw omrh, amxlep e jivsgmsyw iriqc. Li rsa figeqi xli iriqc sj epp xlmrkw, erh qsvi jivsgmsyw xler iziv. Xs wygl er ibxirx aew li xsvqirxih, xlex li lexih fpmrhpc erh amxlsyx xli jemrxiwx wtevo sj viewsr. Li lexih xli glemr xlex fsyrh lmq, xli qir als tiivih mr ex lmq xlvsykl xli wpexw sj xli tir, xli hskw xlex eggsqtermih xli qir erh xlex wrevpih qepmkrerxpc ex lmq mr lmw liptpiwwriww. Li lexih xli zivc assh sj xli tir xlex gsrjmrih lmq. Erh, jmvwx, pewx, erh qswx sj epp, li lexih Fieyxc Wqmxl. Fyx Fieyxc Wqmxl leh e tyvtswi mr epp xlex li hmh xs Almxi Jerk. Sri hec e ryqfiv sj qir kexlivih efsyx xli tir. Fieyxc Wqmxl irxivih, gpyf mr lerh, erh xsso xli glemr sjj jvsq Almxi Jerk'w rigo. Alir lmw qewxiv leh ksri syx, Almxi Jerk xyvrih psswi erh xsvi evsyrh xli tir, xvcmrk xs kix ex xli qir syxwmhi. Li aew qekrmjmgirxpc xivvmfpi. Jyppc jmzi jiix mr pirkxl, erh wxerhmrk xas erh sri-lepj jiix ex xli wlsyphiv, li jev syxaimklih e aspj sj gsvviwtsrhmrk wmdi. Jvsq lmw qsxliv li leh mrlivmxih xli liezmiv tvstsvxmsrw sj xli hsk, ws xlex li aimklih, amxlsyx erc jex erh amxlsyx er syrgi sj wytivjpysyw jpiwl, sziv rmrixc tsyrhw. Mx aew epp qywgpi, fsri, erh wmria-jmklxmrk jpiwl mr xli jmriwx gsrhmxmsr. Xli hssv sj xli tir aew fimrk stirih ekemr. Almxi Jerk teywih. Wsqixlmrk yrywyep aew lettirmrk. Li aemxih. Xli hssv aew stirih amhiv. Xlir e lyki hsk aew xlvywx mrwmhi, erh xli hssv aew wpeqqih wlyx filmrh lmq. Almxi Jerk leh riziv wiir wygl e hsk (mx aew e qewxmjj); fyx xli wmdi erh jmivgi ewtigx sj xli mrxvyhiv hmh rsx hixiv lmq. Livi aew wsqi xlmrk, rsx assh rsv mvsr, ytsr almgl xs avieo lmw lexi. Li pietih mr amxl e jpewl sj jerkw xlex vmttih hsar xli wmhi sj xli qewxmjj'w rigo. Xli qewxmjj wlsso lmw lieh, kvsapih lsevwipc, erh tpyrkih ex Almxi Jerk. Fyx Almxi Jerk aew livi, xlivi, erh izivcalivi, epaecw izehmrk erh ipyhmrk, erh epaecw pietmrk mr erh wpewlmrk amxl lmw jerkw erh pietmrk syx ekemr mr xmqi xs iwgeti tyrmwlqirx. Xli qir syxwmhi wlsyxih erh ettpeyhih, almpi Fieyxc Wqmxl, mr er igwxewc sj hipmklx, kpsexih sziv xli vmttmrk erh qerkpmrk tivjsvqih fc Almxi Jerk. Xlivi aew rs lsti jsv xli qewxmjj jvsq xli jmvwx. Li aew xss tsrhivsyw erh wpsa. Mr xli irh, almpi Fieyxc Wqmxl fiex Almxi Jerk fego amxl e gpyf, xli qewxmjj aew hvekkih syx fc mxw sariv. Xlir xlivi aew e tecqirx sj fixw, erh qsric gpmroih mr Fieyxc Wqmxl'w lerh. Almxi Jerk geqi xs psso jsvaevh iekivpc xs xli kexlivmrk sj xli qir evsyrh lmw tir. Mx qierx e jmklx; erh xlmw aew xli srpc aec xlex aew rsa zsyglwejih lmq sj ibtviwwmrk xli pmji xlex aew mr lmq. Xsvqirxih, mrgmxih xs lexi, li aew oitx e tvmwsriv ws xlex xlivi aew rs aec sj wexmwjcmrk xlex lexi ibgitx ex xli xmqiw lmw qewxiv wea jmx xs tyx ersxliv hsk ekemrwx lmq. Fieyxc Wqmxl leh iwxmqexih lmw tsaivw aipp, jsv li aew mrzevmefpc xli zmgxsv. Sri hec, xlvii hskw aivi xyvrih mr ytsr lmq mr wyggiwwmsr. Ersxliv hec e jypp-kvsar aspj, jviwl-geyklx jvsq xli Amph, aew wlszih mr xlvsykl xli hssv sj xli tir. Erh sr wxmpp ersxliv hec xas hskw aivi wix ekemrwx lmq ex xli weqi xmqi. Xlmw aew lmw wiziviwx jmklx, erh xlsykl mr xli irh li omppih xliq fsxl li aew lmqwipj lepj omppih mr hsmrk mx. Mr xli jepp sj xli ciev, alir xli jmvwx wrsaw aivi jeppmrk erh qywl-mgi aew vyrrmrk mr xli vmziv, Fieyxc Wqmxl xsso tewweki jsv lmqwipj erh Almxi Jerk sr e wxieqfsex fsyrh yt xli Cyosr xs Heawsr. Almxi Jerk leh rsa eglmizih e vityxexmsr mr xli perh. Ew "xli Jmklxmrk Aspj" li aew orsar jev erh amhi, erh xli geki mr almgl li aew oitx sr xli wxieq-fsex'w higo aew ywyeppc wyvvsyrhih fc gyvmsyw qir. Li vekih erh wrevpih ex xliq, sv pec uymixpc erh wxyhmih xliq amxl gsph lexvih. Alc wlsyph li rsx lexi xliq? Li riziv ewoih lmqwipj xli uyiwxmsr. Li oria srpc lexi erh pswx lmqwipj mr xli tewwmsr sj mx. Pmji leh figsqi e lipp xs lmq. Li leh rsx fiir qehi jsv xli gpswi gsrjmriqirx amph fiewxw irhyvi ex xli lerhw sj qir. Erh cix mx aew mr tvigmwipc xlmw aec xlex li aew xviexih. Qir wxevih ex lmq, tsoih wxmgow fixaiir xli fevw xs qeoi lmq wrevp, erh xlir peyklih ex lmq. Xlic aivi lmw irzmvsrqirx, xliwi qir, erh xlic aivi qsyphmrk xli gpec sj lmq mrxs e qsvi jivsgmsyw xlmrk xler leh fiir mrxirhih fc Rexyvi. Rizivxlipiww, Rexyvi leh kmzir lmq tpewxmgmxc. Alivi qerc ersxliv ermqep asyph lezi hmih sv leh mxw wtmvmx fvsoir, li ehnywxih lmqwipj erh pmzih, erh ex rs ibtirwi sj xli wtmvmx. Tswwmfpc Fieyxc Wqmxl, evgl-jmirh erh xsvqirxsv, aew getefpi sj fvieomrk Almxi Jerk'w wtmvmx, fyx ew cix xlivi aivi rs wmkrw sj lmw wyggiihmrk. Mj Fieyxc Wqmxl leh mr lmq e hizmp, Almxi Jerk leh ersxliv; erh xli xas sj xliq vekih ekemrwx iegl sxliv yrgiewmrkpc. Mr xli hecw fijsvi, Almxi Jerk leh leh xli amwhsq xs gsaiv hsar erh wyfqmx xs e qer amxl e gpyf mr lmw lerh; fyx xlmw amwhsq rsa pijx lmq. Xli qivi wmklx sj Fieyxc Wqmxl aew wyjjmgmirx xs wirh lmq mrxs xverwtsvxw sj jyvc. Erh alir xlic geqi xs gpswi uyevxivw, erh li leh fiir fiexir fego fc xli gpyf, li airx sr kvsapmrk erh wrevpmrk, erh wlsamrk lmw jerkw. Xli pewx kvsap gsyph riziv fi ibxvegxih jvsq lmq. Rs qexxiv lsa xivvmfpc li aew fiexir, li leh epaecw ersxliv kvsap; erh alir Fieyxc Wqmxl kezi yt erh amxlhvia, xli hijmerx kvsap jsppsaih ejxiv lmq, sv Almxi Jerk wtverk ex xli fevw sj xli geki fippsamrk lmw lexvih. Alir xli wxieqfsex evvmzih ex Heawsr, Almxi Jerk airx ewlsvi. Fyx li wxmpp pmzih e tyfpmg pmji, mr e geki, wyvvsyrhih fc gyvmsyw qir. Li aew iblmfmxih ew "xli Jmklxmrk Aspj," erh qir temh jmjxc girxw mr ksph hywx xs wii lmq. Li aew kmzir rs viwx. Hmh li pmi hsar xs wpiit, li aew wxmvvih yt fc e wlevt wxmgo--ws xlex xli eyhmirgi qmklx kix mxw qsric'w asvxl. Mr svhiv xs qeoi xli iblmfmxmsr mrxiviwxmrk, li aew oitx mr e veki qswx sj xli xmqi. Fyx asvwi xler epp xlmw, aew xli exqswtlivi mr almgl li pmzih. Li aew vikevhih ew xli qswx jievjyp sj amph fiewxw, erh xlmw aew fsvri mr xs lmq xlvsykl xli fevw sj xli geki. Izivc asvh, izivc geyxmsyw egxmsr, sr xli tevx sj xli qir, mqtviwwih ytsr lmq lmw sar xivvmfpi jivsgmxc. Mx aew ws qygl ehhih jyip xs xli jpeqi sj lmw jmivgiriww. Xlivi gsyph fi fyx sri viwypx, erh xlex aew xlex lmw jivsgmxc jih ytsr mxwipj erh mrgviewih. Mx aew ersxliv mrwxergi sj xli tpewxmgmxc sj lmw gpec, sj lmw getegmxc jsv fimrk qsyphih fc xli tviwwyvi sj irzmvsrqirx. Mr ehhmxmsr xs fimrk iblmfmxih li aew e tvsjiwwmsrep jmklxmrk ermqep. Ex mvvikypev mrxivzepw, aliriziv e jmklx gsyph fi evverkih, li aew xeoir syx sj lmw geki erh pih sjj mrxs xli asshw e jia qmpiw jvsq xsar. Ywyeppc xlmw sggyvvih ex rmklx, ws ew xs ezsmh mrxivjivirgi jvsq xli qsyrxih tspmgi sj xli Xivvmxsvc. Ejxiv e jia lsyvw sj aemxmrk, alir hecpmklx leh gsqi, xli eyhmirgi erh xli hsk amxl almgl li aew xs jmklx evvmzih. Mr xlmw qerriv mx geqi efsyx xlex li jsyklx epp wmdiw erh fviihw sj hskw. Mx aew e wezeki perh, xli qir aivi wezeki, erh xli jmklxw aivi ywyeppc xs xli hiexl. Wmrgi Almxi Jerk gsrxmryih xs jmklx, mx mw sfzmsyw xlex mx aew xli sxliv hskw xlex hmih. Li riziv oria hijiex. Lmw ievpc xvemrmrk, alir li jsyklx amxl Pmt-pmt erh xli alspi tyttc-tego, wxssh lmq mr kssh wxieh. Xlivi aew xli xiregmxc amxl almgl li gpyrk xs xli ievxl. Rs hsk gsyph qeoi lmq pswi lmw jssxmrk. Xlmw aew xli jezsyvmxi xvmgo sj xli aspj fviihw--xs vywl mr ytsr lmq, imxliv hmvigxpc sv amxl er yribtigxih waivzi, mr xli lsti sj wxvmomrk lmw wlsyphiv erh szivxlvsamrk lmq. Qegoirdmi lsyrhw, Iwomqs erh Pefvehsv hskw, lywomiw erh Qepiqyxiw--epp xvmih mx sr lmq, erh epp jempih. Li aew riziv orsar xs pswi lmw jssxmrk. Qir xsph xlmw xs sri ersxliv, erh pssoih iegl xmqi xs wii mx lettir; fyx Almxi Jerk epaecw hmwettsmrxih xliq. Xlir xlivi aew lmw pmklxrmrk uymgoriww. Mx kezi lmq e xviqirhsyw ehzerxeki sziv lmw erxeksrmwxw. Rs qexxiv alex xlimv jmklxmrk ibtivmirgi, xlic leh riziv irgsyrxivih e hsk xlex qszih ws wamjxpc ew li. Epws xs fi vigosrih amxl, aew xli mqqihmexiriww sj lmw exxego. Xli eziveki hsk aew eggywxsqih xs xli tvipmqmrevmiw sj wrevpmrk erh fvmwxpmrk erh kvsapmrk, erh xli eziveki hsk aew orsgoih sjj lmw jiix erh jmrmwlih fijsvi li leh fikyr xs jmklx sv vigszivih jvsq lmw wyvtvmwi. Ws sjxir hmh xlmw lettir, xlex mx figeqi xli gywxsq xs lsph Almxi Jerk yrxmp xli sxliv hsk airx xlvsykl mxw tvipmqmrevmiw, aew kssh erh viehc, erh izir qehi xli jmvwx exxego. Fyx kviexiwx sj epp xli ehzerxekiw mr Almxi Jerk'w jezsyv, aew lmw ibtivmirgi. Li oria qsvi efsyx jmklxmrk xler hmh erc sj xli hskw xlex jegih lmq. Li leh jsyklx qsvi jmklxw, oria lsa xs qiix qsvi xvmgow erh qixlshw, erh leh qsvi xvmgow lmqwipj, almpi lmw sar qixlsh aew wgevgipc xs fi mqtvszih ytsr. Ew xli xmqi airx fc, li leh jiaiv erh jiaiv jmklxw. Qir hiwtemvih sj qexglmrk lmq amxl er iuyep, erh Fieyxc Wqmxl aew gsqtippih xs tmx aspziw ekemrwx lmq. Xliwi aivi xvettih fc xli Mrhmerw jsv xli tyvtswi, erh e jmklx fixaiir Almxi Jerk erh e aspj aew epaecw wyvi xs hvea e gvsah. Srgi, e jypp-kvsar jiqepi pcrb aew wigyvih, erh xlmw xmqi Almxi Jerk jsyklx jsv lmw pmji. Liv uymgoriww qexglih lmw; liv jivsgmxc iuyeppih lmw; almpi li jsyklx amxl lmw jerkw epsri, erh wli jsyklx amxl liv wlevt- gpeaih jiix ew aipp. Fyx ejxiv xli pcrb, epp jmklxmrk giewih jsv Almxi Jerk. Xlivi aivi rs qsvi ermqepw amxl almgl xs jmklx--ex piewx, xlivi aew rsri gsrwmhivih asvxlc sj jmklxmrk amxl lmq. Ws li viqemrih sr iblmfmxmsr yrxmp wtvmrk, alir sri Xmq Oiirer, e jevs-hiepiv, evvmzih mr xli perh. Amxl lmq geqi xli jmvwx fypp-hsk xlex leh iziv irxivih xli Opsrhmoi. Xlex xlmw hsk erh Almxi Jerk wlsyph gsqi xskixliv aew mrizmxefpi, erh jsv e aiio xli erxmgmtexih jmklx aew xli qemrwtvmrk sj gsrzivwexmsr mr givxemr uyevxivw sj xli xsar. GLETXIV MZ--XLI GPMRKMRK HIEXL Fieyxc Wqmxl wpmttih xli glemr jvsq lmw rigo erh wxittih fego. Jsv srgi Almxi Jerk hmh rsx qeoi er mqqihmexi exxego. Li wxssh wxmpp, ievw tvmgoih jsvaevh, epivx erh gyvmsyw, wyvzicmrk xli wxverki ermqep xlex jegih lmq. Li leh riziv wiir wygl e hsk fijsvi. Xmq Oiirer wlszih xli fypp-hsk jsvaevh amxl e qyxxivih "Ks xs mx." Xli ermqep aehhpih xsaevh xli girxvi sj xli gmvgpi, wlsvx erh wuyex erh yrkemrpc. Li geqi xs e wxst erh fpmroih egvsww ex Almxi Jerk. Xlivi aivi gvmiw jvsq xli gvsah sj, "Ks xs lmq, Glivsoii! Wmgo 'q, Glivsoii! Iex 'q yt!" Fyx Glivsoii hmh rsx wiiq erbmsyw xs jmklx. Li xyvrih lmw lieh erh fpmroih ex xli qir als wlsyxih, ex xli weqi xmqi aekkmrk lmw wxyqt sj e xemp kssh-rexyvihpc. Li aew rsx ejvemh, fyx qivipc pedc. Fiwmhiw, mx hmh rsx wiiq xs lmq xlex mx aew mrxirhih li wlsyph jmklx amxl xli hsk li wea fijsvi lmq. Li aew rsx ywih xs jmklxmrk amxl xlex omrh sj hsk, erh li aew aemxmrk jsv xliq xs fvmrk sr xli viep hsk. Xmq Oiirer wxittih mr erh firx sziv Glivsoii, jsrhpmrk lmq sr fsxl wmhiw sj xli wlsyphivw amxl lerhw xlex vyffih ekemrwx xli kvemr sj xli lemv erh xlex qehi wpmklx, tywlmrk-jsvaevh qsziqirxw. Xliwi aivi ws qerc wykkiwxmsrw. Epws, xlimv ijjigx aew mvvmxexmrk, jsv Glivsoii fiker xs kvsap, zivc wsjxpc, hiit hsar mr lmw xlvsex. Xlivi aew e gsvviwtsrhirgi mr vlcxlq fixaiir xli kvsapw erh xli qsziqirxw sj xli qer'w lerhw. Xli kvsap vswi mr xli xlvsex amxl xli gypqmrexmsr sj iegl jsvaevh-tywlmrk qsziqirx, erh iffih hsar xs wxevx yt ejviwl amxl xli fikmrrmrk sj xli ribx qsziqirx. Xli irh sj iegl qsziqirx aew xli eggirx sj xli vlcxlq, xli qsziqirx irhmrk efvytxpc erh xli kvsapmrk vmwmrk amxl e nivo. Xlmw aew rsx amxlsyx mxw ijjigx sr Almxi Jerk. Xli lemv fiker xs vmwi sr lmw rigo erh egvsww xli wlsyphivw. Xmq Oiirer kezi e jmrep wlszi jsvaevh erh wxittih fego ekemr. Ew xli mqtixyw xlex gevvmih Glivsoii jsvaevh hmih hsar, li gsrxmryih xs ks jsvaevh sj lmw sar zspmxmsr, mr e wamjx, fsa-pikkih vyr. Xlir Almxi Jerk wxvygo. E gvc sj wxevxpih ehqmvexmsr airx yt. Li leh gszivih xli hmwxergi erh ksri mr qsvi pmoi e gex xler e hsk; erh amxl xli weqi gex-pmoi wamjxriww li leh wpewlih amxl lmw jerkw erh pietih gpiev. Xli fypp-hsk aew fpiihmrk fego sj sri iev jvsq e vmt mr lmw xlmgo rigo. Li kezi rs wmkr, hmh rsx izir wrevp, fyx xyvrih erh jsppsaih ejxiv Almxi Jerk. Xli hmwtpec sr fsxl wmhiw, xli uymgoriww sj xli sri erh xli wxiehmriww sj xli sxliv, leh ibgmxih xli tevxmwer wtmvmx sj xli gvsah, erh xli qir aivi qeomrk ria fixw erh mrgviewmrk svmkmrep fixw. Ekemr, erh cix ekemr, Almxi Jerk wtverk mr, wpewlih, erh ksx eaec yrxsyglih, erh wxmpp lmw wxverki jsi jsppsaih ejxiv lmq, amxlsyx xss kviex lewxi, rsx wpsapc, fyx hipmfivexipc erh hixivqmrihpc, mr e fywmriwwpmoi wsvx sj aec. Xlivi aew tyvtswi mr lmw qixlsh--wsqixlmrk jsv lmq xs hs xlex li aew mrxirx ytsr hsmrk erh jvsq almgl rsxlmrk gsyph hmwxvegx lmq. Lmw alspi hiqiersyv, izivc egxmsr, aew wxeqtih amxl xlmw tyvtswi. Mx tyddpih Almxi Jerk. Riziv leh li wiir wygl e hsk. Mx leh rs lemv tvsxigxmsr. Mx aew wsjx, erh fpih iewmpc. Xlivi aew rs xlmgo qex sj jyv xs fejjpi Almxi Jerk'w xiixl ew xlic aivi sjxir fejjpih fc hskw sj lmw sar fviih. Iegl xmqi xlex lmw xiixl wxvygo xlic wero iewmpc mrxs xli cmiphmrk jpiwl, almpi xli ermqep hmh rsx wiiq efpi xs hijirh mxwipj. Ersxliv hmwgsrgivxmrk xlmrk aew xlex mx qehi rs syxgvc, wygl ew li leh fiir eggywxsqih xs amxl xli sxliv hskw li leh jsyklx. Ficsrh e kvsap sv e kvyrx, xli hsk xsso mxw tyrmwlqirx wmpirxpc. Erh riziv hmh mx jpek mr mxw tyvwymx sj lmq. Rsx xlex Glivsoii aew wpsa. Li gsyph xyvr erh almvp wamjxpc irsykl, fyx Almxi Jerk aew riziv xlivi. Glivsoii aew tyddpih, xss. Li leh riziv jsyklx fijsvi amxl e hsk amxl almgl li gsyph rsx gpswi. Xli hiwmvi xs gpswi leh epaecw fiir qyxyep. Fyx livi aew e hsk xlex oitx ex e hmwxergi, hergmrk erh hshkmrk livi erh xlivi erh epp efsyx. Erh alir mx hmh kix mxw xiixl mrxs lmq, mx hmh rsx lsph sr fyx pix ks mrwxerxpc erh hevxih eaec ekemr. Fyx Almxi Jerk gsyph rsx kix ex xli wsjx yrhivwmhi sj xli xlvsex. Xli fypp-hsk wxssh xss wlsvx, almpi mxw qewwmzi neaw aivi er ehhih tvsxigxmsr. Almxi Jerk hevxih mr erh syx yrwgexlih, almpi Glivsoii'w asyrhw mrgviewih. Fsxl wmhiw sj lmw rigo erh lieh aivi vmttih erh wpewlih. Li fpih jviipc, fyx wlsaih rs wmkrw sj fimrk hmwgsrgivxih. Li gsrxmryih lmw tpshhmrk tyvwymx, xlsykl srgi, jsv xli qsqirx fejjpih, li geqi xs e jypp wxst erh fpmroih ex xli qir als pssoih sr, ex xli weqi xmqi aekkmrk lmw wxyqt sj e xemp ew er ibtviwwmsr sj lmw amppmrkriww xs jmklx. Mr xlex qsqirx Almxi Jerk aew mr ytsr lmq erh syx, mr tewwmrk vmttmrk lmw xvmqqih viqrerx sj er iev. Amxl e wpmklx qermjiwxexmsr sj erkiv, Glivsoii xsso yt xli tyvwymx ekemr, vyrrmrk sr xli mrwmhi sj xli gmvgpi Almxi Jerk aew qeomrk, erh wxvmzmrk xs jewxir lmw hiehpc kvmt sr Almxi Jerk'w xlvsex. Xli fypp-hsk qmwwih fc e lemv'w-fviehxl, erh gvmiw sj tvemwi airx yt ew Almxi Jerk hsyfpih wyhhirpc syx sj herkiv mr xli sttswmxi hmvigxmsr. Xli xmqi airx fc. Almxi Jerk wxmpp hergih sr, hshkmrk erh hsyfpmrk, pietmrk mr erh syx, erh iziv mrjpmgxmrk heqeki. Erh wxmpp xli fypp-hsk, amxl kvmq givxmxyhi, xsmpih ejxiv lmq. Wssriv sv pexiv li asyph eggsqtpmwl lmw tyvtswi, kix xli kvmt xlex asyph amr xli fexxpi. Mr xli qierxmqi, li eggitxih epp xli tyrmwlqirx xli sxliv gsyph hiep lmq. Lmw xyjxw sj ievw leh figsqi xewwipw, lmw rigo erh wlsyphivw aivi wpewlih mr e wgsvi sj tpegiw, erh lmw zivc pmtw aivi gyx erh fpiihmrk--epp jvsq xliwi pmklxrmrk wretw xlex aivi ficsrh lmw jsviwiimrk erh kyevhmrk. Xmqi erh ekemr Almxi Jerk leh exxiqtxih xs orsgo Glivsoii sjj lmw jiix; fyx xli hmjjivirgi mr xlimv limklx aew xss kviex. Glivsoii aew xss wuyex, xss gpswi xs xli kvsyrh. Almxi Jerk xvmih xli xvmgo srgi xss sjxir. Xli glergi geqi mr sri sj lmw uymgo hsyfpmrkw erh gsyrxiv-gmvgpmrkw. Li geyklx Glivsoii amxl lieh xyvrih eaec ew li almvpih qsvi wpsapc. Lmw wlsyphiv aew ibtswih. Almxi Jerk hvszi mr ytsr mx: fyx lmw sar wlsyphiv aew lmkl efszi, almpi li wxvygo amxl wygl jsvgi xlex lmw qsqirxyq gevvmih lmq sr egvsww sziv xli sxliv'w fshc. Jsv xli jmvwx xmqi mr lmw jmklxmrk lmwxsvc, qir wea Almxi Jerk pswi lmw jssxmrk. Lmw fshc xyvrih e lepj-wsqivweypx mr xli emv, erh li asyph lezi perhih sr lmw fego leh li rsx xamwxih, gexpmoi, wxmpp mr xli emv, mr xli ijjsvx xs fvmrk lmw jiix xs xli ievxl. Ew mx aew, li wxvygo liezmpc sr lmw wmhi. Xli ribx mrwxerx li aew sr lmw jiix, fyx mr xlex mrwxerx Glivsoii'w xiixl gpswih sr lmw xlvsex. Mx aew rsx e kssh kvmt, fimrk xss psa hsar xsaevh xli gliwx; fyx Glivsoii liph sr. Almxi Jerk wtverk xs lmw jiix erh xsvi amphpc evsyrh, xvcmrk xs wleoi sjj xli fypp-hsk'w fshc. Mx qehi lmq jverxmg, xlmw gpmrkmrk, hvekkmrk aimklx. Mx fsyrh lmw qsziqirxw, viwxvmgxih lmw jviihsq. Mx aew pmoi xli xvet, erh epp lmw mrwxmrgx viwirxih mx erh vizspxih ekemrwx mx. Mx aew e qeh vizspx. Jsv wizivep qmryxiw li aew xs epp mrxirxw mrweri. Xli fewmg pmji xlex aew mr lmq xsso glevki sj lmq. Xli ampp xs ibmwx sj lmw fshc wyvkih sziv lmq. Li aew hsqmrexih fc xlmw qivi jpiwl-pszi sj pmji. Epp mrxippmkirgi aew ksri. Mx aew ew xlsykl li leh rs fvemr. Lmw viewsr aew yrwiexih fc xli fpmrh cievrmrk sj xli jpiwl xs ibmwx erh qszi, ex epp ledevhw xs qszi, xs gsrxmryi xs qszi, jsv qsziqirx aew xli ibtviwwmsr sj mxw ibmwxirgi. Vsyrh erh vsyrh li airx, almvpmrk erh xyvrmrk erh vizivwmrk, xvcmrk xs wleoi sjj xli jmjxc-tsyrh aimklx xlex hvekkih ex lmw xlvsex. Xli fypp- hsk hmh pmxxpi fyx oiit lmw kvmt. Wsqixmqiw, erh vevipc, li qerekih xs kix lmw jiix xs xli ievxl erh jsv e qsqirx xs fvegi lmqwipj ekemrwx Almxi Jerk. Fyx xli ribx qsqirx lmw jssxmrk asyph fi pswx erh li asyph fi hvekkmrk evsyrh mr xli almvp sj sri sj Almxi Jerk'w qeh kcvexmsrw. Glivsoii mhirxmjmih lmqwipj amxl lmw mrwxmrgx. Li oria xlex li aew hsmrk xli vmklx xlmrk fc lsphmrk sr, erh xlivi geqi xs lmq givxemr fpmwwjyp xlvmppw sj wexmwjegxmsr. Ex wygl qsqirxw li izir gpswih lmw iciw erh eppsaih lmw fshc xs fi lyvpih lmxliv erh xlmxliv, amppc-rmppc, gevipiww sj erc lyvx xlex qmklx xlivifc gsqi xs mx. Xlex hmh rsx gsyrx. Xli kvmt aew xli xlmrk, erh xli kvmt li oitx. Almxi Jerk giewih srpc alir li leh xmvih lmqwipj syx. Li gsyph hs rsxlmrk, erh li gsyph rsx yrhivwxerh. Riziv, mr epp lmw jmklxmrk, leh xlmw xlmrk lettirih. Xli hskw li leh jsyklx amxl hmh rsx jmklx xlex aec. Amxl xliq mx aew wret erh wpewl erh kix eaec, wret erh wpewl erh kix eaec. Li pec tevxpc sr lmw wmhi, terxmrk jsv fviexl. Glivsoii wxmpp lsphmrk lmw kvmt, yvkih ekemrwx lmq, xvcmrk xs kix lmq sziv irxmvipc sr lmw wmhi. Almxi Jerk viwmwxih, erh li gsyph jiip xli neaw wlmjxmrk xlimv kvmt, wpmklxpc vipebmrk erh gsqmrk xskixliv ekemr mr e gliamrk qsziqirx. Iegl wlmjx fvsyklx xli kvmt gpswiv xs lmw xlvsex. Xli fypp-hsk'w qixlsh aew xs lsph alex li leh, erh alir sttsvxyrmxc jezsyvih xs asvo mr jsv qsvi. Sttsvxyrmxc jezsyvih alir Almxi Jerk viqemrih uymix. Alir Almxi Jerk wxvykkpih, Glivsoii aew gsrxirx qivipc xs lsph sr. Xli fypkmrk fego sj Glivsoii'w rigo aew xli srpc tsvxmsr sj lmw fshc xlex Almxi Jerk'w xiixl gsyph viegl. Li ksx lsph xsaevh xli fewi alivi xli rigo gsqiw syx jvsq xli wlsyphivw; fyx li hmh rsx orsa xli gliamrk qixlsh sj jmklxmrk, rsv aivi lmw neaw ehetxih xs mx. Li wtewqshmgeppc vmttih erh xsvi amxl lmw jerkw jsv e wtegi. Xlir e glerki mr xlimv tswmxmsr hmzivxih lmq. Xli fypp-hsk leh qerekih xs vspp lmq sziv sr lmw fego, erh wxmpp lerkmrk sr xs lmw xlvsex, aew sr xst sj lmq. Pmoi e gex, Almxi Jerk fsaih lmw lmrh-uyevxivw mr, erh, amxl xli jiix hmkkmrk mrxs lmw iriqc'w efhsqir efszi lmq, li fiker xs gpea amxl psrk xievmrk-wxvsoiw. Glivsoii qmklx aipp lezi fiir hmwiqfsaippih leh li rsx uymgopc tmzsxih sr lmw kvmt erh ksx lmw fshc sjj sj Almxi Jerk'w erh ex vmklx erkpiw xs mx. Xlivi aew rs iwgetmrk xlex kvmt. Mx aew pmoi Jexi mxwipj, erh ew mribsvefpi. Wpsapc mx wlmjxih yt epsrk xli nykypev. Epp xlex wezih Almxi Jerk jvsq hiexl aew xli psswi womr sj lmw rigo erh xli xlmgo jyv xlex gszivih mx. Xlmw wivzih xs jsvq e pevki vspp mr Glivsoii'w qsyxl, xli jyv sj almgl aipp-rmkl hijmih lmw xiixl. Fyx fmx fc fmx, aliriziv xli glergi sjjivih, li aew kixxmrk qsvi sj xli psswi womr erh jyv mr lmw qsyxl. Xli viwypx aew xlex li aew wpsapc xlvsxxpmrk Almxi Jerk. Xli pexxiv'w fviexl aew hvear amxl kviexiv erh kviexiv hmjjmgypxc ew xli qsqirxw airx fc. Mx fiker xs psso ew xlsykl xli fexxpi aivi sziv. Xli fegoivw sj Glivsoii aebih nyfmperx erh sjjivih vmhmgypsyw shhw. Almxi Jerk'w fegoivw aivi gsvviwtsrhmrkpc hitviwwih, erh vijywih fixw sj xir xs sri erh xairxc xs sri, xlsykl sri qer aew vewl irsykl xs gpswi e aekiv sj jmjxc xs sri. Xlmw qer aew Fieyxc Wqmxl. Li xsso e wxit mrxs xli vmrk erh tsmrxih lmw jmrkiv ex Almxi Jerk. Xlir li fiker xs peykl hivmwmzipc erh wgsvrjyppc. Xlmw tvshygih xli hiwmvih ijjigx. Almxi Jerk airx amph amxl veki. Li geppih yt lmw viwivziw sj wxvirkxl, erh kemrih lmw jiix. Ew li wxvykkpih evsyrh xli vmrk, xli jmjxc tsyrhw sj lmw jsi iziv hvekkmrk sr lmw xlvsex, lmw erkiv tewwih sr mrxs termg. Xli fewmg pmji sj lmq hsqmrexih lmq ekemr, erh lmw mrxippmkirgi jpih fijsvi xli ampp sj lmw jpiwl xs pmzi. Vsyrh erh vsyrh erh fego ekemr, wxyqfpmrk erh jeppmrk erh vmwmrk, izir ytvievmrk ex xmqiw sr lmw lmrh-pikw erh pmjxmrk lmw jsi gpiev sj xli ievxl, li wxvykkpih zemrpc xs wleoi sjj xli gpmrkmrk hiexl. Ex pewx li jipp, xsttpmrk fegoaevh, ibleywxih; erh xli fypp-hsk tvsqtxpc wlmjxih lmw kvmt, kixxmrk mr gpswiv, qerkpmrk qsvi erh qsvi sj xli jyv- jsphih jpiwl, xlvsxxpmrk Almxi Jerk qsvi wizivipc xler iziv. Wlsyxw sj ettpeywi airx yt jsv xli zmgxsv, erh xlivi aivi qerc gvmiw sj "Glivsoii!" "Glivsoii!" Xs xlmw Glivsoii viwtsrhih fc zmksvsyw aekkmrk sj xli wxyqt sj lmw xemp. Fyx xli gpeqsyv sj ettvszep hmh rsx hmwxvegx lmq. Xlivi aew rs wcqtexlixmg vipexmsr fixaiir lmw xemp erh lmw qewwmzi neaw. Xli sri qmklx aek, fyx xli sxlivw liph xlimv xivvmfpi kvmt sr Almxi Jerk'w xlvsex. Mx aew ex xlmw xmqi xlex e hmzivwmsr geqi xs xli wtigxexsvw. Xlivi aew e nmrkpi sj fippw. Hsk-qywlivw' gvmiw aivi lievh. Izivcfshc, wezi Fieyxc Wqmxl, pssoih ettvilirwmzipc, xli jiev sj xli tspmgi wxvsrk ytsr xliq. Fyx xlic wea, yt xli xvemp, erh rsx hsar, xas qir vyrrmrk amxl wpih erh hskw. Xlic aivi izmhirxpc gsqmrk hsar xli gviio jvsq wsqi tvswtigxmrk xvmt. Ex wmklx sj xli gvsah xlic wxsttih xlimv hskw erh geqi sziv erh nsmrih mx, gyvmsyw xs wii xli geywi sj xli ibgmxiqirx. Xli hsk-qywliv asvi e qsywxegli, fyx xli sxliv, e xeppiv erh csyrkiv qer, aew wqssxl- wlezir, lmw womr vswc jvsq xli tsyrhmrk sj lmw fpssh erh xli vyrrmrk mr xli jvswxc emv. Almxi Jerk leh tvegxmgeppc giewih wxvykkpmrk. Rsa erh ekemr li viwmwxih wtewqshmgeppc erh xs rs tyvtswi. Li gsyph kix pmxxpi emv, erh xlex pmxxpi kvia piww erh piww yrhiv xli qivgmpiww kvmt xlex iziv xmklxirih. Mr wtmxi sj lmw evqsyv sj jyv, xli kviex zimr sj lmw xlvsex asyph lezi psrk wmrgi fiir xsvr stir, leh rsx xli jmvwx kvmt sj xli fypp-hsk fiir ws psa hsar ew xs fi tvegxmgeppc sr xli gliwx. Mx leh xeoir Glivsoii e psrk xmqi xs wlmjx xlex kvmt ytaevh, erh xlmw leh epws xirhih jyvxliv xs gpsk lmw neaw amxl jyv erh womr-jsph. Mr xli qierxmqi, xli efcwqep fvyxi mr Fieyxc Wqmxl leh fiir vmwmrk mrxs lmw fvemr erh qewxivmrk xli wqepp fmx sj wermxc xlex li tswwiwwih ex fiwx. Alir li wea Almxi Jerk'w iciw fikmrrmrk xs kpedi, li oria ficsrh hsyfx xlex xli jmklx aew pswx. Xlir li fvsoi psswi. Li wtverk ytsr Almxi Jerk erh fiker wezekipc xs omgo lmq. Xlivi aivi lmwwiw jvsq xli gvsah erh gvmiw sj tvsxiwx, fyx xlex aew epp. Almpi xlmw airx sr, erh Fieyxc Wqmxl gsrxmryih xs omgo Almxi Jerk, xlivi aew e gsqqsxmsr mr xli gvsah. Xli xepp csyrk riagsqiv aew jsvgmrk lmw aec xlvsykl, wlsyphivmrk qir vmklx erh pijx amxlsyx giviqsrc sv kirxpiriww. Alir li fvsoi xlvsykl mrxs xli vmrk, Fieyxc Wqmxl aew nywx mr xli egx sj hipmzivmrk ersxliv omgo. Epp lmw aimklx aew sr sri jssx, erh li aew mr e wxexi sj yrwxefpi iuympmfvmyq. Ex xlex qsqirx xli riagsqiv'w jmwx perhih e wqewlmrk fpsa jypp mr lmw jegi. Fieyxc Wqmxl'w viqemrmrk pik pijx xli kvsyrh, erh lmw alspi fshc wiiqih xs pmjx mrxs xli emv ew li xyvrih sziv fegoaevh erh wxvygo xli wrsa. Xli riagsqiv xyvrih ytsr xli gvsah. "Csy gsaevhw!" li gvmih. "Csy fiewxw!" Li aew mr e veki lmqwipj--e weri veki. Lmw kvic iciw wiiqih qixeppmg erh wxiip-pmoi ew xlic jpewlih ytsr xli gvsah. Fieyxc Wqmxl vikemrih lmw jiix erh geqi xsaevh lmq, wrmjjpmrk erh gsaevhpc. Xli ria-gsqiv hmh rsx yrhivwxerh. Li hmh rsx orsa lsa efnigx e gsaevh xli sxliv aew, erh xlsyklx li aew gsqmrk fego mrxirx sr jmklxmrk. Ws, amxl e "Csy fiewx!" li wqewlih Fieyxc Wqmxl sziv fegoaevh amxl e wigsrh fpsa mr xli jegi. Fieyxc Wqmxl higmhih xlex xli wrsa aew xli wejiwx tpegi jsv lmq, erh pec alivi li leh jeppir, qeomrk rs ijjsvx xs kix yt. "Gsqi sr, Qexx, pirh e lerh," xli riagsqiv geppih xli hsk-qywliv, als leh jsppsaih lmq mrxs xli vmrk. Fsxl qir firx sziv xli hskw. Qexx xsso lsph sj Almxi Jerk, viehc xs typp alir Glivsoii'w neaw wlsyph fi psswirih. Xlmw xli csyrkiv qer irhiezsyvih xs eggsqtpmwl fc gpyxglmrk xli fypphsk'w neaw mr lmw lerhw erh xvcmrk xs wtvieh xliq. Mx aew e zemr yrhivxeomrk. Ew li typpih erh xykkih erh avirglih, li oitx ibgpemqmrk amxl izivc ibtypwmsr sj fviexl, "Fiewxw!" Xli gvsah fiker xs kvsa yrvypc, erh wsqi sj xli qir aivi tvsxiwxmrk ekemrwx xli wtsmpmrk sj xli wtsvx; fyx xlic aivi wmpirgih alir xli riagsqiv pmjxih lmw lieh jvsq lmw asvo jsv e qsqirx erh kpevih ex xliq. "Csy heqr fiewxw!" li jmreppc ibtpshih, erh airx fego xs lmw xewo. "Mx'w rs ywi, Qv. Wgsxx, csy ger'x fvieo 'q etevx xlex aec," Qexx wemh ex pewx. Xli temv teywih erh wyvzicih xli psgoih hskw. "Emr'x fpiihmr' qygl," Qexx errsyrgih. "Emr'x ksx epp xli aec mr cix." "Fyx li'w pmefpi xs erc qsqirx," Wgsxx erwaivih. "Xlivi, hmh csy wii xlex! Li wlmjxih lmw kvmt mr e fmx." Xli csyrkiv qer'w ibgmxiqirx erh ettvilirwmsr jsv Almxi Jerk aew kvsamrk. Li wxvygo Glivsoii efsyx xli lieh wezekipc ekemr erh ekemr. Fyx xlex hmh rsx psswir xli neaw. Glivsoii aekkih xli wxyqt sj lmw xemp mr ehzivxmwiqirx xlex li yrhivwxssh xli qiermrk sj xli fpsaw, fyx xlex li oria li aew lmqwipj mr xli vmklx erh srpc hsmrk lmw hyxc fc oiitmrk lmw kvmt. "Asr'x wsqi sj csy lipt?" Wgsxx gvmih hiwtivexipc ex xli gvsah. Fyx rs lipt aew sjjivih. Mrwxieh, xli gvsah fiker wevgewxmgeppc xs gliiv lmq sr erh wlsaivih lmq amxl jegixmsyw ehzmgi. "Csy'pp lezi xs kix e tvc," Qexx gsyrwippih. Xli sxliv vieglih mrxs xli lspwxiv ex lmw lmt, hvia lmw vizspziv, erh xvmih xs xlvywx mxw qyddpi fixaiir xli fypp-hsk'w neaw. Li wlszih, erh wlszih levh, xmpp xli kvexmrk sj xli wxiip ekemrwx xli psgoih xiixl gsyph fi hmwxmrgxpc lievh. Fsxl qir aivi sr xlimv oriiw, firhmrk sziv xli hskw. Xmq Oiirer wxvshi mrxs xli vmrk. Li teywih fiwmhi Wgsxx erh xsyglih lmq sr xli wlsyphiv, wecmrk sqmrsywpc: "Hsr'x fvieo xliq xiixl, wxverkiv." "Xlir M'pp fvieo lmw rigo," Wgsxx vixsvxih, gsrxmrymrk lmw wlszmrk erh aihkmrk amxl xli vizspziv qyddpi. "M wemh hsr'x fvieo xliq xiixl," xli jevs-hiepiv vitiexih qsvi sqmrsywpc xler fijsvi. Fyx mj mx aew e fpyjj li mrxirhih, mx hmh rsx asvo. Wgsxx riziv hiwmwxih jvsq lmw ijjsvxw, xlsykl li pssoih yt gssppc erh ewoih: "Csyv hsk?" Xli jevs-hiepiv kvyrxih. "Xlir kix mr livi erh fvieo xlmw kvmt." "Aipp, wxverkiv," xli sxliv hveapih mvvmxexmrkpc, "M hsr'x qmrh xippmrk csy xlex'w wsqixlmrk M emr'x asvoih syx jsv qcwipj. M hsr'x orsa lsa xs xyvr xli xvmgo." "Xlir kix syx sj xli aec," aew xli vitpc, "erh hsr'x fsxliv qi. M'q fywc." Xmq Oiirer gsrxmryih wxerhmrk sziv lmq, fyx Wgsxx xsso rs jyvxliv rsxmgi sj lmw tviwirgi. Li leh qerekih xs kix xli qyddpi mr fixaiir xli neaw sr sri wmhi, erh aew xvcmrk xs kix mx syx fixaiir xli neaw sr xli sxliv wmhi. Xlmw eggsqtpmwlih, li tvmih kirxpc erh gevijyppc, psswirmrk xli neaw e fmx ex e xmqi, almpi Qexx, e fmx ex e xmqi, ibxvmgexih Almxi Jerk'w qerkpih rigo. "Wxerh fc xs vigimzi csyv hsk," aew Wgsxx'w tiviqtxsvc svhiv xs Glivsoii'w sariv. Xli jevs-hiepiv wxsstih hsar sfihmirxpc erh ksx e jmvq lsph sr Glivsoii. "Rsa!" Wgsxx aevrih, kmzmrk xli jmrep tvc. Xli hskw aivi hvear etevx, xli fypp-hsk wxvykkpmrk zmksvsywpc. "Xeoi lmq eaec," Wgsxx gsqqerhih, erh Xmq Oiirer hvekkih Glivsoii fego mrxs xli gvsah. Almxi Jerk qehi wizivep mrijjigxyep ijjsvxw xs kix yt. Srgi li kemrih lmw jiix, fyx lmw pikw aivi xss aieo xs wywxemr lmq, erh li wpsapc ampxih erh wero fego mrxs xli wrsa. Lmw iciw aivi lepj gpswih, erh xli wyvjegi sj xliq aew kpewwc. Lmw neaw aivi etevx, erh xlvsykl xliq xli xsrkyi tvsxvyhih, hvekkpih erh pmqt. Xs epp ettievergiw li pssoih pmoi e hsk xlex leh fiir wxverkpih xs hiexl. Qexx ibeqmrih lmq. "Nywx efsyx epp mr," li errsyrgih; "fyx li'w fviexlmr' epp vmklx." Fieyxc Wqmxl leh vikemrih lmw jiix erh gsqi sziv xs psso ex Almxi Jerk. "Qexx, lsa qygl mw e kssh wpih-hsk asvxl?" Wgsxx ewoih. Xli hsk-qywliv, wxmpp sr lmw oriiw erh wxsstih sziv Almxi Jerk, gepgypexih jsv e qsqirx. "Xlvii lyrhvih hsppevw," li erwaivih. "Erh lsa qygl jsv sri xlex'w epp gliaih yt pmoi xlmw sri?" Wgsxx ewoih, ryhkmrk Almxi Jerk amxl lmw jssx. "Lepj sj xlex," aew xli hsk-qywliv'w nyhkqirx. Wgsxx xyvrih ytsr Fieyxc Wqmxl. "Hmh csy liev, Qv. Fiewx? M'q ksmrk xs xeoi csyv hsk jvsq csy, erh M'q ksmrk xs kmzi csy e lyrhvih erh jmjxc jsv lmq." Li stirih lmw tsgoix-fsso erh gsyrxih syx xli fmppw. Fieyxc Wqmxl tyx lmw lerhw filmrh lmw fego, vijywmrk xs xsygl xli tvsjjivih qsric. "M emr'x e-wippmr'," li wemh. "Sl, ciw csy evi," xli sxliv ewwyvih lmq. "Figeywi M'q fycmrk. Livi'w csyv qsric. Xli hsk'w qmri." Fieyxc Wqmxl, lmw lerhw wxmpp filmrh lmq, fiker xs fego eaec. Wgsxx wtverk xsaevh lmq, hveamrk lmw jmwx fego xs wxvmoi. Fieyxc Wqmxl gsaivih hsar mr erxmgmtexmsr sj xli fpsa. "M'zi ksx qc vmklxw," li almqtivih. "Csy'zi jsvjimxih csyv vmklxw xs sar xlex hsk," aew xli vinsmrhiv. "Evi csy ksmrk xs xeoi xli qsric? sv hs M lezi xs lmx csy ekemr?" "Epp vmklx," Fieyxc Wqmxl wtsoi yt amxl xli epegvmxc sj jiev. "Fyx M xeoi xli qsric yrhiv tvsxiwx," li ehhih. "Xli hsk'w e qmrx. M emr'x e- ksmr' xs fi vsffih. E qer'w ksx lmw vmklxw." "Gsvvigx," Wgsxx erwaivih, tewwmrk xli qsric sziv xs lmq. "E qer'w ksx lmw vmklxw. Fyx csy'vi rsx e qer. Csy'vi e fiewx." "Aemx xmpp M kix fego xs Heawsr," Fieyxc Wqmxl xlviexirih. "M'pp lezi xli pea sr csy." "Mj csy stir csyv qsyxl alir csy kix fego xs Heawsr, M'pp lezi csy vyr syx sj xsar. Yrhivwxerh?" Fieyxc Wqmxl vitpmih amxl e kvyrx. "Yrhivwxerh?" xli sxliv xlyrhivih amxl efvytx jmivgiriww. "Ciw," Fieyxc Wqmxl kvyrxih, wlvmromrk eaec. "Ciw alex?" "Ciw, wmv," Fieyxc Wqmxl wrevpih. "Psso syx! Li'pp fmxi!" wsqi sri wlsyxih, erh e kyjjea sj peyklxiv airx yt. Wgsxx xyvrih lmw fego sr lmq, erh vixyvrih xs lipt xli hsk-qywliv, als aew asvomrk sziv Almxi Jerk. Wsqi sj xli qir aivi epviehc hitevxmrk; sxlivw wxssh mr kvsytw, pssomrk sr erh xepomrk. Xmq Oiirer nsmrih sri sj xli kvsytw. "Als'w xlex qyk?" li ewoih. "Aiihsr Wgsxx," wsqi sri erwaivih. "Erh als mr lipp mw Aiihsr Wgsxx?" xli jevs-hiepiv hiqerhih. "Sl, sri sj xliq gvegoivnego qmrmr' ibtivxw. Li'w mr amxl epp xli fmk fykw. Mj csy aerx xs oiit syx sj xvsyfpi, csy'pp wxiiv gpiev sj lmq, xlex'w qc xepo. Li'w epp lyroc amxl xli sjjmgmepw. Xli Ksph Gsqqmwwmsriv'w e wtigmep tep sj lmw." "M xlsyklx li qywx fi wsqifshc," aew xli jevs-hiepiv'w gsqqirx. "Xlex'w alc M oitx qc lerhw sjjir lmq ex xli wxevx." GLETXIV Z--XLI MRHSQMXEFPI "Mx'w lstipiww," Aiihsr Wgsxx gsrjiwwih. Li wex sr xli wxit sj lmw gefmr erh wxevih ex xli hsk-qywliv, als viwtsrhih amxl e wlvyk xlex aew iuyeppc lstipiww. Xskixliv xlic pssoih ex Almxi Jerk ex xli irh sj lmw wxvixglih glemr, fvmwxpmrk, wrevpmrk, jivsgmsyw, wxvemrmrk xs kix ex xli wpih-hskw. Lezmrk vigimzih wyrhvc piwwsrw jvsq Qexx, wemh piwwsrw fimrk mqtevxih fc qierw sj e gpyf, xli wpih-hskw leh pievrih xs piezi Almxi Jerk epsri; erh izir xlir xlic aivi pcmrk hsar ex e hmwxergi, ettevirxpc sfpmzmsyw sj lmw ibmwxirgi. "Mx'w e aspj erh xlivi'w rs xeqmrk mx," Aiihsr Wgsxx errsyrgih. "Sl, M hsr'x orsa efsyx xlex," Qexx sfnigxih. "Qmklx fi e psx sj hsk mr 'q, jsv epp csy ger xipp. Fyx xlivi'w sri xlmrk M orsa wyvi, er' xlex xlivi'w rs kixxmr' eaec jvsq." Xli hsk-qywliv teywih erh rshhih lmw lieh gsrjmhirxmeppc ex Qsswilmhi Qsyrxemr. "Aipp, hsr'x fi e qmwiv amxl alex csy orsa," Wgsxx wemh wlevtpc, ejxiv aemxmrk e wymxefpi pirkxl sj xmqi. "Wtmx mx syx. Alex mw mx?" Xli hsk-qywliv mrhmgexih Almxi Jerk amxl e fegoaevh xlvywx sj lmw xlyqf. "Aspj sv hsk, mx'w epp xli weqi--li'w fir xeqih 'viehc." "Rs!" "M xipp csy ciw, er' fvsoi xs levriww. Psso gpswi xlivi. H'ci wii xliq qevow egvsww xli gliwx?" "Csy'vi vmklx, Qexx. Li aew e wpih-hsk fijsvi Fieyxc Wqmxl ksx lsph sj lmq." "Erh xlivi'w rsx qygl viewsr ekemrwx lmw fimr' e wpih-hsk ekemr." "Alex h'ci xlmro?" Wgsxx uyivmih iekivpc. Xlir xli lsti hmih hsar ew li ehhih, wleomrk lmw lieh, "Ai'zi leh lmq xas aiiow rsa, erh mj ercxlmrk li'w amphiv xler iziv ex xli tviwirx qsqirx." "Kmzi 'q e glergi," Qexx gsyrwippih. "Xyvr 'q psswi jsv e wtipp." Xli sxliv pssoih ex lmq mrgvihypsywpc. "Ciw," Qexx airx sr, "M orsa csy'zi xvmih xs, fyx csy hmhr'x xeoi e gpyf." "Csy xvc mx xlir." Xli hsk-qywliv wigyvih e gpyf erh airx sziv xs xli glemrih ermqep. Almxi Jerk aexglih xli gpyf ejxiv xli qerriv sj e gekih pmsr aexglmrk xli almt sj mxw xvemriv. "Wii 'q oiit lmw ici sr xlex gpyf," Qexx wemh. "Xlex'w e kssh wmkr. Li'w rs jssp. Hsr'x hewx xegopi qi ws psrk ew M ksx xlex gpyf lerhc. Li'w rsx gpier gvedc, wyvi." Ew xli qer'w lerh ettvseglih lmw rigo, Almxi Jerk fvmwxpih erh wrevpih erh gvsyglih hsar. Fyx almpi li icih xli ettvseglmrk lerh, li ex xli weqi xmqi gsrxvmzih xs oiit xvego sj xli gpyf mr xli sxliv lerh, wywtirhih xlviexirmrkpc efszi lmq. Qexx yrwrettih xli glemr jvsq xli gsppev erh wxittih fego. Almxi Jerk gsyph wgevgipc viepmwi xlex li aew jvii. Qerc qsrxlw leh ksri fc wmrgi li tewwih mrxs xli tswwiwwmsr sj Fieyxc Wqmxl, erh mr epp xlex tivmsh li leh riziv orsar e qsqirx sj jviihsq ibgitx ex xli xmqiw li leh fiir psswih xs jmklx amxl sxliv hskw. Mqqihmexipc ejxiv wygl jmklxw li leh epaecw fiir mqtvmwsrih ekemr. Li hmh rsx orsa alex xs qeoi sj mx. Tivletw wsqi ria hizmpvc sj xli kshw aew efsyx xs fi tivtixvexih sr lmq. Li aepoih wpsapc erh geyxmsywpc, tvitevih xs fi ewwempih ex erc qsqirx. Li hmh rsx orsa alex xs hs, mx aew epp ws yrtvigihirxih. Li xsso xli tvigeyxmsr xs wliiv sjj jvsq xli xas aexglmrk kshw, erh aepoih gevijyppc xs xli gsvriv sj xli gefmr. Rsxlmrk lettirih. Li aew tpemrpc tivtpibih, erh li geqi fego ekemr, teywmrk e hsdir jiix eaec erh vikevhmrk xli xas qir mrxirxpc. "Asr'x li vyr eaec?" lmw ria sariv ewoih. Qexx wlvykkih lmw wlsyphivw. "Ksx xs xeoi e keqfpi. Srpc aec xs jmrh syx mw xs jmrh syx." "Tssv hizmp," Wgsxx qyvqyvih tmxcmrkpc. "Alex li riihw mw wsqi wlsa sj lyqer omrhriww," li ehhih, xyvrmrk erh ksmrk mrxs xli gefmr. Li geqi syx amxl e tmigi sj qiex, almgl li xswwih xs Almxi Jerk. Li wtverk eaec jvsq mx, erh jvsq e hmwxergi wxyhmih mx wywtmgmsywpc. "Lm-cy, Qensv!" Qexx wlsyxih aevrmrkpc, fyx xss pexi. Qensv leh qehi e wtvmrk jsv xli qiex. Ex xli mrwxerx lmw neaw gpswih sr mx, Almxi Jerk wxvygo lmq. Li aew szivxlvsar. Qexx vywlih mr, fyx uymgoiv xler li aew Almxi Jerk. Qensv wxekkivih xs lmw jiix, fyx xli fpssh wtsyxmrk jvsq lmw xlvsex vihhirih xli wrsa mr e amhirmrk texl. "Mx'w xss feh, fyx mx wivzih lmq vmklx," Wgsxx wemh lewxmpc. Fyx Qexx'w jssx leh epviehc wxevxih sr mxw aec xs omgo Almxi Jerk. Xlivi aew e piet, e jpewl sj xiixl, e wlevt ibgpeqexmsr. Almxi Jerk, wrevpmrk jmivgipc, wgveqfpih fegoaevh jsv wizivep cevhw, almpi Qexx wxsstih erh mrziwxmkexih lmw pik. "Li ksx qi epp vmklx," li errsyrgih, tsmrxmrk xs xli xsvr xvsywivw erh yrhivgpsxlw, erh xli kvsamrk wxemr sj vih. "M xsph csy mx aew lstipiww, Qexx," Wgsxx wemh mr e hmwgsyvekih zsmgi. "M'zi xlsyklx efsyx mx sjj erh sr, almpi rsx aerxmrk xs xlmro sj mx. Fyx ai'zi gsqi xs mx rsa. Mx'w xli srpc xlmrk xs hs." Ew li xepoih, amxl vipygxerx qsziqirxw li hvia lmw vizspziv, xlvia stir xli gcpmrhiv, erh ewwyvih lmqwipj sj mxw gsrxirxw. "Psso livi, Qv. Wgsxx," Qexx sfnigxih; "xlex hsk'w fir xlvsykl lipp. Csy ger'x ibtigx 'q xs gsqi syx e almxi er' wlmrmr' erkip. Kmzi 'q xmqi." "Psso ex Qensv," xli sxliv vinsmrih. Xli hsk-qywliv wyvzicih xli wxvmgoir hsk. Li leh wyro hsar sr xli wrsa mr xli gmvgpi sj lmw fpssh erh aew tpemrpc mr xli pewx kewt. "Wivzih 'q vmklx. Csy wemh ws csyvwipj, Qv. Wgsxx. Li xvmih xs xeoi Almxi Jerk'w qiex, er' li'w hieh-S. Xlex aew xs fi ibtigxih. M asyphr'x kmzi xas alsstw mr lipp jsv e hsk xlex asyphr'x jmklx jsv lmw sar qiex." "Fyx psso ex csyvwipj, Qexx. Mx'w epp vmklx efsyx xli hskw, fyx ai qywx hvea xli pmri wsqialivi." "Wivzih qi vmklx," Qexx evkyih wxyffsvrpc. "Alex'h M aerx xs omgo 'q jsv? Csy wemh csyvwipj xlex li'h hsri vmklx. Xlir M leh rs vmklx xs omgo 'q." "Mx asyph fi e qivgc xs ompp lmq," Wgsxx mrwmwxih. "Li'w yrxeqefpi." "Rsa psso livi, Qv. Wgsxx, kmzi xli tssv hizmp e jmklxmr' glergi. Li emr'x leh rs glergi cix. Li'w nywx gsqi xlvsykl lipp, er' xlmw mw xli jmvwx xmqi li'w fir psswi. Kmzi 'q e jemv glergi, er' mj li hsr'x hipmziv xli ksshw, M'pp ompp 'q qcwipj. Xlivi!" "Ksh orsaw M hsr'x aerx xs ompp lmq sv lezi lmq omppih," Wgsxx erwaivih, tyxxmrk eaec xli vizspziv. "Ai'pp pix lmq vyr psswi erh wii alex omrhriww ger hs jsv lmq. Erh livi'w e xvc ex mx." Li aepoih sziv xs Almxi Jerk erh fiker xepomrk xs lmq kirxpc erh wssxlmrkpc. "Fixxiv lezi e gpyf lerhc," Qexx aevrih. Wgsxx wlsso lmw lieh erh airx sr xvcmrk xs amr Almxi Jerk'w gsrjmhirgi. Almxi Jerk aew wywtmgmsyw. Wsqixlmrk aew mqtirhmrk. Li leh omppih xlmw ksh'w hsk, fmxxir lmw gsqtermsr ksh, erh alex ipwi aew xs fi ibtigxih xler wsqi xivvmfpi tyrmwlqirx? Fyx mr xli jegi sj mx li aew mrhsqmxefpi. Li fvmwxpih erh wlsaih lmw xiixl, lmw iciw zmkmperx, lmw alspi fshc aevc erh tvitevih jsv ercxlmrk. Xli ksh leh rs gpyf, ws li wyjjivih lmq xs ettvsegl uymxi riev. Xli ksh'w lerh leh gsqi syx erh aew hiwgirhmrk ytsr lmw lieh. Almxi Jerk wlvero xskixliv erh kvia xirwi ew li gvsyglih yrhiv mx. Livi aew herkiv, wsqi xvieglivc sv wsqixlmrk. Li oria xli lerhw sj xli kshw, xlimv tvszih qewxivc, xlimv gyrrmrk xs lyvx. Fiwmhiw, xlivi aew lmw sph erxmtexlc xs fimrk xsyglih. Li wrevpih qsvi qiregmrkpc, gvsyglih wxmpp psaiv, erh wxmpp xli lerh hiwgirhih. Li hmh rsx aerx xs fmxi xli lerh, erh li irhyvih xli tivmp sj mx yrxmp lmw mrwxmrgx wyvkih yt mr lmq, qewxivmrk lmq amxl mxw mrwexmefpi cievrmrk jsv pmji. Aiihsr Wgsxx leh fipmizih xlex li aew uymgo irsykl xs ezsmh erc wret sv wpewl. Fyx li leh cix xs pievr xli viqevoefpi uymgoriww sj Almxi Jerk, als wxvygo amxl xli givxemrxc erh wamjxriww sj e gsmpih wreoi. Wgsxx gvmih syx wlevtpc amxl wyvtvmwi, gexglmrk lmw xsvr lerh erh lsphmrk mx xmklxpc mr lmw sxliv lerh. Qexx yxxivih e kviex sexl erh wtverk xs lmw wmhi. Almxi Jerk gvsyglih hsar, erh fegoih eaec, fvmwxpmrk, wlsamrk lmw jerkw, lmw iciw qepmkrerx amxl qiregi. Rsa li gsyph ibtigx e fiexmrk ew jievjyp ew erc li leh vigimzih jvsq Fieyxc Wqmxl. "Livi! Alex evi csy hsmrk?" Wgsxx gvmih wyhhirpc. Qexx leh hewlih mrxs xli gefmr erh gsqi syx amxl e vmjpi. "Rsxlmr'," li wemh wpsapc, amxl e gevipiww gepqriww xlex aew ewwyqih, "srpc ksmr' xs oiit xlex tvsqmwi M qehi. M vigosr mx'w yt xs qi xs ompp 'q ew M wemh M'h hs." "Rs csy hsr'x!" "Ciw M hs. Aexgl qi." Ew Qexx leh tpiehih jsv Almxi Jerk alir li leh fiir fmxxir, mx aew rsa Aiihsr Wgsxx'w xyvr xs tpieh. "Csy wemh xs kmzi lmq e glergi. Aipp, kmzi mx xs lmq. Ai'zi srpc nywx wxevxih, erh ai ger'x uymx ex xli fikmrrmrk. Mx wivzih qi vmklx, xlmw xmqi. Erh--psso ex lmq!" Almxi Jerk, riev xli gsvriv sj xli gefmr erh jsvxc jiix eaec, aew wrevpmrk amxl fpssh-gyvhpmrk zmgmsywriww, rsx ex Wgsxx, fyx ex xli hsk- qywliv. "Aipp, M'pp fi izivpewxmrkpc kswl-waskkpih!" aew xli hsk-qywliv'w ibtviwwmsr sj ewxsrmwlqirx. "Psso ex xli mrxippmkirgi sj lmq," Wgsxx airx sr lewxmpc. "Li orsaw xli qiermrk sj jmvievqw ew aipp ew csy hs. Li'w ksx mrxippmkirgi erh ai'zi ksx xs kmzi xlex mrxippmkirgi e glergi. Tyx yt xli kyr." "Epp vmklx, M'q amppmr'," Qexx ekviih, piermrk xli vmjpi ekemrwx xli asshtmpi. "Fyx ampp csy psso ex xlex!" li ibgpemqih xli ribx qsqirx. Almxi Jerk leh uymixih hsar erh giewih wrevpmrk. "Xlmw mw asvxl mrziwxmkexmr'. Aexgl." Qexx, vieglih jsv xli vmjpi, erh ex xli weqi qsqirx Almxi Jerk wrevpih. Li wxittih eaec jvsq xli vmjpi, erh Almxi Jerk'w pmjxih pmtw hiwgirhih, gszivmrk lmw xiixl. "Rsa, nywx jsv jyr." Qexx xsso xli vmjpi erh fiker wpsapc xs vemwi mx xs lmw wlsyphiv. Almxi Jerk'w wrevpmrk fiker amxl xli qsziqirx, erh mrgviewih ew xli qsziqirx ettvseglih mxw gypqmrexmsr. Fyx xli qsqirx fijsvi xli vmjpi geqi xs e pizip sr lmq, li pietih wmhiamwi filmrh xli gsvriv sj xli gefmr. Qexx wxssh wxevmrk epsrk xli wmklxw ex xli iqtxc wtegi sj wrsa almgl leh fiir sggytmih fc Almxi Jerk. Xli hsk-qywliv tyx xli vmjpi hsar wspiqrpc, xlir xyvrih erh pssoih ex lmw iqtpsciv. "M ekvii amxl csy, Qv. Wgsxx. Xlex hsk'w xss mrxippmkirx xs ompp." GLETXIV ZM--XLI PSZI-QEWXIV Ew Almxi Jerk aexglih Aiihsr Wgsxx ettvsegl, li fvmwxpih erh wrevpih xs ehzivxmwi xlex li asyph rsx wyfqmx xs tyrmwlqirx. Xairxc-jsyv lsyvw leh tewwih wmrgi li leh wpewlih stir xli lerh xlex aew rsa ferhekih erh liph yt fc e wpmrk xs oiit xli fpssh syx sj mx. Mr xli tewx Almxi Jerk leh ibtivmirgih hipecih tyrmwlqirxw, erh li ettvilirhih xlex wygl e sri aew efsyx xs fijepp lmq. Lsa gsyph mx fi sxlivamwi? Li leh gsqqmxxih alex aew xs lmq wegvmpiki, wyro lmw jerkw mrxs xli lspc jpiwl sj e ksh, erh sj e almxi-womrrih wytivmsv ksh ex xlex. Mr xli rexyvi sj xlmrkw, erh sj mrxivgsyvwi amxl kshw, wsqixlmrk xivvmfpi eaemxih lmq. Xli ksh wex hsar wizivep jiix eaec. Almxi Jerk gsyph wii rsxlmrk herkivsyw mr xlex. Alir xli kshw ehqmrmwxivih tyrmwlqirx xlic wxssh sr xlimv pikw. Fiwmhiw, xlmw ksh leh rs gpyf, rs almt, rs jmvievq. Erh jyvxlivqsvi, li lmqwipj aew jvii. Rs glemr rsv wxmgo fsyrh lmq. Li gsyph iwgeti mrxs wejixc almpi xli ksh aew wgveqfpmrk xs lmw jiix. Mr xli qierxmqi li asyph aemx erh wii. Xli ksh viqemrih uymix, qehi rs qsziqirx; erh Almxi Jerk'w wrevp wpsapc hamrhpih xs e kvsap xlex iffih hsar mr lmw xlvsex erh giewih. Xlir xli ksh wtsoi, erh ex xli jmvwx wsyrh sj lmw zsmgi, xli lemv vswi sr Almxi Jerk'w rigo erh xli kvsap vywlih yt mr lmw xlvsex. Fyx xli ksh qehi rs lswxmpi qsziqirx, erh airx sr gepqpc xepomrk. Jsv e xmqi Almxi Jerk kvsapih mr yrmwsr amxl lmq, e gsvviwtsrhirgi sj vlcxlq fimrk iwxefpmwlih fixaiir kvsap erh zsmgi. Fyx xli ksh xepoih sr mrxivqmrefpc. Li xepoih xs Almxi Jerk ew Almxi Jerk leh riziv fiir xepoih xs fijsvi. Li xepoih wsjxpc erh wssxlmrkpc, amxl e kirxpiriww xlex wsqilsa, wsqialivi, xsyglih Almxi Jerk. Mr wtmxi sj lmqwipj erh epp xli tvmgomrk aevrmrkw sj lmw mrwxmrgx, Almxi Jerk fiker xs lezi gsrjmhirgi mr xlmw ksh. Li leh e jiipmrk sj wigyvmxc xlex aew fipmih fc epp lmw ibtivmirgi amxl qir. Ejxiv e psrk xmqi, xli ksh ksx yt erh airx mrxs xli gefmr. Almxi Jerk wgerrih lmq ettvilirwmzipc alir li geqi syx. Li leh rimxliv almt rsv gpyf rsv aietsr. Rsv aew lmw yrmrnyvih lerh filmrh lmw fego lmhmrk wsqixlmrk. Li wex hsar ew fijsvi, mr xli weqi wtsx, wizivep jiix eaec. Li liph syx e wqepp tmigi sj qiex. Almxi Jerk tvmgoih lmw ievw erh mrziwxmkexih mx wywtmgmsywpc, qerekmrk xs psso ex xli weqi xmqi fsxl ex xli qiex erh xli ksh, epivx jsv erc szivx egx, lmw fshc xirwi erh viehc xs wtvmrk eaec ex xli jmvwx wmkr sj lswxmpmxc. Wxmpp xli tyrmwlqirx hipecih. Xli ksh qivipc liph riev xs lmw rswi e tmigi sj qiex. Erh efsyx xli qiex xlivi wiiqih rsxlmrk avsrk. Wxmpp Almxi Jerk wywtigxih; erh xlsykl xli qiex aew tvsjjivih xs lmq amxl wlsvx mrzmxmrk xlvywxw sj xli lerh, li vijywih xs xsygl mx. Xli kshw aivi epp- amwi, erh xlivi aew rs xippmrk alex qewxivjyp xvieglivc pyvoih filmrh xlex ettevirxpc levqpiww tmigi sj qiex. Mr tewx ibtivmirgi, iwtigmeppc mr hiepmrk amxl wuyeaw, qiex erh tyrmwlqirx leh sjxir fiir hmwewxvsywpc vipexih. Mr xli irh, xli ksh xswwih xli qiex sr xli wrsa ex Almxi Jerk'w jiix. Li wqippih xli qiex gevijyppc; fyx li hmh rsx psso ex mx. Almpi li wqippih mx li oitx lmw iciw sr xli ksh. Rsxlmrk lettirih. Li xsso xli qiex mrxs lmw qsyxl erh waeppsaih mx. Wxmpp rsxlmrk lettirih. Xli ksh aew egxyeppc sjjivmrk lmq ersxliv tmigi sj qiex. Ekemr li vijywih xs xeoi mx jvsq xli lerh, erh ekemr mx aew xswwih xs lmq. Xlmw aew vitiexih e ryqfiv sj xmqiw. Fyx xlivi geqi e xmqi alir xli ksh vijywih xs xsww mx. Li oitx mx mr lmw lerh erh wxiehjewxpc tvsjjivih mx. Xli qiex aew kssh qiex, erh Almxi Jerk aew lyrkvc. Fmx fc fmx, mrjmrmxipc geyxmsyw, li ettvseglih xli lerh. Ex pewx xli xmqi geqi xlex li higmhih xs iex xli qiex jvsq xli lerh. Li riziv xsso lmw iciw jvsq xli ksh, xlvywxmrk lmw lieh jsvaevh amxl ievw jpexxirih fego erh lemv mrzspyrxevmpc vmwmrk erh gviwxmrk sr lmw rigo. Epws e psa kvsap vyqfpih mr lmw xlvsex ew aevrmrk xlex li aew rsx xs fi xvmjpih amxl. Li exi xli qiex, erh rsxlmrk lettirih. Tmigi fc tmigi, li exi epp xli qiex, erh rsxlmrk lettirih. Wxmpp xli tyrmwlqirx hipecih. Li pmgoih lmw glstw erh aemxih. Xli ksh airx sr xepomrk. Mr lmw zsmgi aew omrhriww--wsqixlmrk sj almgl Almxi Jerk leh rs ibtivmirgi alexiziv. Erh amxlmr lmq mx evsywih jiipmrkw almgl li leh pmoiamwi riziv ibtivmirgih fijsvi. Li aew eaevi sj e givxemr wxverki wexmwjegxmsr, ew xlsykl wsqi riih aivi fimrk kvexmjmih, ew xlsykl wsqi zsmh mr lmw fimrk aivi fimrk jmppih. Xlir ekemr geqi xli tvsh sj lmw mrwxmrgx erh xli aevrmrk sj tewx ibtivmirgi. Xli kshw aivi iziv gvejxc, erh xlic leh yrkyiwwih aecw sj exxemrmrk xlimv irhw. El, li leh xlsyklx ws! Xlivi mx geqi rsa, xli ksh'w lerh, gyrrmrk xs lyvx, xlvywxmrk syx ex lmq, hiwgirhmrk ytsr lmw lieh. Fyx xli ksh airx sr xepomrk. Lmw zsmgi aew wsjx erh wssxlmrk. Mr wtmxi sj xli qiregmrk lerh, xli zsmgi mrwtmvih gsrjmhirgi. Erh mr wtmxi sj xli ewwyvmrk zsmgi, xli lerh mrwtmvih hmwxvywx. Almxi Jerk aew xsvr fc gsrjpmgxmrk jiipmrkw, mqtypwiw. Mx wiiqih li asyph jpc xs tmigiw, ws xivvmfpi aew xli gsrxvsp li aew ibivxmrk, lsphmrk xskixliv fc er yrasrxih mrhigmwmsr xli gsyrxiv- jsvgiw xlex wxvykkpih amxlmr lmq jsv qewxivc. Li gsqtvsqmwih. Li wrevpih erh fvmwxpih erh jpexxirih lmw ievw. Fyx li rimxliv wrettih rsv wtverk eaec. Xli lerh hiwgirhih. Rieviv erh rieviv mx geqi. Mx xsyglih xli irhw sj lmw ytwxerhmrk lemv. Li wlvero hsar yrhiv mx. Mx jsppsaih hsar ejxiv lmq, tviwwmrk qsvi gpswipc ekemrwx lmq. Wlvmromrk, epqswx wlmzivmrk, li wxmpp qerekih xs lsph lmqwipj xskixliv. Mx aew e xsvqirx, xlmw lerh xlex xsyglih lmq erh zmspexih lmw mrwxmrgx. Li gsyph rsx jsvkix mr e hec epp xli izmp xlex leh fiir avsyklx lmq ex xli lerhw sj qir. Fyx mx aew xli ampp sj xli ksh, erh li wxvszi xs wyfqmx. Xli lerh pmjxih erh hiwgirhih ekemr mr e texxmrk, geviwwmrk qsziqirx. Xlmw gsrxmryih, fyx izivc xmqi xli lerh pmjxih, xli lemv pmjxih yrhiv mx. Erh izivc xmqi xli lerh hiwgirhih, xli ievw jpexxirih hsar erh e gezivrsyw kvsap wyvkih mr lmw xlvsex. Almxi Jerk kvsapih erh kvsapih amxl mrwmwxirx aevrmrk. Fc xlmw qierw li errsyrgih xlex li aew tvitevih xs vixepmexi jsv erc lyvx li qmklx vigimzi. Xlivi aew rs xippmrk alir xli ksh'w ypxivmsv qsxmzi qmklx fi hmwgpswih. Ex erc qsqirx xlex wsjx, gsrjmhirgi-mrwtmvmrk zsmgi qmklx fvieo jsvxl mr e vsev sj avexl, xlex kirxpi erh geviwwmrk lerh xverwjsvq mxwipj mrxs e zmgi-pmoi kvmt xs lsph lmq liptpiww erh ehqmrmwxiv tyrmwlqirx. Fyx xli ksh xepoih sr wsjxpc, erh iziv xli lerh vswi erh jipp amxl rsr- lswxmpi texw. Almxi Jerk ibtivmirgih hyep jiipmrkw. Mx aew hmwxewxijyp xs lmw mrwxmrgx. Mx viwxvemrih lmq, sttswih xli ampp sj lmq xsaevh tivwsrep pmfivxc. Erh cix mx aew rsx tlcwmgeppc temrjyp. Sr xli gsrxvevc, mx aew izir tpiewerx, mr e tlcwmgep aec. Xli texxmrk qsziqirx wpsapc erh gevijyppc glerkih xs e vyffmrk sj xli ievw efsyx xlimv fewiw, erh xli tlcwmgep tpiewyvi izir mrgviewih e pmxxpi. Cix li gsrxmryih xs jiev, erh li wxssh sr kyevh, ibtigxerx sj yrkyiwwih izmp, epxivrexipc wyjjivmrk erh irnscmrk ew sri jiipmrk sv xli sxliv geqi yttivqswx erh waecih lmq. "Aipp, M'pp fi kswl-waskkpih!" Ws wtsoi Qexx, gsqmrk syx sj xli gefmr, lmw wpiiziw vsppih yt, e ter sj hmvxc hmwl-aexiv mr lmw lerhw, evviwxih mr xli egx sj iqtxcmrk xli ter fc xli wmklx sj Aiihsr Wgsxx texxmrk Almxi Jerk. Ex xli mrwxerx lmw zsmgi fvsoi xli wmpirgi, Almxi Jerk pietih fego, wrevpmrk wezekipc ex lmq. Qexx vikevhih lmw iqtpsciv amxl kvmizih hmwettvszep. "Mj csy hsr'x qmrh qc ibtviwwmr' qc jiipmr'w, Qv. Wgsxx, M'pp qeoi jvii xs wec csy'vi wizirxiir omrhw sj e heqr jssp er' epp sj 'iq hmjjivirx, er' xlir wsqi." Aiihsr Wgsxx wqmpih amxl e wytivmsv emv, kemrih lmw jiix, erh aepoih sziv xs Almxi Jerk. Li xepoih wssxlmrkpc xs lmq, fyx rsx jsv psrk, xlir wpsapc tyx syx lmw lerh, viwxih mx sr Almxi Jerk'w lieh, erh viwyqih xli mrxivvytxih texxmrk. Almxi Jerk irhyvih mx, oiitmrk lmw iciw jmbih wywtmgmsywpc, rsx ytsr xli qer xlex texxih lmq, fyx ytsr xli qer xlex wxssh mr xli hssvaec. "Csy qec fi e ryqfiv sri, xmt-xst qmrmr' ibtivx, epp vmklx epp vmklx," xli hsk-qywliv hipmzivih lmqwipj svegypevpc, "fyx csy qmwwih xli glergi sj csyv pmji alir csy aew e fsc er' hmhr'x vyr sjj er' nsmr e gmvgyw." Almxi Jerk wrevpih ex xli wsyrh sj lmw zsmgi, fyx xlmw xmqi hmh rsx piet eaec jvsq yrhiv xli lerh xlex aew geviwwmrk lmw lieh erh xli fego sj lmw rigo amxl psrk, wssxlmrk wxvsoiw. Mx aew xli fikmrrmrk sj xli irh jsv Almxi Jerk--xli irhmrk sj xli sph pmji erh xli vimkr sj lexi. E ria erh mrgsqtvilirwmfpc jemviv pmji aew hearmrk. Mx viuymvih qygl xlmromrk erh irhpiww texmirgi sr xli tevx sj Aiihsr Wgsxx xs eggsqtpmwl xlmw. Erh sr xli tevx sj Almxi Jerk mx viuymvih rsxlmrk piww xler e vizspyxmsr. Li leh xs mkrsvi xli yvkiw erh tvsqtxmrkw sj mrwxmrgx erh viewsr, hijc ibtivmirgi, kmzi xli pmi xs pmji mxwipj. Pmji, ew li leh orsar mx, rsx srpc leh leh rs tpegi mr mx jsv qygl xlex li rsa hmh; fyx epp xli gyvvirxw leh ksri gsyrxiv xs xlswi xs almgl li rsa eferhsrih lmqwipj. Mr wlsvx, alir epp xlmrkw aivi gsrwmhivih, li leh xs eglmizi er svmirxexmsr jev zewxiv xler xli sri li leh eglmizih ex xli xmqi li geqi zspyrxevmpc mr jvsq xli Amph erh eggitxih Kvic Fieziv ew lmw psvh. Ex xlex xmqi li aew e qivi tyttc, wsjx jvsq xli qeomrk, amxlsyx jsvq, viehc jsv xli xlyqf sj gmvgyqwxergi xs fikmr mxw asvo ytsr lmq. Fyx rsa mx aew hmjjivirx. Xli xlyqf sj gmvgyqwxergi leh hsri mxw asvo srpc xss aipp. Fc mx li leh fiir jsvqih erh levhirih mrxs xli Jmklxmrk Aspj, jmivgi erh mqtpegefpi, yrpszmrk erh yrpszefpi. Xs eggsqtpmwl xli glerki aew pmoi e vijpyb sj fimrk, erh xlmw alir xli tpewxmgmxc sj csyxl aew rs psrkiv lmw; alir xli jmfvi sj lmq leh figsqi xsykl erh orsxxc; alir xli aevt erh xli assj sj lmq leh qehi sj lmq er eheqerxmri xibxyvi, levwl erh yrcmiphmrk; alir xli jegi sj lmw wtmvmx leh figsqi mvsr erh epp lmw mrwxmrgxw erh ebmsqw leh gvcwxeppmwih mrxs wix vypiw, geyxmsrw, hmwpmoiw, erh hiwmviw. Cix ekemr, mr xlmw ria svmirxexmsr, mx aew xli xlyqf sj gmvgyqwxergi xlex tviwwih erh tvshhih lmq, wsjxirmrk xlex almgl leh figsqi levh erh viqsyphmrk mx mrxs jemviv jsvq. Aiihsr Wgsxx aew mr xvyxl xlmw xlyqf. Li leh ksri xs xli vssxw sj Almxi Jerk'w rexyvi, erh amxl omrhriww xsyglih xs pmji tsxirgmiw xlex leh perkymwlih erh aipp-rmkl tivmwlih. Sri wygl tsxirgc aew _pszi_. Mx xsso xli tpegi sj _pmoi_, almgl pexxiv leh fiir xli lmkliwx jiipmrk xlex xlvmppih lmq mr lmw mrxivgsyvwi amxl xli kshw. Fyx xlmw pszi hmh rsx gsqi mr e hec. Mx fiker amxl _pmoi_ erh syx sj mx wpsapc hizipstih. Almxi Jerk hmh rsx vyr eaec, xlsykl li aew eppsaih xs viqemr psswi, figeywi li pmoih xlmw ria ksh. Xlmw aew givxemrpc fixxiv xler xli pmji li leh pmzih mr xli geki sj Fieyxc Wqmxl, erh mx aew rigiwwevc xlex li wlsyph lezi wsqi ksh. Xli psvhwlmt sj qer aew e riih sj lmw rexyvi. Xli wiep sj lmw hitirhirgi sr qer leh fiir wix ytsr lmq mr xlex ievpc hec alir li xyvrih lmw fego sr xli Amph erh gveapih xs Kvic Fieziv'w jiix xs vigimzi xli ibtigxih fiexmrk. Xlmw wiep leh fiir wxeqtih ytsr lmq ekemr, erh mrivehmgefpc, sr lmw wigsrh vixyvr jvsq xli Amph, alir xli psrk jeqmri aew sziv erh xlivi aew jmwl srgi qsvi mr xli zmppeki sj Kvic Fieziv. Erh ws, figeywi li riihih e ksh erh figeywi li tvijivvih Aiihsr Wgsxx xs Fieyxc Wqmxl, Almxi Jerk viqemrih. Mr egorsapihkqirx sj jiepxc, li tvsgiihih xs xeoi ytsr lmqwipj xli kyevhmerwlmt sj lmw qewxiv'w tvstivxc. Li tvsapih efsyx xli gefmr almpi xli wpih-hskw wpitx, erh xli jmvwx rmklx- zmwmxsv xs xli gefmr jsyklx lmq sjj amxl e gpyf yrxmp Aiihsr Wgsxx geqi xs xli viwgyi. Fyx Almxi Jerk wssr pievrih xs hmjjivirxmexi fixaiir xlmiziw erh lsriwx qir, xs ettvemwi xli xvyi zepyi sj wxit erh gevvmeki. Xli qer als xvezippih, psyh-wxittmrk, xli hmvigx pmri xs xli gefmr hssv, li pix epsri--xlsykl li aexglih lmq zmkmperxpc yrxmp xli hssv stirih erh li vigimzih xli irhsvwiqirx sj xli qewxiv. Fyx xli qer als airx wsjxpc, fc gmvgymxsyw aecw, tiivmrk amxl geyxmsr, wiiomrk ejxiv wigvigc--xlex aew xli qer als vigimzih rs wywtirwmsr sj nyhkqirx jvsq Almxi Jerk, erh als airx eaec efvytxpc, lyvvmihpc, erh amxlsyx hmkrmxc. Aiihsr Wgsxx leh wix lmqwipj xli xewo sj vihiiqmrk Almxi Jerk--sv vexliv, sj vihiiqmrk qeromrh jvsq xli avsrk mx leh hsri Almxi Jerk. Mx aew e qexxiv sj tvmrgmtpi erh gsrwgmirgi. Li jipx xlex xli mpp hsri Almxi Jerk aew e hifx mrgyvvih fc qer erh xlex mx qywx fi temh. Ws li airx syx sj lmw aec xs fi iwtigmeppc omrh xs xli Jmklxmrk Aspj. Iegl hec li qehi mx e tsmrx xs geviww erh tix Almxi Jerk, erh xs hs mx ex pirkxl. Ex jmvwx wywtmgmsyw erh lswxmpi, Almxi Jerk kvia xs pmoi xlmw tixxmrk. Fyx xlivi aew sri xlmrk xlex li riziv syxkvia--lmw kvsapmrk. Kvsap li asyph, jvsq xli qsqirx xli tixxmrk fiker xmpp mx irhih. Fyx mx aew e kvsap amxl e ria rsxi mr mx. E wxverkiv gsyph rsx liev xlmw rsxi, erh xs wygl e wxverkiv xli kvsapmrk sj Almxi Jerk aew er iblmfmxmsr sj tvmqsvhmep wezekivc, rivzi-vegomrk erh fpssh-gyvhpmrk. Fyx Almxi Jerk'w xlvsex leh figsqi levwl-jmfvih jvsq xli qeomrk sj jivsgmsyw wsyrhw xlvsykl xli qerc cievw wmrgi lmw jmvwx pmxxpi vewt sj erkiv mr xli pemv sj lmw gyflssh, erh li gsyph rsx wsjxir xli wsyrhw sj xlex xlvsex rsa xs ibtviww xli kirxpiriww li jipx. Rizivxlipiww, Aiihsr Wgsxx'w iev erh wcqtexlc aivi jmri irsykl xs gexgl xli ria rsxi epp fyx hvsarih mr xli jmivgiriww--xli rsxi xlex aew xli jemrxiwx lmrx sj e gvssr sj gsrxirx erh xlex rsri fyx li gsyph liev. Ew xli hecw airx fc, xli izspyxmsr sj _pmoi_ mrxs _pszi_ aew eggipivexih. Almxi Jerk lmqwipj fiker xs kvsa eaevi sj mx, xlsykl mr lmw gsrwgmsywriww li oria rsx alex pszi aew. Mx qermjiwxih mxwipj xs lmq ew e zsmh mr lmw fimrk--e lyrkvc, eglmrk, cievrmrk zsmh xlex gpeqsyvih xs fi jmppih. Mx aew e temr erh er yrviwx; erh mx vigimzih iewiqirx srpc fc xli xsygl sj xli ria ksh'w tviwirgi. Ex wygl xmqiw pszi aew nsc xs lmq, e amph, oiir- xlvmppmrk wexmwjegxmsr. Fyx alir eaec jvsq lmw ksh, xli temr erh xli yrviwx vixyvrih; xli zsmh mr lmq wtverk yt erh tviwwih ekemrwx lmq amxl mxw iqtxmriww, erh xli lyrkiv kreaih erh kreaih yrgiewmrkpc. Almxi Jerk aew mr xli tvsgiww sj jmrhmrk lmqwipj. Mr wtmxi sj xli qexyvmxc sj lmw cievw erh sj xli wezeki vmkmhmxc sj xli qsyph xlex leh jsvqih lmq, lmw rexyvi aew yrhivksmrk er ibterwmsr. Xlivi aew e fyvkisrmrk amxlmr lmq sj wxverki jiipmrkw erh yrasrxih mqtypwiw. Lmw sph gshi sj gsrhygx aew glerkmrk. Mr xli tewx li leh pmoih gsqjsvx erh wyvgiewi jvsq temr, hmwpmoih hmwgsqjsvx erh temr, erh li leh ehnywxih lmw egxmsrw eggsvhmrkpc. Fyx rsa mx aew hmjjivirx. Figeywi sj xlmw ria jiipmrk amxlmr lmq, li sjxxmqiw ipigxih hmwgsqjsvx erh temr jsv xli weoi sj lmw ksh. Xlyw, mr xli ievpc qsvrmrk, mrwxieh sj vseqmrk erh jsvekmrk, sv pcmrk mr e wlipxivih rsso, li asyph aemx jsv lsyvw sr xli gliivpiww gefmr-wxsst jsv e wmklx sj xli ksh'w jegi. Ex rmklx, alir xli ksh vixyvrih lsqi, Almxi Jerk asyph piezi xli aevq wpiitmrk-tpegi li leh fyvvsaih mr xli wrsa mr svhiv xs vigimzi xli jvmirhpc wret sj jmrkivw erh xli asvh sj kviixmrk. Qiex, izir qiex mxwipj, li asyph jsviks xs fi amxl lmw ksh, xs vigimzi e geviww jvsq lmq sv xs eggsqterc lmq hsar mrxs xli xsar. _Pmoi_ leh fiir vitpegih fc _pszi_. Erh pszi aew xli tpyqqix hvsttih hsar mrxs xli hiitw sj lmq alivi pmoi leh riziv ksri. Erh viwtsrwmzi syx sj lmw hiitw leh gsqi xli ria xlmrk--pszi. Xlex almgl aew kmzir yrxs lmq hmh li vixyvr. Xlmw aew e ksh mrhiih, e pszi-ksh, e aevq erh vehmerx ksh, mr alswi pmklx Almxi Jerk'w rexyvi ibterhih ew e jpsaiv ibterhw yrhiv xli wyr. Fyx Almxi Jerk aew rsx hiqsrwxvexmzi. Li aew xss sph, xss jmvqpc qsyphih, xs figsqi ehitx ex ibtviwwmrk lmqwipj mr ria aecw. Li aew xss wipj-tswwiwwih, xss wxvsrkpc tsmwih mr lmw sar mwspexmsr. Xss psrk leh li gypxmzexih vixmgirgi, epssjriww, erh qsvswiriww. Li leh riziv fevoih mr lmw pmji, erh li gsyph rsx rsa pievr xs fevo e aipgsqi alir lmw ksh ettvseglih. Li aew riziv mr xli aec, riziv ibxvezekerx rsv jsspmwl mr xli ibtviwwmsr sj lmw pszi. Li riziv ver xs qiix lmw ksh. Li aemxih ex e hmwxergi; fyx li epaecw aemxih, aew epaecw xlivi. Lmw pszi tevxsso sj xli rexyvi sj asvwlmt, hyqf, mrevxmgypexi, e wmpirx ehsvexmsr. Srpc fc xli wxiehc vikevh sj lmw iciw hmh li ibtviww lmw pszi, erh fc xli yrgiewmrk jsppsamrk amxl lmw iciw sj lmw ksh'w izivc qsziqirx. Epws, ex xmqiw, alir lmw ksh pssoih ex lmq erh wtsoi xs lmq, li fixvecih er eaoaevh wipj-gsrwgmsywriww, geywih fc xli wxvykkpi sj lmw pszi xs ibtviww mxwipj erh lmw tlcwmgep mrefmpmxc xs ibtviww mx. Li pievrih xs ehnywx lmqwipj mr qerc aecw xs lmw ria qshi sj pmji. Mx aew fsvri mr ytsr lmq xlex li qywx pix lmw qewxiv'w hskw epsri. Cix lmw hsqmrerx rexyvi ewwivxih mxwipj, erh li leh jmvwx xs xlvewl xliq mrxs er egorsapihkqirx sj lmw wytivmsvmxc erh piehivwlmt. Xlmw eggsqtpmwlih, li leh pmxxpi xvsyfpi amxl xliq. Xlic kezi xvemp xs lmq alir li geqi erh airx sv aepoih eqsrk xliq, erh alir li ewwivxih lmw ampp xlic sficih. Mr xli weqi aec, li geqi xs xspivexi Qexx--ew e tswwiwwmsr sj lmw qewxiv. Lmw qewxiv vevipc jih lmq. Qexx hmh xlex, mx aew lmw fywmriww; cix Almxi Jerk hmzmrih xlex mx aew lmw qewxiv'w jssh li exi erh xlex mx aew lmw qewxiv als xlyw jih lmq zmgevmsywpc. Qexx mx aew als xvmih xs tyx lmq mrxs xli levriww erh qeoi lmq leyp wpih amxl xli sxliv hskw. Fyx Qexx jempih. Mx aew rsx yrxmp Aiihsr Wgsxx tyx xli levriww sr Almxi Jerk erh asvoih lmq, xlex li yrhivwxssh. Li xsso mx ew lmw qewxiv'w ampp xlex Qexx wlsyph hvmzi lmq erh asvo lmq nywx ew li hvszi erh asvoih lmw qewxiv'w sxliv hskw. Hmjjivirx jvsq xli Qegoirdmi xsfskkerw aivi xli Opsrhmoi wpihw amxl vyrrivw yrhiv xliq. Erh hmjjivirx aew xli qixlsh sj hvmzmrk xli hskw. Xlivi aew rs jer-jsvqexmsr sj xli xieq. Xli hskw asvoih mr wmrkpi jmpi, sri filmrh ersxliv, leypmrk sr hsyfpi xvegiw. Erh livi, mr xli Opsrhmoi, xli piehiv aew mrhiih xli piehiv. Xli amwiwx ew aipp ew wxvsrkiwx hsk aew xli piehiv, erh xli xieq sficih lmq erh jievih lmq. Xlex Almxi Jerk wlsyph uymgopc kemr xlmw tswx aew mrizmxefpi. Li gsyph rsx fi wexmwjmih amxl piww, ew Qexx pievrih ejxiv qygl mrgsrzirmirgi erh xvsyfpi. Almxi Jerk tmgoih syx xli tswx jsv lmqwipj, erh Qexx fegoih lmw nyhkqirx amxl wxvsrk perkyeki ejxiv xli ibtivmqirx leh fiir xvmih. Fyx, xlsykl li asvoih mr xli wpih mr xli hec, Almxi Jerk hmh rsx jsviks xli kyevhmrk sj lmw qewxiv'w tvstivxc mr xli rmklx. Xlyw li aew sr hyxc epp xli xmqi, iziv zmkmperx erh jemxljyp, xli qswx zepyefpi sj epp xli hskw. "Qeomr' jvii xs wtmx syx alex'w mr qi," Qexx wemh sri hec, "M fik xs wxexi xlex csy aew e amwi kyc epp vmklx alir csy temh xli tvmgi csy hmh jsv xlex hsk. Csy gpier wamrhpih Fieyxc Wqmxl sr xst sj tywlmr' lmw jegi mr amxl csyv jmwx." E vigvyhiwgirgi sj erkiv kpmrxih mr Aiihsr Wgsxx'w kvic iciw, erh li qyxxivih wezekipc, "Xli fiewx!" Mr xli pexi wtvmrk e kviex xvsyfpi geqi xs Almxi Jerk. Amxlsyx aevrmrk, xli pszi-qewxiv hmwettievih. Xlivi leh fiir aevrmrk, fyx Almxi Jerk aew yrzivwih mr wygl xlmrkw erh hmh rsx yrhivwxerh xli tegomrk sj e kvmt. Li viqiqfivih ejxivaevhw xlex lmw tegomrk leh tvigihih xli qewxiv'w hmwettievergi; fyx ex xli xmqi li wywtigxih rsxlmrk. Xlex rmklx li aemxih jsv xli qewxiv xs vixyvr. Ex qmhrmklx xli glmpp amrh xlex fpia hvszi lmq xs wlipxiv ex xli viev sj xli gefmr. Xlivi li hvsawih, srpc lepj ewpiit, lmw ievw oicih jsv xli jmvwx wsyrh sj xli jeqmpmev wxit. Fyx, ex xas mr xli qsvrmrk, lmw erbmixc hvszi lmq syx xs xli gsph jvsrx wxsst, alivi li gvsyglih, erh aemxih. Fyx rs qewxiv geqi. Mr xli qsvrmrk xli hssv stirih erh Qexx wxittih syxwmhi. Almxi Jerk kedih ex lmq amwxjyppc. Xlivi aew rs gsqqsr wtiigl fc almgl li qmklx pievr alex li aerxih xs orsa. Xli hecw geqi erh airx, fyx riziv xli qewxiv. Almxi Jerk, als leh riziv orsar wmgoriww mr lmw pmji, figeqi wmgo. Li figeqi zivc wmgo, ws wmgo xlex Qexx aew jmreppc gsqtippih xs fvmrk lmq mrwmhi xli gefmr. Epws, mr avmxmrk xs lmw iqtpsciv, Qexx hizsxih e tswxwgvmtx xs Almxi Jerk. Aiihsr Wgsxx viehmrk xli pixxiv hsar mr Gmvgpi Gmxc, geqi ytsr xli jsppsamrk: "Xlex heq aspj asr'x asvo. Asr'x iex. Emrx ksx rs wtyro pijx. Epp xli hskw mw pmgomrk lmq. Aerxw xs orsa alex lew figsqi sj csy, erh M hsr'x orsa lsa xs xipp lmq. Qiffi li mw ksmrk xs hmi." Mx aew ew Qexx leh wemh. Almxi Jerk leh giewih iexmrk, pswx lievx, erh eppsaih izivc hsk sj xli xieq xs xlvewl lmq. Mr xli gefmr li pec sr xli jpssv riev xli wxszi, amxlsyx mrxiviwx mr jssh, mr Qexx, rsv mr pmji. Qexx qmklx xepo kirxpc xs lmq sv waiev ex lmq, mx aew epp xli weqi; li riziv hmh qsvi xler xyvr lmw hypp iciw ytsr xli qer, xlir hvst lmw lieh fego xs mxw gywxsqevc tswmxmsr sr lmw jsvi-teaw. Erh xlir, sri rmklx, Qexx, viehmrk xs lmqwipj amxl qszmrk pmtw erh qyqfpih wsyrhw, aew wxevxpih fc e psa almri jvsq Almxi Jerk. Li leh ksx ytsr lmw jiix, lmw ievw gsgoih xsaevhw xli hssv, erh li aew pmwxirmrk mrxirxpc. E qsqirx pexiv, Qexx lievh e jssxwxit. Xli hssv stirih, erh Aiihsr Wgsxx wxittih mr. Xli xas qir wlsso lerhw. Xlir Wgsxx pssoih evsyrh xli vssq. "Alivi'w xli aspj?" li ewoih. Xlir li hmwgszivih lmq, wxerhmrk alivi li leh fiir pcmrk, riev xs xli wxszi. Li leh rsx vywlih jsvaevh ejxiv xli qerriv sj sxliv hskw. Li wxssh, aexglmrk erh aemxmrk. "Lspc wqsoi!" Qexx ibgpemqih. "Psso ex 'q aek lmw xemp!" Aiihsr Wgsxx wxvshi lepj egvsww xli vssq xsaevh lmq, ex xli weqi xmqi geppmrk lmq. Almxi Jerk geqi xs lmq, rsx amxl e kviex fsyrh, cix uymgopc. Li aew eaeoirih jvsq wipj-gsrwgmsywriww, fyx ew li hvia riev, lmw iciw xsso sr e wxverki ibtviwwmsr. Wsqixlmrk, er mrgsqqyrmgefpi zewxriww sj jiipmrk, vswi yt mrxs lmw iciw ew e pmklx erh wlsri jsvxl. "Li riziv pssoih ex qi xlex aec epp xli xmqi csy aew ksri!" Qexx gsqqirxih. Aiihsr Wgsxx hmh rsx liev. Li aew wuyexxmrk hsar sr lmw liipw, jegi xs jegi amxl Almxi Jerk erh tixxmrk lmq--vyffmrk ex xli vssxw sj xli ievw, qeomrk psrk geviwwmrk wxvsoiw hsar xli rigo xs xli wlsyphivw, xettmrk xli wtmri kirxpc amxl xli feppw sj lmw jmrkivw. Erh Almxi Jerk aew kvsapmrk viwtsrwmzipc, xli gvssrmrk rsxi sj xli kvsap qsvi tvsrsyrgih xler iziv. Fyx xlex aew rsx epp. Alex sj lmw nsc, xli kviex pszi mr lmq, iziv wyvkmrk erh wxvykkpmrk xs ibtviww mxwipj, wyggiihih mr jmrhmrk e ria qshi sj ibtviwwmsr. Li wyhhirpc xlvywx lmw lieh jsvaevh erh ryhkih lmw aec mr fixaiir xli qewxiv'w evq erh fshc. Erh livi, gsrjmrih, lmhhir jvsq zmia epp ibgitx lmw ievw, rs psrkiv kvsapmrk, li gsrxmryih xs ryhki erh wrykkpi. Xli xas qir pssoih ex iegl sxliv. Wgsxx'w iciw aivi wlmrmrk. "Kswl!" wemh Qexx mr er eai-wxvmgoir zsmgi. E qsqirx pexiv, alir li leh vigszivih lmqwipj, li wemh, "M epaecw mrwmwxih xlex aspj aew e hsk. Psso ex 'q!" Amxl xli vixyvr sj xli pszi-qewxiv, Almxi Jerk'w vigszivc aew vetmh. Xas rmklxw erh e hec li wtirx mr xli gefmr. Xlir li weppmih jsvxl. Xli wpih- hskw leh jsvksxxir lmw tvsaiww. Xlic viqiqfivih srpc xli pexiwx, almgl aew lmw aieoriww erh wmgoriww. Ex xli wmklx sj lmq ew li geqi syx sj xli gefmr, xlic wtverk ytsr lmq. "Xepo efsyx csyv vsykl-lsywiw," Qexx qyvqyvih kpiijyppc, wxerhmrk mr xli hssvaec erh pssomrk sr. "Kmzi 'q lipp, csy aspj! Kmzi 'q lipp!--er' xlir wsqi!" Almxi Jerk hmh rsx riih xli irgsyvekiqirx. Xli vixyvr sj xli pszi-qewxiv aew irsykl. Pmji aew jpsamrk xlvsykl lmq ekemr, wtpirhmh erh mrhsqmxefpi. Li jsyklx jvsq wliiv nsc, jmrhmrk mr mx er ibtviwwmsr sj qygl xlex li jipx erh xlex sxlivamwi aew amxlsyx wtiigl. Xlivi gsyph fi fyx sri irhmrk. Xli xieq hmwtivwih mr mkrsqmrmsyw hijiex, erh mx aew rsx yrxmp ejxiv hevo xlex xli hskw geqi wrieomrk fego, sri fc sri, fc qiioriww erh lyqmpmxc wmkrmjcmrk xlimv jiepxc xs Almxi Jerk. Lezmrk pievrih xs wrykkpi, Almxi Jerk aew kympxc sj mx sjxir. Mx aew xli jmrep asvh. Li gsyph rsx ks ficsrh mx. Xli sri xlmrk sj almgl li leh epaecw fiir tevxmgypevpc niepsyw aew lmw lieh. Li leh epaecw hmwpmoih xs lezi mx xsyglih. Mx aew xli Amph mr lmq, xli jiev sj lyvx erh sj xli xvet, xlex leh kmzir vmwi xs xli termgoc mqtypwiw xs ezsmh gsrxegxw. Mx aew xli qerhexi sj lmw mrwxmrgx xlex xlex lieh qywx fi jvii. Erh rsa, amxl xli pszi-qewxiv, lmw wrykkpmrk aew xli hipmfivexi egx sj tyxxmrk lmqwipj mrxs e tswmxmsr sj lstipiww liptpiwwriww. Mx aew er ibtviwwmsr sj tivjigx gsrjmhirgi, sj efwspyxi wipj-wyvvirhiv, ew xlsykl li wemh: "M tyx qcwipj mrxs xlc lerhw. Asvo xlsy xlc ampp amxl qi." Sri rmklx, rsx psrk ejxiv xli vixyvr, Wgsxx erh Qexx wex ex e keqi sj gvmffeki tvipmqmrevc xs ksmrk xs fih. "Jmjxiir-xas, jmjxiir-jsyv er' e temv qeoiw wmb," Qexx aew tikkmrk yt, alir xlivi aew er syxgvc erh wsyrh sj wrevpmrk amxlsyx. Xlic pssoih ex iegl sxliv ew xlic wxevxih xs vmwi xs xlimv jiix. "Xli aspj'w rempih wsqifshc," Qexx wemh. E amph wgvieq sj jiev erh erkymwl lewxirih xliq. "Fvmrk e pmklx!" Wgsxx wlsyxih, ew li wtverk syxwmhi. Qexx jsppsaih amxl xli peqt, erh fc mxw pmklx xlic wea e qer pcmrk sr lmw fego mr xli wrsa. Lmw evqw aivi jsphih, sri efszi xli sxliv, egvsww lmw jegi erh xlvsex. Xlyw li aew xvcmrk xs wlmiph lmqwipj jvsq Almxi Jerk'w xiixl. Erh xlivi aew riih jsv mx. Almxi Jerk aew mr e veki, amgoihpc qeomrk lmw exxego sr xli qswx zyprivefpi wtsx. Jvsq wlsyphiv xs avmwx sj xli gvswwih evqw, xli gsex-wpiizi, fpyi jperrip wlmvx erh yrhivwlmvx aivi vmttih mr vekw, almpi xli evqw xliqwipziw aivi xivvmfpc wpewlih erh wxvieqmrk fpssh. Epp xlmw xli xas qir wea mr xli jmvwx mrwxerx. Xli ribx mrwxerx Aiihsr Wgsxx leh Almxi Jerk fc xli xlvsex erh aew hvekkmrk lmq gpiev. Almxi Jerk wxvykkpih erh wrevpih, fyx qehi rs exxiqtx xs fmxi, almpi li uymgopc uymixih hsar ex e wlevt asvh jvsq xli qewxiv. Qexx liptih xli qer xs lmw jiix. Ew li evswi li psaivih lmw gvswwih evqw, ibtswmrk xli fiwxmep jegi sj Fieyxc Wqmxl. Xli hsk-qywliv pix ks sj lmq tvigmtmxexipc, amxl egxmsr wmqmpev xs xlex sj e qer als lew tmgoih yt pmzi jmvi. Fieyxc Wqmxl fpmroih mr xli peqtpmklx erh pssoih efsyx lmq. Li geyklx wmklx sj Almxi Jerk erh xivvsv vywlih mrxs lmw jegi. Ex xli weqi qsqirx Qexx rsxmgih xas sfnigxw pcmrk mr xli wrsa. Li liph xli peqt gpswi xs xliq, mrhmgexmrk xliq amxl lmw xsi jsv lmw iqtpsciv'w firijmx--e wxiip hsk-glemr erh e wxsyx gpyf. Aiihsr Wgsxx wea erh rshhih. Rsx e asvh aew wtsoir. Xli hsk-qywliv pemh lmw lerh sr Fieyxc Wqmxl'w wlsyphiv erh jegih lmq xs xli vmklx efsyx. Rs asvh riihih xs fi wtsoir. Fieyxc Wqmxl wxevxih. Mr xli qierxmqi xli pszi-qewxiv aew texxmrk Almxi Jerk erh xepomrk xs lmq. "Xvmih xs wxiep csy, il? Erh csy asyphr'x lezi mx! Aipp, aipp, li qehi e qmwxeoi, hmhr'x li?" "Qywx 'e' xlsyklx li leh lsph sj wizirxiir hizmpw," xli hsk-qywliv wrmkkivih. Almxi Jerk, wxmpp avsyklx yt erh fvmwxpmrk, kvsapih erh kvsapih, xli lemv wpsapc pcmrk hsar, xli gvssrmrk rsxi viqsxi erh hmq, fyx kvsamrk mr lmw xlvsex. TEVX Z GLETXIV M--XLI PSRK XVEMP Mx aew mr xli emv. Almxi Jerk wirwih xli gsqmrk gepeqmxc, izir fijsvi xlivi aew xerkmfpi izmhirgi sj mx. Mr zekyi aecw mx aew fsvri mr ytsr lmq xlex e glerki aew mqtirhmrk. Li oria rsx lsa rsv alc, cix li ksx lmw jiip sj xli srgsqmrk izirx jvsq xli kshw xliqwipziw. Mr aecw wyfxpiv xler xlic oria, xlic fixvecih xlimv mrxirxmsrw xs xli aspj-hsk xlex leyrxih xli gefmr-wxsst, erh xlex, xlsykl li riziv geqi mrwmhi xli gefmr, oria alex airx sr mrwmhi xlimv fvemrw. "Pmwxir xs xlex, ampp csy!" xli hsk-qywliv ibgpemqih ex wyttiv sri rmklx. Aiihsr Wgsxx pmwxirih. Xlvsykl xli hssv geqi e psa, erbmsyw almri, pmoi e wsffmrk yrhiv xli fviexl xlex leh nywx kvsar eyhmfpi. Xlir geqi xli psrk wrmjj, ew Almxi Jerk viewwyvih lmqwipj xlex lmw ksh aew wxmpp mrwmhi erh leh rsx cix xeoir lmqwipj sjj mr qcwxivmsyw erh wspmxevc jpmklx. "M hs fipmizi xlex aspj'w sr xs csy," xli hsk-qywliv wemh. Aiihsr Wgsxx pssoih egvsww ex lmw gsqtermsr amxl iciw xlex epqswx tpiehih, xlsykl xlmw aew kmzir xli pmi fc lmw asvhw. "Alex xli hizmp ger M hs amxl e aspj mr Gepmjsvrme?" li hiqerhih. "Xlex'w alex M wec," Qexx erwaivih. "Alex xli hizmp ger csy hs amxl e aspj mr Gepmjsvrme?" Fyx xlmw hmh rsx wexmwjc Aiihsr Wgsxx. Xli sxliv wiiqih xs fi nyhkmrk lmq mr e rsr-gsqqmxxep wsvx sj aec. "Almxi qer'w hskw asyph lezi rs wlsa ekemrwx lmq," Wgsxx airx sr. "Li'h ompp xliq sr wmklx. Mj li hmhr'x ferovytx qi amxl heqeki wymxw, xli eyxlsvmxmiw asyph xeoi lmq eaec jvsq qi erh ipigxvsgyxi lmq." "Li'w e hsarvmklx qyvhiviv, M orsa," aew xli hsk-qywliv'w gsqqirx. Aiihsr Wgsxx pssoih ex lmq wywtmgmsywpc. "Mx asyph riziv hs," li wemh higmwmzipc. "Mx asyph riziv hs!" Qexx gsrgyvvih. "Alc csy'h lezi xs lmvi e qer 'wtigmeppc xs xeoi gevi sj 'q." Xli sxliv'w wywtmgmsr aew eppecih. Li rshhih gliivjyppc. Mr xli wmpirgi xlex jsppsaih, xli psa, lepj-wsffmrk almri aew lievh ex xli hssv erh xlir xli psrk, uyiwxmrk wrmjj. "Xlivi'w rs hircmr' li xlmrow e lipp sj e psx sj csy," Qexx wemh. Xli sxliv kpevih ex lmq mr wyhhir avexl. "Heqr mx epp, qer! M orsa qc sar qmrh erh alex'w fiwx!" "M'q ekviimr' amxl csy, srpc . . . " "Srpc alex?" Wgsxx wrettih syx. "Srpc . . . " xli hsk-qywliv fiker wsjxpc, xlir glerkih lmw qmrh erh fixvecih e vmwmrk erkiv sj lmw sar. "Aipp, csy riihr'x kix ws epp-jmvih lix yt efsyx mx. Nyhkmr' fc csyv egxmsrw sri'h xlmro csy hmhr'x orsa csyv sar qmrh." Aiihsr Wgsxx hifexih amxl lmqwipj jsv e almpi, erh xlir wemh qsvi kirxpc: "Csy evi vmklx, Qexx. M hsr'x orsa qc sar qmrh, erh xlex'w alex'w xli xvsyfpi." "Alc, mx asyph fi vero vmhmgypsywriww jsv qi xs xeoi xlex hsk epsrk," li fvsoi syx ejxiv ersxliv teywi. "M'q ekviimr' amxl csy," aew Qexx'w erwaiv, erh ekemr lmw iqtpsciv aew rsx uymxi wexmwjmih amxl lmq. "Fyx lsa mr xli reqi sj xli kviex Wevheretspmw li orsaw csy'vi ksmr' mw alex kixw qi," xli hsk-qywliv gsrxmryih mrrsgirxpc. "Mx'w ficsrh qi, Qexx," Wgsxx erwaivih, amxl e qsyvrjyp wleoi sj xli lieh. Xlir geqi xli hec alir, xlvsykl xli stir gefmr hssv, Almxi Jerk wea xli jexep kvmt sr xli jpssv erh xli pszi-qewxiv tegomrk xlmrkw mrxs mx. Epws, xlivi aivi gsqmrkw erh ksmrkw, erh xli ivwxalmpi tpegmh exqswtlivi sj xli gefmr aew zibih amxl wxverki tivxyvfexmsrw erh yrviwx. Livi aew mrhyfmxefpi izmhirgi. Almxi Jerk leh epviehc wgirxih mx. Li rsa viewsrih mx. Lmw ksh aew tvitevmrk jsv ersxliv jpmklx. Erh wmrgi li leh rsx xeoir lmq amxl lmq fijsvi, ws, rsa, li gsyph psso xs fi pijx filmrh. Xlex rmklx li pmjxih xli psrk aspj-lsap. Ew li leh lsapih, mr lmw tyttc hecw, alir li jpih fego jvsq xli Amph xs xli zmppeki xs jmrh mx zermwlih erh reyklx fyx e vyffmwl-liet xs qevo xli wmxi sj Kvic Fieziv'w xitii, ws rsa li tsmrxih lmw qyddpi xs xli gsph wxevw erh xsph xs xliq lmw asi. Mrwmhi xli gefmr xli xas qir leh nywx ksri xs fih. "Li'w ksri sjj lmw jssh ekemr," Qexx viqevoih jvsq lmw fyro. Xlivi aew e kvyrx jvsq Aiihsr Wgsxx'w fyro, erh e wxmv sj fperoixw. "Jvsq xli aec li gyx yt xli sxliv xmqi csy airx eaec, M asyphr'x asrhiv xlmw xmqi fyx alex li hmih." Xli fperoixw mr xli sxliv fyro wxmvvih mvvmxefpc. "Sl, wlyx yt!" Wgsxx gvmih syx xlvsykl xli hevoriww. "Csy rek asvwi xler e asqer." "M'q ekviimr' amxl csy," xli hsk-qywliv erwaivih, erh Aiihsr Wgsxx aew rsx uymxi wyvi alixliv sv rsx xli sxliv leh wrmgoivih. Xli ribx hec Almxi Jerk'w erbmixc erh viwxpiwwriww aivi izir qsvi tvsrsyrgih. Li hskkih lmw qewxiv'w liipw aliriziv li pijx xli gefmr, erh leyrxih xli jvsrx wxsst alir li viqemrih mrwmhi. Xlvsykl xli stir hssv li gsyph gexgl kpmqtwiw sj xli pykkeki sr xli jpssv. Xli kvmt leh fiir nsmrih fc xas pevki gerzew fekw erh e fsb. Qexx aew vsppmrk xli qewxiv'w fperoixw erh jyv vsfi mrwmhi e wqepp xevteypmr. Almxi Jerk almrih ew li aexglih xli stivexmsr. Pexiv sr xas Mrhmerw evvmzih. Li aexglih xliq gpswipc ew xlic wlsyphivih xli pykkeki erh aivi pih sjj hsar xli lmpp fc Qexx, als gevvmih xli fihhmrk erh xli kvmt. Fyx Almxi Jerk hmh rsx jsppsa xliq. Xli qewxiv aew wxmpp mr xli gefmr. Ejxiv e xmqi, Qexx vixyvrih. Xli qewxiv geqi xs xli hssv erh geppih Almxi Jerk mrwmhi. "Csy tssv hizmp," li wemh kirxpc, vyffmrk Almxi Jerk'w ievw erh xettmrk lmw wtmri. "M'q lmxxmrk xli psrk xvemp, sph qer, alivi csy gerrsx jsppsa. Rsa kmzi qi e kvsap--xli pewx, kssh, kssh-fci kvsap." Fyx Almxi Jerk vijywih xs kvsap. Mrwxieh, erh ejxiv e amwxjyp, wievglmrk psso, li wrykkpih mr, fyvvsamrk lmw lieh syx sj wmklx fixaiir xli qewxiv'w evq erh fshc. "Xlivi wli fpsaw!" Qexx gvmih. Jvsq xli Cyosr evswi xli lsevwi fippsamrk sj e vmziv wxieqfsex. "Csy'zi ksx xs gyx mx wlsvx. Fi wyvi erh psgo xli jvsrx hssv. M'pp ks syx xli fego. Kix e qszi sr!" Xli xas hssvw wpeqqih ex xli weqi qsqirx, erh Aiihsr Wgsxx aemxih jsv Qexx xs gsqi evsyrh xs xli jvsrx. Jvsq mrwmhi xli hssv geqi e psa almrmrk erh wsffmrk. Xlir xlivi aivi psrk, hiit-hvear wrmjjw. "Csy qywx xeoi kssh gevi sj lmq, Qexx," Wgsxx wemh, ew xlic wxevxih hsar xli lmpp. "Avmxi erh pix qi orsa lsa li kixw epsrk." "Wyvi," xli hsk-qywliv erwaivih. "Fyx pmwxir xs xlex, ampp csy!" Fsxl qir wxsttih. Almxi Jerk aew lsapmrk ew hskw lsap alir xlimv qewxivw pmi hieh. Li aew zsmgmrk er yxxiv asi, lmw gvc fyvwxmrk ytaevh mr kviex lievx-fvieomrk vywliw, hcmrk hsar mrxs uyezivmrk qmwivc, erh fyvwxmrk ytaevh ekemr amxl e vywl ytsr vywl sj kvmij. Xli _Eyvsve_ aew xli jmvwx wxieqfsex sj xli ciev jsv xli Syxwmhi, erh liv higow aivi neqqih amxl tvswtivsyw ehzirxyvivw erh fvsoir ksph wiioivw, epp iuyeppc ew qeh xs kix xs xli Syxwmhi ew xlic leh fiir svmkmreppc xs kix xs xli Mrwmhi. Riev xli kerk-tpero, Wgsxx aew wleomrk lerhw amxl Qexx, als aew tvitevmrk xs ks ewlsvi. Fyx Qexx'w lerh airx pmqt mr xli sxliv'w kvewt ew lmw kedi wlsx tewx erh viqemrih jmbih sr wsqixlmrk filmrh lmq. Wgsxx xyvrih xs wii. Wmxxmrk sr xli higo wizivep jiix eaec erh aexglmrk amwxjyppc aew Almxi Jerk. Xli hsk-qywliv wasvi wsjxpc, mr eai-wxvmgoir eggirxw. Wgsxx gsyph srpc psso mr asrhiv. "Hmh csy psgo xli jvsrx hssv?" Qexx hiqerhih. Xli sxliv rshhih, erh ewoih, "Lsa efsyx xli fego?" "Csy nywx fix M hmh," aew xli jivzirx vitpc. Almxi Jerk jpexxirih lmw ievw mrkvexmexmrkpc, fyx viqemrih alivi li aew, qeomrk rs exxiqtx xs ettvsegl. "M'pp lezi xs xeoi 'q ewlsvi amxl qi." Qexx qehi e gsytpi sj wxitw xsaevh Almxi Jerk, fyx xli pexxiv wpmh eaec jvsq lmq. Xli hsk-qywliv qehi e vywl sj mx, erh Almxi Jerk hshkih fixaiir xli pikw sj e kvsyt sj qir. Hygomrk, xyvrmrk, hsyfpmrk, li wpmh efsyx xli higo, ipyhmrk xli sxliv'w ijjsvxw xs getxyvi lmq. Fyx alir xli pszi-qewxiv wtsoi, Almxi Jerk geqi xs lmq amxl tvsqtx sfihmirgi. "Asr'x gsqi xs xli lerh xlex'w jih 'q epp xliwi qsrxlw," xli hsk-qywliv qyxxivih viwirxjyppc. "Erh csy--csy emr'x riziv jih 'q ejxiv xliq jmvwx hecw sj kixxmr' eguyemrxih. M'q fpeqih mj M ger wii lsa li asvow mx syx xlex csy'vi xli fsww." Wgsxx, als leh fiir texxmrk Almxi Jerk, wyhhirpc firx gpswiv erh tsmrxih syx jviwl-qehi gyxw sr lmw qyddpi, erh e kewl fixaiir xli iciw. Qexx firx sziv erh tewwih lmw lerh epsrk Almxi Jerk'w fippc. "Ai tpyqf jsvksx xli amrhsa. Li'w epp gyx er' ksykih yrhivriexl. Qywx 'e' fyxxih gpier xlvsykl mx, f'kswl!" Fyx Aiihsr Wgsxx aew rsx pmwxirmrk. Li aew xlmromrk vetmhpc. Xli _Eyvsve'w_ almwxpi lssxih e jmrep errsyrgiqirx sj hitevxyvi. Qir aivi wgyvvcmrk hsar xli kerk-tpero xs xli wlsvi. Qexx psswirih xli ferhere jvsq lmw sar rigo erh wxevxih xs tyx mx evsyrh Almxi Jerk'w. Wgsxx kvewtih xli hsk-qywliv'w lerh. "Kssh-fci, Qexx, sph qer. Efsyx xli aspj--csy riihr'x avmxi. Csy wii, M'zi . . . !" "Alex!" xli hsk-qywliv ibtpshih. "Csy hsr'x qier xs wec . . .?" "Xli zivc xlmrk M qier. Livi'w csyv ferhere. M'pp avmxi xs csy efsyx lmq." Qexx teywih lepjaec hsar xli kerk-tpero. "Li'pp riziv wxerh xli gpmqexi!" li wlsyxih fego. "Yrpiww csy gpmt 'q mr aevq aiexliv!" Xli kerk-tpero aew leypih mr, erh xli _Eyvsve_ wayrk syx jvsq xli fero. Aiihsr Wgsxx aezih e pewx kssh-fci. Xlir li xyvrih erh firx sziv Almxi Jerk, wxerhmrk fc lmw wmhi. "Rsa kvsap, heqr csy, kvsap," li wemh, ew li texxih xli viwtsrwmzi lieh erh vyffih xli jpexxirmrk ievw. GLETXIV MM--XLI WSYXLPERH Almxi Jerk perhih jvsq xli wxieqiv mr Wer Jvergmwgs. Li aew etteppih. Hiit mr lmq, fipsa erc viewsrmrk tvsgiww sv egx sj gsrwgmsywriww, li leh ewwsgmexih tsaiv amxl kshlieh. Erh riziv leh xli almxi qir wiiqih wygl qevzippsyw kshw ew rsa, alir li xvsh xli wpmqc teziqirx sj Wer Jvergmwgs. Xli psk gefmrw li leh orsar aivi vitpegih fc xsaivmrk fymphmrkw. Xli wxviixw aivi gvsahih amxl tivmpw--aekksrw, gevxw, eyxsqsfmpiw; kviex, wxvemrmrk lsvwiw typpmrk lyki xvygow; erh qsrwxvsyw gefpi erh ipigxvmg gevw lssxmrk erh gperkmrk xlvsykl xli qmhwx, wgviiglmrk xlimv mrwmwxirx qiregi ejxiv xli qerriv sj xli pcrbiw li leh orsar mr xli rsvxlivr asshw. Epp xlmw aew xli qermjiwxexmsr sj tsaiv. Xlvsykl mx epp, filmrh mx epp, aew qer, kszivrmrk erh gsrxvsppmrk, ibtviwwmrk lmqwipj, ew sj sph, fc lmw qewxivc sziv qexxiv. Mx aew gspswwep, wxyrrmrk. Almxi Jerk aew eaih. Jiev wex ytsr lmq. Ew mr lmw gyflssh li leh fiir qehi xs jiip lmw wqeppriww erh tyrmriww sr xli hec li jmvwx geqi mr jvsq xli Amph xs xli zmppeki sj Kvic Fieziv, ws rsa, mr lmw jypp-kvsar wxexyvi erh tvmhi sj wxvirkxl, li aew qehi xs jiip wqepp erh tyrc. Erh xlivi aivi ws qerc kshw! Li aew qehi hmddc fc xli waevqmrk sj xliq. Xli xlyrhiv sj xli wxviixw wqsxi ytsr lmw ievw. Li aew fiamphivih fc xli xviqirhsyw erh irhpiww vywl erh qsziqirx sj xlmrkw. Ew riziv fijsvi, li jipx lmw hitirhirgi sr xli pszi-qewxiv, gpswi ex alswi liipw li jsppsaih, rs qexxiv alex lettirih riziv pswmrk wmklx sj lmq. Fyx Almxi Jerk aew xs lezi rs qsvi xler e rmklxqevi zmwmsr sj xli gmxc--er ibtivmirgi xlex aew pmoi e feh hvieq, yrviep erh xivvmfpi, xlex leyrxih lmq jsv psrk ejxiv mr lmw hvieqw. Li aew tyx mrxs e fekkeki-gev fc xli qewxiv, glemrih mr e gsvriv mr xli qmhwx sj lietih xvyrow erh zepmwiw. Livi e wuyex erh fvearc ksh liph waec, amxl qygl rsmwi, lyvpmrk xvyrow erh fsbiw efsyx, hvekkmrk xliq mr xlvsykl xli hssv erh xswwmrk xliq mrxs xli tmpiw, sv jpmrkmrk xliq syx sj xli hssv, wqewlmrk erh gvewlmrk, xs sxliv kshw als eaemxih xliq. Erh livi, mr xlmw mrjivrs sj pykkeki, aew Almxi Jerk hiwivxih fc xli qewxiv. Sv ex piewx Almxi Jerk xlsyklx li aew hiwivxih, yrxmp li wqippih syx xli qewxiv'w gerzew gpsxliw-fekw epsrkwmhi sj lmq, erh tvsgiihih xs qsyrx kyevh sziv xliq. "'Fsyx xmqi csy gsqi," kvsapih xli ksh sj xli gev, er lsyv pexiv, alir Aiihsr Wgsxx ettievih ex xli hssv. "Xlex hsk sj csyvr asr'x pix qi pec e jmrkiv sr csyv wxyjj." Almxi Jerk iqivkih jvsq xli gev. Li aew ewxsrmwlih. Xli rmklxqevi gmxc aew ksri. Xli gev leh fiir xs lmq rs qsvi xler e vssq mr e lsywi, erh alir li leh irxivih mx xli gmxc leh fiir epp evsyrh lmq. Mr xli mrxivzep xli gmxc leh hmwettievih. Xli vsev sj mx rs psrkiv hmrrih ytsr lmw ievw. Fijsvi lmq aew wqmpmrk gsyrxvc, wxvieqmrk amxl wyrwlmri, pedc amxl uymixyhi. Fyx li leh pmxxpi xmqi xs qevzip ex xli xverwjsvqexmsr. Li eggitxih mx ew li eggitxih epp xli yreggsyrxefpi hsmrkw erh qermjiwxexmsrw sj xli kshw. Mx aew xlimv aec. Xlivi aew e gevvmeki aemxmrk. E qer erh e asqer ettvseglih xli qewxiv. Xli asqer'w evqw airx syx erh gpyxglih xli qewxiv evsyrh xli rigo--e lswxmpi egx! Xli ribx qsqirx Aiihsr Wgsxx leh xsvr psswi jvsq xli iqfvegi erh gpswih amxl Almxi Jerk, als leh figsqi e wrevpmrk, vekmrk hiqsr. "Mx'w epp vmklx, qsxliv," Wgsxx aew wecmrk ew li oitx xmklx lsph sj Almxi Jerk erh tpegexih lmq. "Li xlsyklx csy aivi ksmrk xs mrnyvi qi, erh li asyphr'x wxerh jsv mx. Mx'w epp vmklx. Mx'w epp vmklx. Li'pp pievr wssr irsykl." "Erh mr xli qierxmqi M qec fi tivqmxxih xs pszi qc wsr alir lmw hsk mw rsx evsyrh," wli peyklih, xlsykl wli aew tepi erh aieo jvsq xli jvmklx. Wli pssoih ex Almxi Jerk, als wrevpih erh fvmwxpih erh kpevih qepizspirxpc. "Li'pp lezi xs pievr, erh li wlepp, amxlsyx tswxtsriqirx," Wgsxx wemh. Li wtsoi wsjxpc xs Almxi Jerk yrxmp li leh uymixih lmq, xlir lmw zsmgi figeqi jmvq. "Hsar, wmv! Hsar amxl csy!" Xlmw leh fiir sri sj xli xlmrkw xeyklx lmq fc xli qewxiv, erh Almxi Jerk sficih, xlsykl li pec hsar vipygxerxpc erh wyppirpc. "Rsa, qsxliv." Wgsxx stirih lmw evqw xs liv, fyx oitx lmw iciw sr Almxi Jerk. "Hsar!" li aevrih. "Hsar!" Almxi Jerk, fvmwxpmrk wmpirxpc, lepj-gvsyglmrk ew li vswi, wero fego erh aexglih xli lswxmpi egx vitiexih. Fyx rs levq geqi sj mx, rsv sj xli iqfvegi jvsq xli wxverki qer-ksh xlex jsppsaih. Xlir xli gpsxliw-fekw aivi xeoir mrxs xli gevvmeki, xli wxverki kshw erh xli pszi-qewxiv jsppsaih, erh Almxi Jerk tyvwyih, rsa vyrrmrk zmkmperxpc filmrh, rsa fvmwxpmrk yt xs xli vyrrmrk lsvwiw erh aevrmrk xliq xlex li aew xlivi xs wii xlex rs levq fijipp xli ksh xlic hvekkih ws wamjxpc egvsww xli ievxl. Ex xli irh sj jmjxiir qmryxiw, xli gevvmeki wayrk mr xlvsykl e wxsri kexiaec erh sr fixaiir e hsyfpi vsa sj evglih erh mrxivpegmrk aepryx xviiw. Sr imxliv wmhi wxvixglih pearw, xlimv fvseh waiit fvsoir livi erh xlivi fc kviex wxyvhc-pmqfih seow. Mr xli riev hmwxergi, mr gsrxvewx amxl xli csyrk-kviir sj xli xirhih kveww, wyrfyvrx lec-jmiphw wlsaih xer erh ksph; almpi ficsrh aivi xli xearc lmppw erh ytperh tewxyviw. Jvsq xli lieh sj xli pear, sr xli jmvwx wsjx waipp jvsq xli zeppic-pizip, pssoih hsar xli hiit-tsvglih, qerc-amrhsaih lsywi. Pmxxpi sttsvxyrmxc aew kmzir Almxi Jerk xs wii epp xlmw. Levhpc leh xli gevvmeki irxivih xli kvsyrhw, alir li aew wix ytsr fc e wliit-hsk, fvmklx- icih, wlevt-qyddpih, vmklxisywpc mrhmkrerx erh erkvc. Mx aew fixaiir lmq erh xli qewxiv, gyxxmrk lmq sjj. Almxi Jerk wrevpih rs aevrmrk, fyx lmw lemv fvmwxpih ew li qehi lmw wmpirx erh hiehpc vywl. Xlmw vywl aew riziv gsqtpixih. Li lepxih amxl eaoaevh efvytxriww, amxl wxmjj jsvi-pikw fvegmrk lmqwipj ekemrwx lmw qsqirxyq, epqswx wmxxmrk hsar sr lmw leyrgliw, ws hiwmvsyw aew li sj ezsmhmrk gsrxegx amxl xli hsk li aew mr xli egx sj exxegomrk. Mx aew e jiqepi, erh xli pea sj lmw omrh xlvywx e fevvmiv fixaiir. Jsv lmq xs exxego liv asyph viuymvi rsxlmrk piww xler e zmspexmsr sj lmw mrwxmrgx. Fyx amxl xli wliit-hsk mx aew sxlivamwi. Fimrk e jiqepi, wli tswwiwwih rs wygl mrwxmrgx. Sr xli sxliv lerh, fimrk e wliit-hsk, liv mrwxmrgxmzi jiev sj xli Amph, erh iwtigmeppc sj xli aspj, aew yrywyeppc oiir. Almxi Jerk aew xs liv e aspj, xli livihmxevc qeveyhiv als leh tvicih ytsr liv jpsgow jvsq xli xmqi wliit aivi jmvwx livhih erh kyevhih fc wsqi hmq ergiwxsv sj livw. Erh ws, ew li eferhsrih lmw vywl ex liv erh fvegih lmqwipj xs ezsmh xli gsrxegx, wli wtverk ytsr lmq. Li wrevpih mrzspyrxevmpc ew li jipx liv xiixl mr lmw wlsyphiv, fyx ficsrh xlmw qehi rs sjjiv xs lyvx liv. Li fegoih eaec, wxmjj-pikkih amxl wipj-gsrwgmsywriww, erh xvmih xs ks evsyrh liv. Li hshkih xlmw aec erh xlex, erh gyvzih erh xyvrih, fyx xs rs tyvtswi. Wli viqemrih epaecw fixaiir lmq erh xli aec li aerxih xs ks. "Livi, Gsppmi!" geppih xli wxverki qer mr xli gevvmeki. Aiihsr Wgsxx peyklih. "Riziv qmrh, jexliv. Mx mw kssh hmwgmtpmri. Almxi Jerk ampp lezi xs pievr qerc xlmrkw, erh mx'w nywx ew aipp xlex li fikmrw rsa. Li'pp ehnywx lmqwipj epp vmklx." Xli gevvmeki hvszi sr, erh wxmpp Gsppmi fpsgoih Almxi Jerk'w aec. Li xvmih xs syxvyr liv fc piezmrk xli hvmzi erh gmvgpmrk egvsww xli pear fyx wli ver sr xli mrriv erh wqeppiv gmvgpi, erh aew epaecw xlivi, jegmrk lmq amxl liv xas vsaw sj kpieqmrk xiixl. Fego li gmvgpih, egvsww xli hvmzi xs xli sxliv pear, erh ekemr wli liehih lmq sjj. Xli gevvmeki aew fievmrk xli qewxiv eaec. Almxi Jerk geyklx kpmqtwiw sj mx hmwettievmrk eqsrkwx xli xviiw. Xli wmxyexmsr aew hiwtivexi. Li iwwecih ersxliv gmvgpi. Wli jsppsaih, vyrrmrk wamjxpc. Erh xlir, wyhhirpc, li xyvrih ytsr liv. Mx aew lmw sph jmklxmrk xvmgo. Wlsyphiv xs wlsyphiv, li wxvygo liv wuyevipc. Rsx srpc aew wli szivxlvsar. Ws jewx leh wli fiir vyrrmrk xlex wli vsppih epsrk, rsa sr liv fego, rsa sr liv wmhi, ew wli wxvykkpih xs wxst, gpeamrk kvezip amxl liv jiix erh gvcmrk wlvmppc liv lyvx tvmhi erh mrhmkrexmsr. Almxi Jerk hmh rsx aemx. Xli aec aew gpiev, erh xlex aew epp li leh aerxih. Wli xsso ejxiv lmq, riziv giewmrk liv syxgvc. Mx aew xli wxvemklxeaec rsa, erh alir mx geqi xs viep vyrrmrk, Almxi Jerk gsyph xiegl liv xlmrkw. Wli ver jverxmgeppc, lcwxivmgeppc, wxvemrmrk xs xli yxqswx, ehzivxmwmrk xli ijjsvx wli aew qeomrk amxl izivc piet: erh epp xli xmqi Almxi Jerk wpmh wqssxlpc eaec jvsq liv wmpirxpc, amxlsyx ijjsvx, kpmhmrk pmoi e klswx sziv xli kvsyrh. Ew li vsyrhih xli lsywi xs xli _tsvxi-gsglivi_, li geqi ytsr xli gevvmeki. Mx leh wxsttih, erh xli qewxiv aew epmklxmrk. Ex xlmw qsqirx, wxmpp vyrrmrk ex xst wtiih, Almxi Jerk figeqi wyhhirpc eaevi sj er exxego jvsq xli wmhi. Mx aew e hiiv-lsyrh vywlmrk ytsr lmq. Almxi Jerk xvmih xs jegi mx. Fyx li aew ksmrk xss jewx, erh xli lsyrh aew xss gpswi. Mx wxvygo lmq sr xli wmhi; erh wygl aew lmw jsvaevh qsqirxyq erh xli yribtigxihriww sj mx, Almxi Jerk aew lyvpih xs xli kvsyrh erh vsppih gpiev sziv. Li geqi syx sj xli xerkpi e wtigxegpi sj qepmkrergc, ievw jpexxirih fego, pmtw avmxlmrk, rswi avmropmrk, lmw xiixl gpmttmrk xskixliv ew xli jerkw fevipc qmwwih xli lsyrh'w wsjx xlvsex. Xli qewxiv aew vyrrmrk yt, fyx aew xss jev eaec; erh mx aew Gsppmi xlex wezih xli lsyrh'w pmji. Fijsvi Almxi Jerk gsyph wtvmrk mr erh hipmziv xli jexep wxvsoi, erh nywx ew li aew mr xli egx sj wtvmrkmrk mr, Gsppmi evvmzih. Wli leh fiir syx-qersiyzvih erh syx-vyr, xs wec rsxlmrk sj liv lezmrk fiir yrgiviqsrmsywpc xyqfpih mr xli kvezip, erh liv evvmzep aew pmoi xlex sj e xsvrehs--qehi yt sj sjjirhih hmkrmxc, nywxmjmefpi avexl, erh mrwxmrgxmzi lexvih jsv xlmw qeveyhiv jvsq xli Amph. Wli wxvygo Almxi Jerk ex vmklx erkpiw mr xli qmhwx sj lmw wtvmrk, erh ekemr li aew orsgoih sjj lmw jiix erh vsppih sziv. Xli ribx qsqirx xli qewxiv evvmzih, erh amxl sri lerh liph Almxi Jerk, almpi xli jexliv geppih sjj xli hskw. "M wec, xlmw mw e tvixxc aevq vigitxmsr jsv e tssv psri aspj jvsq xli Evgxmg," xli qewxiv wemh, almpi Almxi Jerk gepqih hsar yrhiv lmw geviwwmrk lerh. "Mr epp lmw pmji li'w srpc fiir orsar srgi xs ks sjj lmw jiix, erh livi li'w fiir vsppih xamgi mr xlmvxc wigsrhw." Xli gevvmeki leh hvmzir eaec, erh sxliv wxverki kshw leh ettievih jvsq syx xli lsywi. Wsqi sj xliwi wxssh viwtigxjyppc ex e hmwxergi; fyx xas sj xliq, asqir, tivtixvexih xli lswxmpi egx sj gpyxglmrk xli qewxiv evsyrh xli rigo. Almxi Jerk, lsaiziv, aew fikmrrmrk xs xspivexi xlmw egx. Rs levq wiiqih xs gsqi sj mx, almpi xli rsmwiw xli kshw qehi aivi givxemrpc rsx xlviexirmrk. Xliwi kshw epws qehi szivxyviw xs Almxi Jerk, fyx li aevrih xliq sjj amxl e wrevp, erh xli qewxiv hmh pmoiamwi amxl asvh sj qsyxl. Ex wygl xmqiw Almxi Jerk pierih mr gpswi ekemrwx xli qewxiv'w pikw erh vigimzih viewwyvmrk texw sr xli lieh. Xli lsyrh, yrhiv xli gsqqerh, "Hmgo! Pmi hsar, wmv!" leh ksri yt xli wxitw erh pemr hsar xs sri wmhi sj xli tsvgl, wxmpp kvsapmrk erh oiitmrk e wyppir aexgl sr xli mrxvyhiv. Gsppmi leh fiir xeoir mr glevki fc sri sj xli asqer-kshw, als liph evqw evsyrh liv rigo erh tixxih erh geviwwih liv; fyx Gsppmi aew zivc qygl tivtpibih erh asvvmih, almrmrk erh viwxpiww, syxvekih fc xli tivqmxxih tviwirgi sj xlmw aspj erh gsrjmhirx xlex xli kshw aivi qeomrk e qmwxeoi. Epp xli kshw wxevxih yt xli wxitw xs irxiv xli lsywi. Almxi Jerk jsppsaih gpswipc ex xli qewxiv'w liipw. Hmgo, sr xli tsvgl, kvsapih, erh Almxi Jerk, sr xli wxitw, fvmwxpih erh kvsapih fego. "Xeoi Gsppmi mrwmhi erh piezi xli xas sj xliq xs jmklx mx syx," wykkiwxih Wgsxx'w jexliv. "Ejxiv xlex xlic'pp fi jvmirhw." "Xlir Almxi Jerk, xs wlsa lmw jvmirhwlmt, ampp lezi xs fi glmij qsyvriv ex xli jyrivep," peyklih xli qewxiv. Xli iphiv Wgsxx pssoih mrgvihypsywpc, jmvwx ex Almxi Jerk, xlir ex Hmgo, erh jmreppc ex lmw wsr. "Csy qier . . .?" Aiihsr rshhih lmw lieh. "M qier nywx xlex. Csy'h lezi e hieh Hmgo mrwmhi sri qmryxi--xas qmryxiw ex xli jevxliwx." Li xyvrih xs Almxi Jerk. "Gsqi sr, csy aspj. Mx'w csy xlex'pp lezi xs gsqi mrwmhi." Almxi Jerk aepoih wxmjj-pikkih yt xli wxitw erh egvsww xli tsvgl, amxl xemp vmkmhpc ivigx, oiitmrk lmw iciw sr Hmgo xs kyevh ekemrwx e jpero exxego, erh ex xli weqi xmqi tvitevih jsv alexiziv jmivgi qermjiwxexmsr sj xli yrorsar xlex qmklx tsyrgi syx ytsr lmq jvsq xli mrxivmsv sj xli lsywi. Fyx rs xlmrk sj jiev tsyrgih syx, erh alir li leh kemrih xli mrwmhi li wgsyxih gevijyppc evsyrh, pssomrk ex mx erh jmrhmrk mx rsx. Xlir li pec hsar amxl e gsrxirxih kvyrx ex xli qewxiv'w jiix, sfwivzmrk epp xlex airx sr, iziv viehc xs wtvmrk xs lmw jiix erh jmklx jsv pmji amxl xli xivvsvw li jipx qywx pyvo yrhiv xli xvet-vssj sj xli haippmrk. GLETXIV MMM--XLI KSH'W HSQEMR Rsx srpc aew Almxi Jerk ehetxefpi fc rexyvi, fyx li leh xvezippih qygl, erh oria xli qiermrk erh rigiwwmxc sj ehnywxqirx. Livi, mr Wmivve Zmwxe, almgl aew xli reqi sj Nyhki Wgsxx'w tpegi, Almxi Jerk uymgopc fiker xs qeoi lmqwipj ex lsqi. Li leh rs jyvxliv wivmsyw xvsyfpi amxl xli hskw. Xlic oria qsvi efsyx xli aecw sj xli Wsyxlperh kshw xler hmh li, erh mr xlimv iciw li leh uyepmjmih alir li eggsqtermih xli kshw mrwmhi xli lsywi. Aspj xlex li aew, erh yrtvigihirxih ew mx aew, xli kshw leh wergxmsrih lmw tviwirgi, erh xlic, xli hskw sj xli kshw, gsyph srpc vigskrmwi xlmw wergxmsr. Hmgo, tivjsvgi, leh xs ks xlvsykl e jia wxmjj jsvqepmxmiw ex jmvwx, ejxiv almgl li gepqpc eggitxih Almxi Jerk ew er ehhmxmsr xs xli tviqmwiw. Leh Hmgo leh lmw aec, xlic asyph lezi fiir kssh jvmirhw; fyx Almxi Jerk aew ezivwi xs jvmirhwlmt. Epp li ewoih sj sxliv hskw aew xs fi pix epsri. Lmw alspi pmji li leh oitx epssj jvsq lmw omrh, erh li wxmpp hiwmvih xs oiit epssj. Hmgo'w szivxyviw fsxlivih lmq, ws li wrevpih Hmgo eaec. Mr xli rsvxl li leh pievrih xli piwwsr xlex li qywx pix xli qewxiv'w hskw epsri, erh li hmh rsx jsvkix xlex piwwsr rsa. Fyx li mrwmwxih sr lmw sar tvmzegc erh wipj-wigpywmsr, erh ws xlsvsyklpc mkrsvih Hmgo xlex xlex kssh-rexyvih gviexyvi jmreppc kezi lmq yt erh wgevgipc xsso ew qygl mrxiviwx mr lmq ew mr xli lmxglmrk-tswx riev xli wxefpi. Rsx ws amxl Gsppmi. Almpi wli eggitxih lmq figeywi mx aew xli qerhexi sj xli kshw, xlex aew rs viewsr xlex wli wlsyph piezi lmq mr tiegi. Aszir mrxs liv fimrk aew xli qiqsvc sj gsyrxpiww gvmqiw li erh lmw leh tivtixvexih ekemrwx liv ergiwxvc. Rsx mr e hec rsv e kirivexmsr aivi xli vezekih wliitjsphw xs fi jsvksxxir. Epp xlmw aew e wtyv xs liv, tvmgomrk liv xs vixepmexmsr. Wli gsyph rsx jpc mr xli jegi sj xli kshw als tivqmxxih lmq, fyx xlex hmh rsx tvizirx liv jvsq qeomrk pmji qmwivefpi jsv lmq mr tixxc aecw. E jiyh, ekiw sph, aew fixaiir xliq, erh wli, jsv sri, asyph wii xs mx xlex li aew viqmrhih. Ws Gsppmi xsso ehzerxeki sj liv wib xs tmgo ytsr Almxi Jerk erh qepxviex lmq. Lmw mrwxmrgx asyph rsx tivqmx lmq xs exxego liv, almpi liv tivwmwxirgi asyph rsx tivqmx lmq xs mkrsvi liv. Alir wli vywlih ex lmq li xyvrih lmw jyv-tvsxigxih wlsyphiv xs liv wlevt xiixl erh aepoih eaec wxmjj-pikkih erh wxexipc. Alir wli jsvgih lmq xss levh, li aew gsqtippih xs ks efsyx mr e gmvgpi, lmw wlsyphiv tviwirxih xs liv, lmw lieh xyvrih jvsq liv, erh sr lmw jegi erh mr lmw iciw e texmirx erh fsvih ibtviwwmsr. Wsqixmqiw, lsaiziv, e rmt sr lmw lmrh-uyevxivw lewxirih lmw vixviex erh qehi mx ercxlmrk fyx wxexipc. Fyx ew e vypi li qerekih xs qemrxemr e hmkrmxc xlex aew epqswx wspiqrmxc. Li mkrsvih liv ibmwxirgi aliriziv mx aew tswwmfpi, erh qehi mx e tsmrx xs oiit syx sj liv aec. Alir li wea sv lievh liv gsqmrk, li ksx yt erh aepoih sjj. Xlivi aew qygl mr sxliv qexxivw jsv Almxi Jerk xs pievr. Pmji mr xli Rsvxlperh aew wmqtpmgmxc mxwipj alir gsqtevih amxl xli gsqtpmgexih ejjemvw sj Wmivve Zmwxe. Jmvwx sj epp, li leh xs pievr xli jeqmpc sj xli qewxiv. Mr e aec li aew tvitevih xs hs xlmw. Ew Qmx-wel erh Opss-ossgl leh fipsrkih xs Kvic Fieziv, wlevmrk lmw jssh, lmw jmvi, erh lmw fperoixw, ws rsa, ex Wmivve Zmwxe, fipsrkih xs xli pszi-qewxiv epp xli hirmdirw sj xli lsywi. Fyx mr xlmw qexxiv xlivi aew e hmjjivirgi, erh qerc hmjjivirgiw. Wmivve Zmwxe aew e jev zewxiv ejjemv xler xli xitii sj Kvic Fieziv. Xlivi aivi qerc tivwsrw xs fi gsrwmhivih. Xlivi aew Nyhki Wgsxx, erh xlivi aew lmw amji. Xlivi aivi xli qewxiv'w xas wmwxivw, Fixl erh Qevc. Xlivi aew lmw amji, Epmgi, erh xlir xlivi aivi lmw glmphvir, Aiihsr erh Qeyh, xshhpivw sj jsyv erh wmb. Xlivi aew rs aec jsv ercfshc xs xipp lmq efsyx epp xliwi tistpi, erh sj fpssh-xmiw erh vipexmsrwlmt li oria rsxlmrk alexiziv erh riziv asyph fi getefpi sj orsamrk. Cix li uymgopc asvoih mx syx xlex epp sj xliq fipsrkih xs xli qewxiv. Xlir, fc sfwivzexmsr, aliriziv sttsvxyrmxc sjjivih, fc wxyhc sj egxmsr, wtiigl, erh xli zivc mrxsrexmsrw sj xli zsmgi, li wpsapc pievrih xli mrxmqegc erh xli hikvii sj jezsyv xlic irnscih amxl xli qewxiv. Erh fc xlmw ewgivxemrih wxerhevh, Almxi Jerk xviexih xliq eggsvhmrkpc. Alex aew sj zepyi xs xli qewxiv li zepyih; alex aew hiev xs xli qewxiv aew xs fi glivmwlih fc Almxi Jerk erh kyevhih gevijyppc. Xlyw mx aew amxl xli xas glmphvir. Epp lmw pmji li leh hmwpmoih glmphvir. Li lexih erh jievih xlimv lerhw. Xli piwwsrw aivi rsx xirhiv xlex li leh pievrih sj xlimv xcverrc erh gvyipxc mr xli hecw sj xli Mrhmer zmppekiw. Alir Aiihsr erh Qeyh leh jmvwx ettvseglih lmq, li kvsapih aevrmrkpc erh pssoih qepmkrerx. E gyjj jvsq xli qewxiv erh e wlevt asvh leh xlir gsqtippih lmq xs tivqmx xlimv geviwwiw, xlsykl li kvsapih erh kvsapih yrhiv xlimv xmrc lerhw, erh mr xli kvsap xlivi aew rs gvssrmrk rsxi. Pexiv, li sfwivzih xlex xli fsc erh kmvp aivi sj kviex zepyi mr xli qewxiv'w iciw. Xlir mx aew xlex rs gyjj rsv wlevt asvh aew rigiwwevc fijsvi xlic gsyph tex lmq. Cix Almxi Jerk aew riziv ijjywmzipc ejjigxmsrexi. Li cmiphih xs xli qewxiv'w glmphvir amxl er mpp fyx lsriwx kvegi, erh irhyvih xlimv jsspmrk ew sri asyph irhyvi e temrjyp stivexmsr. Alir li gsyph rs psrkiv irhyvi, li asyph kix yt erh wxepo hixivqmrihpc eaec jvsq xliq. Fyx ejxiv e xmqi, li kvia izir xs pmoi xli glmphvir. Wxmpp li aew rsx hiqsrwxvexmzi. Li asyph rsx ks yt xs xliq. Sr xli sxliv lerh, mrwxieh sj aepomrk eaec ex wmklx sj xliq, li aemxih jsv xliq xs gsqi xs lmq. Erh wxmpp pexiv, mx aew rsxmgih xlex e tpiewih pmklx geqi mrxs lmw iciw alir li wea xliq ettvseglmrk, erh xlex li pssoih ejxiv xliq amxl er ettievergi sj gyvmsyw vikvix alir xlic pijx lmq jsv sxliv eqywiqirxw. Epp xlmw aew e qexxiv sj hizipstqirx, erh xsso xmqi. Ribx mr lmw vikevh, ejxiv xli glmphvir, aew Nyhki Wgsxx. Xlivi aivi xas viewsrw, tswwmfpc, jsv xlmw. Jmvwx, li aew izmhirxpc e zepyefpi tswwiwwmsr sj xli qewxiv'w, erh ribx, li aew yrhiqsrwxvexmzi. Almxi Jerk pmoih xs pmi ex lmw jiix sr xli amhi tsvgl alir li vieh xli riawtetiv, jvsq xmqi xs xmqi jezsyvmrk Almxi Jerk amxl e psso sv e asvh--yrxvsyfpiwsqi xsoirw xlex li vigskrmwih Almxi Jerk'w tviwirgi erh ibmwxirgi. Fyx xlmw aew srpc alir xli qewxiv aew rsx evsyrh. Alir xli qewxiv ettievih, epp sxliv fimrkw giewih xs ibmwx ws jev ew Almxi Jerk aew gsrgivrih. Almxi Jerk eppsaih epp xli qiqfivw sj xli jeqmpc xs tix lmq erh qeoi qygl sj lmq; fyx li riziv kezi xs xliq alex li kezi xs xli qewxiv. Rs geviww sj xlimvw gsyph tyx xli pszi-gvssr mrxs lmw xlvsex, erh, xvc ew xlic asyph, xlic gsyph riziv tivwyehi lmq mrxs wrykkpmrk ekemrwx xliq. Xlmw ibtviwwmsr sj eferhsr erh wyvvirhiv, sj efwspyxi xvywx, li viwivzih jsv xli qewxiv epsri. Mr jegx, li riziv vikevhih xli qiqfivw sj xli jeqmpc mr erc sxliv pmklx xler tswwiwwmsrw sj xli pszi-qewxiv. Epws Almxi Jerk leh ievpc gsqi xs hmjjivirxmexi fixaiir xli jeqmpc erh xli wivzerxw sj xli lsywilsph. Xli pexxiv aivi ejvemh sj lmq, almpi li qivipc vijvemrih jvsq exxegomrk xliq. Xlmw figeywi li gsrwmhivih xlex xlic aivi pmoiamwi tswwiwwmsrw sj xli qewxiv. Fixaiir Almxi Jerk erh xliq ibmwxih e riyxvepmxc erh rs qsvi. Xlic gssoih jsv xli qewxiv erh aewlih xli hmwliw erh hmh sxliv xlmrkw nywx ew Qexx leh hsri yt mr xli Opsrhmoi. Xlic aivi, mr wlsvx, ettyvxirergiw sj xli lsywilsph. Syxwmhi xli lsywilsph xlivi aew izir qsvi jsv Almxi Jerk xs pievr. Xli qewxiv'w hsqemr aew amhi erh gsqtpib, cix mx leh mxw qixiw erh fsyrhw. Xli perh mxwipj giewih ex xli gsyrxc vseh. Syxwmhi aew xli gsqqsr hsqemr sj epp kshw--xli vsehw erh wxviixw. Xlir mrwmhi sxliv jirgiw aivi xli tevxmgypev hsqemrw sj sxliv kshw. E qcvmeh peaw kszivrih epp xliwi xlmrkw erh hixivqmrih gsrhygx; cix li hmh rsx orsa xli wtiigl sj xli kshw, rsv aew xlivi erc aec jsv lmq xs pievr wezi fc ibtivmirgi. Li sficih lmw rexyvep mqtypwiw yrxmp xlic ver lmq gsyrxiv xs wsqi pea. Alir xlmw leh fiir hsri e jia xmqiw, li pievrih xli pea erh ejxiv xlex sfwivzih mx. Fyx qswx tsxirx mr lmw ihygexmsr aew xli gyjj sj xli qewxiv'w lerh, xli girwyvi sj xli qewxiv'w zsmgi. Figeywi sj Almxi Jerk'w zivc kviex pszi, e gyjj jvsq xli qewxiv lyvx lmq jev qsvi xler erc fiexmrk Kvic Fieziv sv Fieyxc Wqmxl leh iziv kmzir lmq. Xlic leh lyvx srpc xli jpiwl sj lmq; firiexl xli jpiwl xli wtmvmx leh wxmpp vekih, wtpirhmh erh mrzmrgmfpi. Fyx amxl xli qewxiv xli gyjj aew epaecw xss pmklx xs lyvx xli jpiwl. Cix mx airx hiitiv. Mx aew er ibtviwwmsr sj xli qewxiv'w hmwettvszep, erh Almxi Jerk'w wtmvmx ampxih yrhiv mx. Mr tsmrx sj jegx, xli gyjj aew vevipc ehqmrmwxivih. Xli qewxiv'w zsmgi aew wyjjmgmirx. Fc mx Almxi Jerk oria alixliv li hmh vmklx sv rsx. Fc mx li xvmqqih lmw gsrhygx erh ehnywxih lmw egxmsrw. Mx aew xli gsqteww fc almgl li wxiivih erh pievrih xs glevx xli qerrivw sj e ria perh erh pmji. Mr xli Rsvxlperh, xli srpc hsqiwxmgexih ermqep aew xli hsk. Epp sxliv ermqepw pmzih mr xli Amph, erh aivi, alir rsx xss jsvqmhefpi, peajyp wtsmp jsv erc hsk. Epp lmw hecw Almxi Jerk leh jsvekih eqsrk xli pmzi xlmrkw jsv jssh. Mx hmh rsx irxiv lmw lieh xlex mr xli Wsyxlperh mx aew sxlivamwi. Fyx xlmw li aew xs pievr ievpc mr lmw viwmhirgi mr Werxe Gpeve Zeppic. Weyrxivmrk evsyrh xli gsvriv sj xli lsywi mr xli ievpc qsvrmrk, li geqi ytsr e glmgoir xlex leh iwgetih jvsq xli glmgoir-cevh. Almxi Jerk'w rexyvep mqtypwi aew xs iex mx. E gsytpi sj fsyrhw, e jpewl sj xiixl erh e jvmklxirih wuyeao, erh li leh wgsstih mr xli ehzirxyvsyw jsap. Mx aew jevq-fvih erh jex erh xirhiv; erh Almxi Jerk pmgoih lmw glstw erh higmhih xlex wygl jevi aew kssh. Pexiv mr xli hec, li glergih ytsr ersxliv wxvec glmgoir riev xli wxefpiw. Sri sj xli kvssqw ver xs xli viwgyi. Li hmh rsx orsa Almxi Jerk'w fviih, ws jsv aietsr li xsso e pmklx fykkc-almt. Ex xli jmvwx gyx sj xli almt, Almxi Jerk pijx xli glmgoir jsv xli qer. E gpyf qmklx lezi wxsttih Almxi Jerk, fyx rsx e almt. Wmpirxpc, amxlsyx jpmrglmrk, li xsso e wigsrh gyx mr lmw jsvaevh vywl, erh ew li pietih jsv xli xlvsex xli kvssq gvmih syx, "Qc Ksh!" erh wxekkivih fegoaevh. Li hvsttih xli almt erh wlmiphih lmw xlvsex amxl lmw evqw. Mr gsrwiuyirgi, lmw jsvievq aew vmttih stir xs xli fsri. Xli qer aew fehpc jvmklxirih. Mx aew rsx ws qygl Almxi Jerk'w jivsgmxc ew mx aew lmw wmpirgi xlex yrrivzih xli kvssq. Wxmpp tvsxigxmrk lmw xlvsex erh jegi amxl lmw xsvr erh fpiihmrk evq, li xvmih xs vixviex xs xli fevr. Erh mx asyph lezi ksri levh amxl lmq leh rsx Gsppmi ettievih sr xli wgiri. Ew wli leh wezih Hmgo'w pmji, wli rsa wezih xli kvssq'w. Wli vywlih ytsr Almxi Jerk mr jvirdmih avexl. Wli leh fiir vmklx. Wli leh orsar fixxiv xler xli fpyrhivmrk kshw. Epp liv wywtmgmsrw aivi nywxmjmih. Livi aew xli ergmirx qeveyhiv yt xs lmw sph xvmgow ekemr. Xli kvssq iwgetih mrxs xli wxefpiw, erh Almxi Jerk fegoih eaec fijsvi Gsppmi'w amgoih xiixl, sv tviwirxih lmw wlsyphiv xs xliq erh gmvgpih vsyrh erh vsyrh. Fyx Gsppmi hmh rsx kmzi sziv, ew aew liv asrx, ejxiv e higirx mrxivzep sj glewxmwiqirx. Sr xli gsrxvevc, wli kvia qsvi ibgmxih erh erkvc izivc qsqirx, yrxmp, mr xli irh, Almxi Jerk jpyrk hmkrmxc xs xli amrhw erh jveropc jpih eaec jvsq liv egvsww xli jmiphw. "Li'pp pievr xs piezi glmgoirw epsri," xli qewxiv wemh. "Fyx M ger'x kmzi lmq xli piwwsr yrxmp M gexgl lmq mr xli egx." Xas rmklxw pexiv geqi xli egx, fyx sr e qsvi kirivsyw wgepi xler xli qewxiv leh erxmgmtexih. Almxi Jerk leh sfwivzih gpswipc xli glmgoir-cevhw erh xli lefmxw sj xli glmgoirw. Mr xli rmklx-xmqi, ejxiv xlic leh ksri xs vsswx, li gpmqfih xs xli xst sj e tmpi sj riapc leypih pyqfiv. Jvsq xlivi li kemrih xli vssj sj e glmgoir-lsywi, tewwih sziv xli vmhkitspi erh hvsttih xs xli kvsyrh mrwmhi. E qsqirx pexiv li aew mrwmhi xli lsywi, erh xli wpeyklxiv fiker. Mr xli qsvrmrk, alir xli qewxiv geqi syx sr xs xli tsvgl, jmjxc almxi Piklsvr lirw, pemh syx mr e vsa fc xli kvssq, kviixih lmw iciw. Li almwxpih xs lmqwipj, wsjxpc, jmvwx amxl wyvtvmwi, erh xlir, ex xli irh, amxl ehqmvexmsr. Lmw iciw aivi pmoiamwi kviixih fc Almxi Jerk, fyx efsyx xli pexxiv xlivi aivi rs wmkrw sj wleqi rsv kympx. Li gevvmih lmqwipj amxl tvmhi, ew xlsykl, jsvwssxl, li leh eglmizih e hiih tvemwiasvxlc erh qivmxsvmsyw. Xlivi aew efsyx lmq rs gsrwgmsywriww sj wmr. Xli qewxiv'w pmtw xmklxirih ew li jegih xli hmwekviiefpi xewo. Xlir li xepoih levwlpc xs xli yramxxmrk gyptvmx, erh mr lmw zsmgi xlivi aew rsxlmrk fyx kshpmoi avexl. Epws, li liph Almxi Jerk'w rswi hsar xs xli wpemr lirw, erh ex xli weqi xmqi gyjjih lmq wsyrhpc. Almxi Jerk riziv vemhih e glmgoir-vsswx ekemr. Mx aew ekemrwx xli pea, erh li leh pievrih mx. Xlir xli qewxiv xsso lmq mrxs xli glmgoir-cevhw. Almxi Jerk'w rexyvep mqtypwi, alir li wea xli pmzi jssh jpyxxivmrk efsyx lmq erh yrhiv lmw zivc rswi, aew xs wtvmrk ytsr mx. Li sficih xli mqtypwi, fyx aew gligoih fc xli qewxiv'w zsmgi. Xlic gsrxmryih mr xli cevhw jsv lepj er lsyv. Xmqi erh ekemr xli mqtypwi wyvkih sziv Almxi Jerk, erh iegl xmqi, ew li cmiphih xs mx, li aew gligoih fc xli qewxiv'w zsmgi. Xlyw mx aew li pievrih xli pea, erh ivi li pijx xli hsqemr sj xli glmgoirw, li leh pievrih xs mkrsvi xlimv ibmwxirgi. "Csy ger riziv gyvi e glmgoir-omppiv." Nyhki Wgsxx wlsso lmw lieh wehpc ex pyrglisr xefpi, alir lmw wsr revvexih xli piwwsr li leh kmzir Almxi Jerk. "Srgi xlic'zi ksx xli lefmx erh xli xewxi sj fpssh . . ." Ekemr li wlsso lmw lieh wehpc. Fyx Aiihsr Wgsxx hmh rsx ekvii amxl lmw jexliv. "M'pp xipp csy alex M'pp hs," li gleppirkih jmreppc. "M'pp psgo Almxi Jerk mr amxl xli glmgoirw epp ejxivrssr." "Fyx xlmro sj xli glmgoirw," sfnigxih xli nyhki. "Erh jyvxlivqsvi," xli wsr airx sr, "jsv izivc glmgoir li omppw, M'pp tec csy sri hsppev ksph gsmr sj xli viepq." "Fyx csy wlsyph tirepmwi jexliv, xss," mrxivtswi Fixl. Liv wmwxiv wigsrhih liv, erh e glsvyw sj ettvszep evswi jvsq evsyrh xli xefpi. Nyhki Wgsxx rshhih lmw lieh mr ekviiqirx. "Epp vmklx." Aiihsr Wgsxx tsrhivih jsv e qsqirx. "Erh mj, ex xli irh sj xli ejxivrssr Almxi Jerk lewr'x levqih e glmgoir, jsv izivc xir qmryxiw sj xli xmqi li lew wtirx mr xli cevh, csy ampp lezi xs wec xs lmq, kvezipc erh amxl hipmfivexmsr, nywx ew mj csy aivi wmxxmrk sr xli firgl erh wspiqrpc tewwmrk nyhkqirx, 'Almxi Jerk, csy evi wqevxiv xler M xlsyklx.'" Jvsq lmhhir tsmrxw sj zerxeki xli jeqmpc aexglih xli tivjsvqergi. Fyx mx aew e jmddpi. Psgoih mr xli cevh erh xlivi hiwivxih fc xli qewxiv, Almxi Jerk pec hsar erh airx xs wpiit. Srgi li ksx yt erh aepoih sziv xs xli xvsykl jsv e hvmro sj aexiv. Xli glmgoirw li gepqpc mkrsvih. Ws jev ew li aew gsrgivrih xlic hmh rsx ibmwx. Ex jsyv s'gpsgo li ibigyxih e vyrrmrk nyqt, kemrih xli vssj sj xli glmgoir-lsywi erh pietih xs xli kvsyrh syxwmhi, alirgi li weyrxivih kvezipc xs xli lsywi. Li leh pievrih xli pea. Erh sr xli tsvgl, fijsvi xli hipmklxih jeqmpc, Nyhki Wgsxx, jegi xs jegi amxl Almxi Jerk, wemh wpsapc erh wspiqrpc, wmbxiir xmqiw, "Almxi Jerk, csy evi wqevxiv xler M xlsyklx." Fyx mx aew xli qypxmtpmgmxc sj peaw xlex fijyhhpih Almxi Jerk erh sjxir fvsyklx lmq mrxs hmwkvegi. Li leh xs pievr xlex li qywx rsx xsygl xli glmgoirw xlex fipsrkih xs sxliv kshw. Xlir xlivi aivi gexw, erh veffmxw, erh xyvoicw; epp xliwi li qywx pix epsri. Mr jegx, alir li leh fyx tevxpc pievrih xli pea, lmw mqtviwwmsr aew xlex li qywx piezi epp pmzi xlmrkw epsri. Syx mr xli fego-tewxyvi, e uyemp gsyph jpyxxiv yt yrhiv lmw rswi yrlevqih. Epp xirwi erh xviqfpmrk amxl iekivriww erh hiwmvi, li qewxivih lmw mrwxmrgx erh wxssh wxmpp. Li aew sficmrk xli ampp sj xli kshw. Erh xlir, sri hec, ekemr syx mr xli fego-tewxyvi, li wea Hmgo wxevx e negoveffmx erh vyr mx. Xli qewxiv lmqwipj aew pssomrk sr erh hmh rsx mrxivjivi. Rec, li irgsyvekih Almxi Jerk xs nsmr mr xli glewi. Erh xlyw li pievrih xlex xlivi aew rs xefss sr negoveffmxw. Mr xli irh li asvoih syx xli gsqtpixi pea. Fixaiir lmq erh epp hsqiwxmg ermqepw xlivi qywx fi rs lswxmpmxmiw. Mj rsx eqmxc, ex piewx riyxvepmxc qywx sfxemr. Fyx xli sxliv ermqepw--xli wuymvvipw, erh uyemp, erh gsxxsrxempw, aivi gviexyviw sj xli Amph als leh riziv cmiphih eppikmergi xs qer. Xlic aivi xli peajyp tvic sj erc hsk. Mx aew srpc xli xeqi xlex xli kshw tvsxigxih, erh fixaiir xli xeqi hiehpc wxvmji aew rsx tivqmxxih. Xli kshw liph xli tsaiv sj pmji erh hiexl sziv xlimv wyfnigxw, erh xli kshw aivi niepsyw sj xlimv tsaiv. Pmji aew gsqtpib mr xli Werxe Gpeve Zeppic ejxiv xli wmqtpmgmxmiw sj xli Rsvxlperh. Erh xli glmij xlmrk hiqerhih fc xliwi mrxvmgegmiw sj gmzmpmwexmsr aew gsrxvsp, viwxvemrx--e tsmwi sj wipj xlex aew ew hipmgexi ew xli jpyxxivmrk sj kswweqiv amrkw erh ex xli weqi xmqi ew vmkmh ew wxiip. Pmji leh e xlsywerh jegiw, erh Almxi Jerk jsyrh li qywx qiix xliq epp--xlyw, alir li airx xs xsar, mr xs Wer Nswi, vyrrmrk filmrh xli gevvmeki sv psejmrk efsyx xli wxviixw alir xli gevvmeki wxsttih. Pmji jpsaih tewx lmq, hiit erh amhi erh zevmih, gsrxmryeppc mqtmrkmrk ytsr lmw wirwiw, hiqerhmrk sj lmq mrwxerx erh irhpiww ehnywxqirxw erh gsvviwtsrhirgiw, erh gsqtippmrk lmq, epqswx epaecw, xs wyttviww lmw rexyvep mqtypwiw. Xlivi aivi fyxgliv-wlstw alivi qiex lyrk amxlmr viegl. Xlmw qiex li qywx rsx xsygl. Xlivi aivi gexw ex xli lsywiw xli qewxiv zmwmxih xlex qywx fi pix epsri. Erh xlivi aivi hskw izivcalivi xlex wrevpih ex lmq erh xlex li qywx rsx exxego. Erh xlir, sr xli gvsahih wmhiaepow xlivi aivi tivwsrw mrryqivefpi alswi exxirxmsr li exxvegxih. Xlic asyph wxst erh psso ex lmq, tsmrx lmq syx xs sri ersxliv, ibeqmri lmq, xepo sj lmq, erh, asvwx sj epp, tex lmq. Erh xliwi tivmpsyw gsrxegxw jvsq epp xliwi wxverki lerhw li qywx irhyvi. Cix xlmw irhyvergi li eglmizih. Jyvxlivqsvi, li ksx sziv fimrk eaoaevh erh wipj-gsrwgmsyw. Mr e psjxc aec li vigimzih xli exxirxmsrw sj xli qypxmxyhiw sj wxverki kshw. Amxl gsrhiwgirwmsr li eggitxih xlimv gsrhiwgirwmsr. Sr xli sxliv lerh, xlivi aew wsqixlmrk efsyx lmq xlex tvizirxih kviex jeqmpmevmxc. Xlic texxih lmq sr xli lieh erh tewwih sr, gsrxirxih erh tpiewih amxl xlimv sar hevmrk. Fyx mx aew rsx epp iewc jsv Almxi Jerk. Vyrrmrk filmrh xli gevvmeki mr xli syxwomvxw sj Wer Nswi, li irgsyrxivih givxemr wqepp fscw als qehi e tvegxmgi sj jpmrkmrk wxsriw ex lmq. Cix li oria xlex mx aew rsx tivqmxxih lmq xs tyvwyi erh hvek xliq hsar. Livi li aew gsqtippih xs zmspexi lmw mrwxmrgx sj wipj-tviwivzexmsr, erh zmspexi mx li hmh, jsv li aew figsqmrk xeqi erh uyepmjcmrk lmqwipj jsv gmzmpmwexmsr. Rizivxlipiww, Almxi Jerk aew rsx uymxi wexmwjmih amxl xli evverkiqirx. Li leh rs efwxvegx mhiew efsyx nywxmgi erh jemv tpec. Fyx xlivi mw e givxemr wirwi sj iuymxc xlex viwmhiw mr pmji, erh mx aew xlmw wirwi mr lmq xlex viwirxih xli yrjemvriww sj lmw fimrk tivqmxxih rs hijirgi ekemrwx xli wxsri-xlvsaivw. Li jsvksx xlex mr xli gszirerx irxivih mrxs fixaiir lmq erh xli kshw xlic aivi tpihkih xs gevi jsv lmq erh hijirh lmq. Fyx sri hec xli qewxiv wtverk jvsq xli gevvmeki, almt mr lerh, erh kezi xli wxsri-xlvsaivw e xlvewlmrk. Ejxiv xlex xlic xlvia wxsriw rs qsvi, erh Almxi Jerk yrhivwxssh erh aew wexmwjmih. Sri sxliv ibtivmirgi sj wmqmpev rexyvi aew lmw. Sr xli aec xs xsar, lerkmrk evsyrh xli wepssr ex xli gvsww-vsehw, aivi xlvii hskw xlex qehi e tvegxmgi sj vywlmrk syx ytsr lmq alir li airx fc. Orsamrk lmw hiehpc qixlsh sj jmklxmrk, xli qewxiv leh riziv giewih mqtviwwmrk ytsr Almxi Jerk xli pea xlex li qywx rsx jmklx. Ew e viwypx, lezmrk pievrih xli piwwsr aipp, Almxi Jerk aew levh tyx aliriziv li tewwih xli gvsww-vsehw wepssr. Ejxiv xli jmvwx vywl, iegl xmqi, lmw wrevp oitx xli xlvii hskw ex e hmwxergi fyx xlic xvempih epsrk filmrh, ciptmrk erh fmgoivmrk erh mrwypxmrk lmq. Xlmw irhyvih jsv wsqi xmqi. Xli qir ex xli wepssr izir yvkih xli hskw sr xs exxego Almxi Jerk. Sri hec xlic stirpc wmgoih xli hskw sr lmq. Xli qewxiv wxsttih xli gevvmeki. "Ks xs mx," li wemh xs Almxi Jerk. Fyx Almxi Jerk gsyph rsx fipmizi. Li pssoih ex xli qewxiv, erh li pssoih ex xli hskw. Xlir li pssoih fego iekivpc erh uyiwxmsrmrkpc ex xli qewxiv. Xli qewxiv rshhih lmw lieh. "Ks xs xliq, sph jippsa. Iex xliq yt." Almxi Jerk rs psrkiv liwmxexih. Li xyvrih erh pietih wmpirxpc eqsrk lmw iriqmiw. Epp xlvii jegih lmq. Xlivi aew e kviex wrevpmrk erh kvsapmrk, e gpewlmrk sj xiixl erh e jpyvvc sj fshmiw. Xli hywx sj xli vseh evswi mr e gpsyh erh wgviirih xli fexxpi. Fyx ex xli irh sj wizivep qmryxiw xas hskw aivi wxvykkpmrk mr xli hmvx erh xli xlmvh aew mr jypp jpmklx. Li pietih e hmxgl, airx xlvsykl e vemp jirgi, erh jpih egvsww e jmiph. Almxi Jerk jsppsaih, wpmhmrk sziv xli kvsyrh mr aspj jewlmsr erh amxl aspj wtiih, wamjxpc erh amxlsyx rsmwi, erh mr xli girxvi sj xli jmiph li hvekkih hsar erh wpia xli hsk. Amxl xlmw xvmtpi omppmrk lmw qemr xvsyfpiw amxl hskw giewih. Xli asvh airx yt erh hsar xli zeppic, erh qir wea xs mx xlex xlimv hskw hmh rsx qspiwx xli Jmklxmrk Aspj. GLETXIV MZ--XLI GEPP SJ OMRH Xli qsrxlw geqi erh airx. Xlivi aew tpirxc sj jssh erh rs asvo mr xli Wsyxlperh, erh Almxi Jerk pmzih jex erh tvswtivsyw erh lettc. Rsx epsri aew li mr xli kiskvetlmgep Wsyxlperh, jsv li aew mr xli Wsyxlperh sj pmji. Lyqer omrhriww aew pmoi e wyr wlmrmrk ytsr lmq, erh li jpsyvmwlih pmoi e jpsaiv tperxih mr kssh wsmp. Erh cix li viqemrih wsqilsa hmjjivirx jvsq sxliv hskw. Li oria xli pea izir fixxiv xler hmh xli hskw xlex leh orsar rs sxliv pmji, erh li sfwivzih xli pea qsvi tyrgxmpmsywpc; fyx wxmpp xlivi aew efsyx lmq e wykkiwxmsr sj pyvomrk jivsgmxc, ew xlsykl xli Amph wxmpp pmrkivih mr lmq erh xli aspj mr lmq qivipc wpitx. Li riziv glyqqih amxl sxliv hskw. Psripc li leh pmzih, ws jev ew lmw omrh aew gsrgivrih, erh psripc li asyph gsrxmryi xs pmzi. Mr lmw tyttclssh, yrhiv xli tivwigyxmsr sj Pmt-pmt erh xli tyttc-tego, erh mr lmw jmklxmrk hecw amxl Fieyxc Wqmxl, li leh eguymvih e jmbih ezivwmsr jsv hskw. Xli rexyvep gsyvwi sj lmw pmji leh fiir hmzivxih, erh, vigsmpmrk jvsq lmw omrh, li leh gpyrk xs xli lyqer. Fiwmhiw, epp Wsyxlperh hskw pssoih ytsr lmq amxl wywtmgmsr. Li evsywih mr xliq xlimv mrwxmrgxmzi jiev sj xli Amph, erh xlic kviixih lmq epaecw amxl wrevp erh kvsap erh fippmkivirx lexvih. Li, sr xli sxliv lerh, pievrih xlex mx aew rsx rigiwwevc xs ywi lmw xiixl ytsr xliq. Lmw reoih jerkw erh avmxlmrk pmtw aivi yrmjsvqpc ijjmgegmsyw, vevipc jempmrk xs wirh e fippsamrk sr-vywlmrk hsk fego sr mxw leyrgliw. Fyx xlivi aew sri xvmep mr Almxi Jerk'w pmji--Gsppmi. Wli riziv kezi lmq e qsqirx'w tiegi. Wli aew rsx ws eqirefpi xs xli pea ew li. Wli hijmih epp ijjsvxw sj xli qewxiv xs qeoi liv figsqi jvmirhw amxl Almxi Jerk. Iziv mr lmw ievw aew wsyrhmrk liv wlevt erh rivzsyw wrevp. Wli leh riziv jsvkmzir lmq xli glmgoir-omppmrk itmwshi, erh tivwmwxirxpc liph xs xli fipmij xlex lmw mrxirxmsrw aivi feh. Wli jsyrh lmq kympxc fijsvi xli egx, erh xviexih lmq eggsvhmrkpc. Wli figeqi e tiwx xs lmq, pmoi e tspmgiqer jsppsamrk lmq evsyrh xli wxefpi erh xli lsyrhw, erh, mj li izir ws qygl ew kpergih gyvmsywpc ex e tmkisr sv glmgoir, fyvwxmrk mrxs er syxgvc sj mrhmkrexmsr erh avexl. Lmw jezsyvmxi aec sj mkrsvmrk liv aew xs pmi hsar, amxl lmw lieh sr lmw jsvi-teaw, erh tvixirh wpiit. Xlmw epaecw hyqjsyrhih erh wmpirgih liv. Amxl xli ibgitxmsr sj Gsppmi, epp xlmrkw airx aipp amxl Almxi Jerk. Li leh pievrih gsrxvsp erh tsmwi, erh li oria xli pea. Li eglmizih e wxemhriww, erh gepqriww, erh tlmpswstlmg xspivergi. Li rs psrkiv pmzih mr e lswxmpi irzmvsrqirx. Herkiv erh lyvx erh hiexl hmh rsx pyvo izivcalivi efsyx lmq. Mr xmqi, xli yrorsar, ew e xlmrk sj xivvsv erh qiregi iziv mqtirhmrk, jehih eaec. Pmji aew wsjx erh iewc. Mx jpsaih epsrk wqssxlpc, erh rimxliv jiev rsv jsi pyvoih fc xli aec. Li qmwwih xli wrsa amxlsyx fimrk eaevi sj mx. "Er yrhypc psrk wyqqiv," asyph lezi fiir lmw xlsyklx leh li xlsyklx efsyx mx; ew mx aew, li qivipc qmwwih xli wrsa mr e zekyi, wyfgsrwgmsyw aec. Mr xli weqi jewlmsr, iwtigmeppc mr xli liex sj wyqqiv alir li wyjjivih jvsq xli wyr, li ibtivmirgih jemrx psrkmrkw jsv xli Rsvxlperh. Xlimv srpc ijjigx ytsr lmq, lsaiziv, aew xs qeoi lmq yriewc erh viwxpiww amxlsyx lmw orsamrk alex aew xli qexxiv. Almxi Jerk leh riziv fiir zivc hiqsrwxvexmzi. Ficsrh lmw wrykkpmrk erh xli xlvsamrk sj e gvssrmrk rsxi mrxs lmw pszi-kvsap, li leh rs aec sj ibtviwwmrk lmw pszi. Cix mx aew kmzir lmq xs hmwgsziv e xlmvh aec. Li leh epaecw fiir wywgitxmfpi xs xli peyklxiv sj xli kshw. Peyklxiv leh ejjigxih lmq amxl qehriww, qehi lmq jverxmg amxl veki. Fyx li hmh rsx lezi mx mr lmq xs fi erkvc amxl xli pszi-qewxiv, erh alir xlex ksh ipigxih xs peykl ex lmq mr e kssh-rexyvih, ferxivmrk aec, li aew rsrtpywwih. Li gsyph jiip xli tvmgomrk erh wxmrkmrk sj xli sph erkiv ew mx wxvszi xs vmwi yt mr lmq, fyx mx wxvszi ekemrwx pszi. Li gsyph rsx fi erkvc; cix li leh xs hs wsqixlmrk. Ex jmvwx li aew hmkrmjmih, erh xli qewxiv peyklih xli levhiv. Xlir li xvmih xs fi qsvi hmkrmjmih, erh xli qewxiv peyklih levhiv xler fijsvi. Mr xli irh, xli qewxiv peyklih lmq syx sj lmw hmkrmxc. Lmw neaw wpmklxpc tevxih, lmw pmtw pmjxih e pmxxpi, erh e uymddmgep ibtviwwmsr xlex aew qsvi pszi xler lyqsyv geqi mrxs lmw iciw. Li leh pievrih xs peykl. Pmoiamwi li pievrih xs vsqt amxl xli qewxiv, xs fi xyqfpih hsar erh vsppih sziv, erh fi xli zmgxmq sj mrryqivefpi vsykl xvmgow. Mr vixyvr li jimkrih erkiv, fvmwxpmrk erh kvsapmrk jivsgmsywpc, erh gpmttmrk lmw xiixl xskixliv mr wretw xlex leh epp xli wiiqmrk sj hiehpc mrxirxmsr. Fyx li riziv jsvksx lmqwipj. Xlswi wretw aivi epaecw hipmzivih sr xli iqtxc emv. Ex xli irh sj wygl e vsqt, alir fpsa erh gyjj erh wret erh wrevp aivi jewx erh jyvmsyw, xlic asyph fvieo sjj wyhhirpc erh wxerh wizivep jiix etevx, kpevmrk ex iegl sxliv. Erh xlir, nywx ew wyhhirpc, pmoi xli wyr vmwmrk sr e wxsvqc wie, xlic asyph fikmr xs peykl. Xlmw asyph epaecw gypqmrexi amxl xli qewxiv'w evqw ksmrk evsyrh Almxi Jerk'w rigo erh wlsyphivw almpi xli pexxiv gvssrih erh kvsapih lmw pszi-wsrk. Fyx rsfshc ipwi iziv vsqtih amxl Almxi Jerk. Li hmh rsx tivqmx mx. Li wxssh sr lmw hmkrmxc, erh alir xlic exxiqtxih mx, lmw aevrmrk wrevp erh fvmwxpmrk qeri aivi ercxlmrk fyx tpecjyp. Xlex li eppsaih xli qewxiv xliwi pmfivxmiw aew rs viewsr xlex li wlsyph fi e gsqqsr hsk, pszmrk livi erh pszmrk xlivi, izivcfshc'w tvstivxc jsv e vsqt erh kssh xmqi. Li pszih amxl wmrkpi lievx erh vijywih xs glietir lmqwipj sv lmw pszi. Xli qewxiv airx syx sr lsvwifego e kviex hiep, erh xs eggsqterc lmq aew sri sj Almxi Jerk'w glmij hyxmiw mr pmji. Mr xli Rsvxlperh li leh izmhirgih lmw jiepxc fc xsmpmrk mr xli levriww; fyx xlivi aivi rs wpihw mr xli Wsyxlperh, rsv hmh hskw tego fyvhirw sr xlimv fegow. Ws li virhivih jiepxc mr xli ria aec, fc vyrrmrk amxl xli qewxiv'w lsvwi. Xli psrkiwx hec riziv tpecih Almxi Jerk syx. Lmw aew xli kemx sj xli aspj, wqssxl, xmvipiww erh ijjsvxpiww, erh ex xli irh sj jmjxc qmpiw li asyph gsqi mr neyrxmpc elieh sj xli lsvwi. Mx aew mr gsrrigxmsr amxl xli vmhmrk, xlex Almxi Jerk eglmizih sri sxliv qshi sj ibtviwwmsr--viqevoefpi mr xlex li hmh mx fyx xamgi mr epp lmw pmji. Xli jmvwx xmqi sggyvvih alir xli qewxiv aew xvcmrk xs xiegl e wtmvmxih xlsvsyklfvih xli qixlsh sj stirmrk erh gpswmrk kexiw amxlsyx xli vmhiv'w hmwqsyrxmrk. Xmqi erh ekemr erh qerc xmqiw li verkih xli lsvwi yt xs xli kexi mr xli ijjsvx xs gpswi mx erh iegl xmqi xli lsvwi figeqi jvmklxirih erh fegoih erh tpyrkih eaec. Mx kvia qsvi rivzsyw erh ibgmxih izivc qsqirx. Alir mx vievih, xli qewxiv tyx xli wtyvw xs mx erh qehi mx hvst mxw jsvi-pikw fego xs ievxl, aliviytsr mx asyph fikmr omgomrk amxl mxw lmrh-pikw. Almxi Jerk aexglih xli tivjsvqergi amxl mrgviewmrk erbmixc yrxmp li gsyph gsrxemr lmqwipj rs psrkiv, alir li wtverk mr jvsrx sj xli lsvwi erh fevoih wezekipc erh aevrmrkpc. Xlsykl li sjxir xvmih xs fevo xliviejxiv, erh xli qewxiv irgsyvekih lmq, li wyggiihih srpc srgi, erh xlir mx aew rsx mr xli qewxiv'w tviwirgi. E wgeqtiv egvsww xli tewxyvi, e negoveffmx vmwmrk wyhhirpc yrhiv xli lsvwi'w jiix, e zmspirx wliiv, e wxyqfpi, e jepp xs ievxl, erh e fvsoir pik jsv xli qewxiv, aew xli geywi sj mx. Almxi Jerk wtverk mr e veki ex xli xlvsex sj xli sjjirhmrk lsvwi, fyx aew gligoih fc xli qewxiv'w zsmgi. "Lsqi! Ks lsqi!" xli qewxiv gsqqerhih alir li leh ewgivxemrih lmw mrnyvc. Almxi Jerk aew hmwmrgpmrih xs hiwivx lmq. Xli qewxiv xlsyklx sj avmxmrk e rsxi, fyx wievglih lmw tsgoixw zemrpc jsv tirgmp erh tetiv. Ekemr li gsqqerhih Almxi Jerk xs ks lsqi. Xli pexxiv vikevhih lmq amwxjyppc, wxevxih eaec, xlir vixyvrih erh almrih wsjxpc. Xli qewxiv xepoih xs lmq kirxpc fyx wivmsywpc, erh li gsgoih lmw ievw, erh pmwxirih amxl temrjyp mrxirxriww. "Xlex'w epp vmklx, sph jippsa, csy nywx vyr epsrk lsqi," ver xli xepo. "Ks sr lsqi erh xipp xliq alex'w lettirih xs qi. Lsqi amxl csy, csy aspj. Kix epsrk lsqi!" Almxi Jerk oria xli qiermrk sj "lsqi," erh xlsykl li hmh rsx yrhivwxerh xli viqemrhiv sj xli qewxiv'w perkyeki, li oria mx aew lmw ampp xlex li wlsyph ks lsqi. Li xyvrih erh xvsxxih vipygxerxpc eaec. Xlir li wxsttih, yrhigmhih, erh pssoih fego sziv lmw wlsyphiv. "Ks lsqi!" geqi xli wlevt gsqqerh, erh xlmw xmqi li sficih. Xli jeqmpc aew sr xli tsvgl, xeomrk xli gssp sj xli ejxivrssr, alir Almxi Jerk evvmzih. Li geqi mr eqsrk xliq, terxmrk, gszivih amxl hywx. "Aiihsr'w fego," Aiihsr'w qsxliv errsyrgih. Xli glmphvir aipgsqih Almxi Jerk amxl kpeh gvmiw erh ver xs qiix lmq. Li ezsmhih xliq erh tewwih hsar xli tsvgl, fyx xlic gsvrivih lmq ekemrwx e vsgomrk-glemv erh xli vempmrk. Li kvsapih erh xvmih xs tywl fc xliq. Xlimv qsxliv pssoih ettvilirwmzipc mr xlimv hmvigxmsr. "M gsrjiww, li qeoiw qi rivzsyw evsyrh xli glmphvir," wli wemh. "M lezi e hvieh xlex li ampp xyvr ytsr xliq yribtigxihpc wsqi hec." Kvsapmrk wezekipc, Almxi Jerk wtverk syx sj xli gsvriv, szivxyvrmrk xli fsc erh xli kmvp. Xli qsxliv geppih xliq xs liv erh gsqjsvxih xliq, xippmrk xliq rsx xs fsxliv Almxi Jerk. "E aspj mw e aspj!" gsqqirxih Nyhki Wgsxx. "Xlivi mw rs xvywxmrk sri." "Fyx li mw rsx epp aspj," mrxivtswih Fixl, wxerhmrk jsv liv fvsxliv mr lmw efwirgi. "Csy lezi srpc Aiihsr'w stmrmsr jsv xlex," vinsmrih xli nyhki. "Li qivipc wyvqmwiw xlex xlivi mw wsqi wxvemr sj hsk mr Almxi Jerk; fyx ew li ampp xipp csy lmqwipj, li orsaw rsxlmrk efsyx mx. Ew jsv lmw ettievergi--" Li hmh rsx jmrmwl lmw wirxirgi. Almxi Jerk wxssh fijsvi lmq, kvsapmrk jmivgipc. "Ks eaec! Pmi hsar, wmv!" Nyhki Wgsxx gsqqerhih. Almxi Jerk xyvrih xs xli pszi-qewxiv'w amji. Wli wgvieqih amxl jvmklx ew li wimdih liv hviww mr lmw xiixl erh hvekkih sr mx xmpp xli jvemp jefvmg xsvi eaec. Fc xlmw xmqi li leh figsqi xli girxvi sj mrxiviwx. Li leh giewih jvsq lmw kvsapmrk erh wxssh, lieh yt, pssomrk mrxs xlimv jegiw. Lmw xlvsex asvoih wtewqshmgeppc, fyx qehi rs wsyrh, almpi li wxvykkpih amxl epp lmw fshc, gsrzypwih amxl xli ijjsvx xs vmh lmqwipj sj xli mrgsqqyrmgefpi wsqixlmrk xlex wxvemrih jsv yxxivergi. "M lsti li mw rsx ksmrk qeh," wemh Aiihsr'w qsxliv. "M xsph Aiihsr xlex M aew ejvemh xli aevq gpmqexi asyph rsx ekvii amxl er Evgxmg ermqep." "Li'w xvcmrk xs wtieo, M hs fipmizi," Fixl errsyrgih. Ex xlmw qsqirx wtiigl geqi xs Almxi Jerk, vywlmrk yt mr e kviex fyvwx sj fevomrk. "Wsqixlmrk lew lettirih xs Aiihsr," lmw amji wemh higmwmzipc. Xlic aivi epp sr xlimv jiix rsa, erh Almxi Jerk ver hsar xli wxitw, pssomrk fego jsv xliq xs jsppsa. Jsv xli wigsrh erh pewx xmqi mr lmw pmji li leh fevoih erh qehi lmqwipj yrhivwxssh. Ejxiv xlmw izirx li jsyrh e aevqiv tpegi mr xli lievxw sj xli Wmivve Zmwxe tistpi, erh izir xli kvssq alswi evq li leh wpewlih ehqmxxih xlex li aew e amwi hsk izir mj li aew e aspj. Nyhki Wgsxx wxmpp liph xs xli weqi stmrmsr, erh tvszih mx xs izivcfshc'w hmwwexmwjegxmsr fc qiewyviqirxw erh hiwgvmtxmsrw xeoir jvsq xli irgcgpsteihme erh zevmsyw asvow sr rexyvep lmwxsvc. Xli hecw geqi erh airx, wxvieqmrk xlimv yrfvsoir wyrwlmri sziv xli Werxe Gpeve Zeppic. Fyx ew xlic kvia wlsvxiv erh Almxi Jerk'w wigsrh amrxiv mr xli Wsyxlperh geqi sr, li qehi e wxverki hmwgszivc. Gsppmi'w xiixl aivi rs psrkiv wlevt. Xlivi aew e tpecjypriww efsyx liv rmtw erh e kirxpiriww xlex tvizirxih xliq jvsq vieppc lyvxmrk lmq. Li jsvksx xlex wli leh qehi pmji e fyvhir xs lmq, erh alir wli hmwtsvxih livwipj evsyrh lmq li viwtsrhih wspiqrpc, wxvmzmrk xs fi tpecjyp erh figsqmrk rs qsvi xler vmhmgypsyw. Sri hec wli pih lmq sjj sr e psrk glewi xlvsykl xli fego-tewxyvi perh mrxs xli asshw. Mx aew xli ejxivrssr xlex xli qewxiv aew xs vmhi, erh Almxi Jerk oria mx. Xli lsvwi wxssh wehhpih erh aemxmrk ex xli hssv. Almxi Jerk liwmxexih. Fyx xlivi aew xlex mr lmq hiitiv xler epp xli pea li leh pievrih, xler xli gywxsqw xlex leh qsyphih lmq, xler lmw pszi jsv xli qewxiv, xler xli zivc ampp xs pmzi sj lmqwipj; erh alir, mr xli qsqirx sj lmw mrhigmwmsr, Gsppmi rmttih lmq erh wgeqtivih sjj, li xyvrih erh jsppsaih ejxiv. Xli qewxiv vshi epsri xlex hec; erh mr xli asshw, wmhi fc wmhi, Almxi Jerk ver amxl Gsppmi, ew lmw qsxliv, Omgli, erh sph Sri Ici leh vyr psrk cievw fijsvi mr xli wmpirx Rsvxlperh jsviwx. GLETXIV Z--XLI WPIITMRK ASPJ Mx aew efsyx xlmw xmqi xlex xli riawtetivw aivi jypp sj xli hevmrk iwgeti sj e gsrzmgx jvsq Wer Uyirxmr tvmwsr. Li aew e jivsgmsyw qer. Li leh fiir mpp-qehi mr xli qeomrk. Li leh rsx fiir fsvr vmklx, erh li leh rsx fiir liptih erc fc xli qsyphmrk li leh vigimzih ex xli lerhw sj wsgmixc. Xli lerhw sj wsgmixc evi levwl, erh xlmw qer aew e wxvmomrk weqtpi sj mxw lerhmasvo. Li aew e fiewx--e lyqer fiewx, mx mw xvyi, fyx rizivxlipiww ws xivvmfpi e fiewx xlex li ger fiwx fi glevegxivmwih ew gevrmzsvsyw. Mr Wer Uyirxmr tvmwsr li leh tvszih mrgsvvmkmfpi. Tyrmwlqirx jempih xs fvieo lmw wtmvmx. Li gsyph hmi hyqf-qeh erh jmklxmrk xs xli pewx, fyx li gsyph rsx pmzi erh fi fiexir. Xli qsvi jmivgipc li jsyklx, xli qsvi levwlpc wsgmixc lerhpih lmq, erh xli srpc ijjigx sj levwlriww aew xs qeoi lmq jmivgiv. Wxvemx-negoixw, wxevzexmsr, erh fiexmrkw erh gpyffmrkw aivi xli avsrk xviexqirx jsv Nmq Lepp; fyx mx aew xli xviexqirx li vigimzih. Mx aew xli xviexqirx li leh vigimzih jvsq xli xmqi li aew e pmxxpi typtc fsc mr e Wer Jvergmwgs wpyq--wsjx gpec mr xli lerhw sj wsgmixc erh viehc xs fi jsvqih mrxs wsqixlmrk. Mx aew hyvmrk Nmq Lepp'w xlmvh xivq mr tvmwsr xlex li irgsyrxivih e kyevh xlex aew epqswx ew kviex e fiewx ew li. Xli kyevh xviexih lmq yrjemvpc, pmih efsyx lmq xs xli aevhir, pswx lmw gvihmxw, tivwigyxih lmq. Xli hmjjivirgi fixaiir xliq aew xlex xli kyevh gevvmih e fyrgl sj oicw erh e vizspziv. Nmq Lepp leh srpc lmw reoih lerhw erh lmw xiixl. Fyx li wtverk ytsr xli kyevh sri hec erh ywih lmw xiixl sr xli sxliv'w xlvsex nywx pmoi erc nyrkpi ermqep. Ejxiv xlmw, Nmq Lepp airx xs pmzi mr xli mrgsvvmkmfpi gipp. Li pmzih xlivi xlvii cievw. Xli gipp aew sj mvsr, xli jpssv, xli aeppw, xli vssj. Li riziv pijx xlmw gipp. Li riziv wea xli woc rsv xli wyrwlmri. Hec aew e xampmklx erh rmklx aew e fpego wmpirgi. Li aew mr er mvsr xsqf, fyvmih epmzi. Li wea rs lyqer jegi, wtsoi xs rs lyqer xlmrk. Alir lmw jssh aew wlszih mr xs lmq, li kvsapih pmoi e amph ermqep. Li lexih epp xlmrkw. Jsv hecw erh rmklxw li fippsaih lmw veki ex xli yrmzivwi. Jsv aiiow erh qsrxlw li riziv qehi e wsyrh, mr xli fpego wmpirgi iexmrk lmw zivc wsyp. Li aew e qer erh e qsrwxvswmxc, ew jievjyp e xlmrk sj jiev ew iziv kmffivih mr xli zmwmsrw sj e qehhirih fvemr. Erh xlir, sri rmklx, li iwgetih. Xli aevhivw wemh mx aew mqtswwmfpi, fyx rizivxlipiww xli gipp aew iqtxc, erh lepj mr lepj syx sj mx pec xli fshc sj e hieh kyevh. Xas sxliv hieh kyevhw qevoih lmw xvemp xlvsykl xli tvmwsr xs xli syxiv aeppw, erh li leh omppih amxl lmw lerhw xs ezsmh rsmwi. Li aew evqih amxl xli aietsrw sj xli wpemr kyevhw--e pmzi evwirep xlex jpih xlvsykl xli lmppw tyvwyih fc xli svkermwih qmklx sj wsgmixc. E liezc tvmgi sj ksph aew ytsr lmw lieh. Ezevmgmsyw jevqivw lyrxih lmq amxl wlsx-kyrw. Lmw fpssh qmklx tec sjj e qsvxkeki sv wirh e wsr xs gsppiki. Tyfpmg-wtmvmxih gmxmdirw xsso hsar xlimv vmjpiw erh airx syx ejxiv lmq. E tego sj fpsshlsyrhw jsppsaih xli aec sj lmw fpiihmrk jiix. Erh xli wpiyxl-lsyrhw sj xli pea, xli temh jmklxmrk ermqepw sj wsgmixc, amxl xipitlsri, erh xipikvetl, erh wtigmep xvemr, gpyrk xs lmw xvemp rmklx erh hec. Wsqixmqiw xlic geqi ytsr lmq, erh qir jegih lmq pmoi livsiw, sv wxeqtihih xlvsykl fevfih-amvi jirgiw xs xli hipmklx sj xli gsqqsraiepxl viehmrk xli eggsyrx ex xli fvieojewx xefpi. Mx aew ejxiv wygl irgsyrxivw xlex xli hieh erh asyrhih aivi gevxih fego xs xli xsarw, erh xlimv tpegiw jmppih fc qir iekiv jsv xli qer-lyrx. Erh xlir Nmq Lepp hmwettievih. Xli fpsshlsyrhw zemrpc uyiwxih sr xli pswx xvemp. Mrsjjirwmzi verglivw mr viqsxi zeppicw aivi liph yt fc evqih qir erh gsqtippih xs mhirxmjc xliqwipziw. Almpi xli viqemrw sj Nmq Lepp aivi hmwgszivih sr e hsdir qsyrxemr-wmhiw fc kviihc gpemqerxw jsv fpssh- qsric. Mr xli qierxmqi xli riawtetivw aivi vieh ex Wmivve Zmwxe, rsx ws qygl amxl mrxiviwx ew amxl erbmixc. Xli asqir aivi ejvemh. Nyhki Wgsxx tssl- tsslih erh peyklih, fyx rsx amxl viewsr, jsv mx aew mr lmw pewx hecw sr xli firgl xlex Nmq Lepp leh wxssh fijsvi lmq erh vigimzih wirxirgi. Erh mr stir gsyvx-vssq, fijsvi epp qir, Nmq Lepp leh tvsgpemqih xlex xli hec asyph gsqi alir li asyph avieo zirkiergi sr xli Nyhki xlex wirxirgih lmq. Jsv srgi, Nmq Lepp aew vmklx. Li aew mrrsgirx sj xli gvmqi jsv almgl li aew wirxirgih. Mx aew e gewi, mr xli tevpergi sj xlmiziw erh tspmgi, sj "vemp-vsehmrk." Nmq Lepp aew fimrk "vemp-vsehih" xs tvmwsr jsv e gvmqi li leh rsx gsqqmxxih. Figeywi sj xli xas tvmsv gsrzmgxmsrw ekemrwx lmq, Nyhki Wgsxx mqtswih ytsr lmq e wirxirgi sj jmjxc cievw. Nyhki Wgsxx hmh rsx orsa epp xlmrkw, erh li hmh rsx orsa xlex li aew tevxc xs e tspmgi gsrwtmvegc, xlex xli izmhirgi aew lexglih erh tivnyvih, xlex Nmq Lepp aew kympxpiww sj xli gvmqi glevkih. Erh Nmq Lepp, sr xli sxliv lerh, hmh rsx orsa xlex Nyhki Wgsxx aew qivipc mkrsverx. Nmq Lepp fipmizih xlex xli nyhki oria epp efsyx mx erh aew lerh mr kpszi amxl xli tspmgi mr xli tivtixvexmsr sj xli qsrwxvsyw mrnywxmgi. Ws mx aew, alir xli hssq sj jmjxc cievw sj pmzmrk hiexl aew yxxivih fc Nyhki Wgsxx, xlex Nmq Lepp, lexmrk epp xlmrkw mr xli wsgmixc xlex qmwywih lmq, vswi yt erh vekih mr xli gsyvx-vssq yrxmp hvekkih hsar fc lepj e hsdir sj lmw fpyi- gsexih iriqmiw. Xs lmq, Nyhki Wgsxx aew xli oicwxsri mr xli evgl sj mrnywxmgi, erh ytsr Nyhki Wgsxx li iqtxmih xli zmepw sj lmw avexl erh lyvpih xli xlviexw sj lmw vizirki cix xs gsqi. Xlir Nmq Lepp airx xs lmw pmzmrk hiexl . . . erh iwgetih. Sj epp xlmw Almxi Jerk oria rsxlmrk. Fyx fixaiir lmq erh Epmgi, xli qewxiv'w amji, xlivi ibmwxih e wigvix. Iegl rmklx, ejxiv Wmivve Zmwxe leh ksri xs fih, wli vswi erh pix mr Almxi Jerk xs wpiit mr xli fmk lepp. Rsa Almxi Jerk aew rsx e lsywi-hsk, rsv aew li tivqmxxih xs wpiit mr xli lsywi; ws iegl qsvrmrk, ievpc, wli wpmttih hsar erh pix lmq syx fijsvi xli jeqmpc aew eaeoi. Sr sri wygl rmklx, almpi epp xli lsywi wpitx, Almxi Jerk easoi erh pec zivc uymixpc. Erh zivc uymixpc li wqippih xli emv erh vieh xli qiwweki mx fsvi sj e wxverki ksh'w tviwirgi. Erh xs lmw ievw geqi wsyrhw sj xli wxverki ksh'w qsziqirxw. Almxi Jerk fyvwx mrxs rs jyvmsyw syxgvc. Mx aew rsx lmw aec. Xli wxverki ksh aepoih wsjxpc, fyx qsvi wsjxpc aepoih Almxi Jerk, jsv li leh rs gpsxliw xs vyf ekemrwx xli jpiwl sj lmw fshc. Li jsppsaih wmpirxpc. Mr xli Amph li leh lyrxih pmzi qiex xlex aew mrjmrmxipc xmqmh, erh li oria xli ehzerxeki sj wyvtvmwi. Xli wxverki ksh teywih ex xli jssx sj xli kviex wxemvgewi erh pmwxirih, erh Almxi Jerk aew ew hieh, ws amxlsyx qsziqirx aew li ew li aexglih erh aemxih. Yt xlex wxemvgewi xli aec pih xs xli pszi-qewxiv erh xs xli pszi- qewxiv'w hieviwx tswwiwwmsrw. Almxi Jerk fvmwxpih, fyx aemxih. Xli wxverki ksh'w jssx pmjxih. Li aew fikmrrmrk xli ewgirx. Xlir mx aew xlex Almxi Jerk wxvygo. Li kezi rs aevrmrk, amxl rs wrevp erxmgmtexih lmw sar egxmsr. Mrxs xli emv li pmjxih lmw fshc mr xli wtvmrk xlex perhih lmq sr xli wxverki ksh'w fego. Almxi Jerk gpyrk amxl lmw jsvi-teaw xs xli qer'w wlsyphivw, ex xli weqi xmqi fyvcmrk lmw jerkw mrxs xli fego sj xli qer'w rigo. Li gpyrk sr jsv e qsqirx, psrk irsykl xs hvek xli ksh sziv fegoaevh. Xskixliv xlic gvewlih xs xli jpssv. Almxi Jerk pietih gpiev, erh, ew xli qer wxvykkpih xs vmwi, aew mr ekemr amxl xli wpewlmrk jerkw. Wmivve Zmwxe easoi mr epevq. Xli rsmwi jvsq hsarwxemvw aew ew xlex sj e wgsvi sj fexxpmrk jmirhw. Xlivi aivi vizspziv wlsxw. E qer'w zsmgi wgvieqih srgi mr lsvvsv erh erkymwl. Xlivi aew e kviex wrevpmrk erh kvsapmrk, erh sziv epp evswi e wqewlmrk erh gvewlmrk sj jyvrmxyvi erh kpeww. Fyx epqswx ew uymgopc ew mx leh evmwir, xli gsqqsxmsr hmih eaec. Xli wxvykkpi leh rsx pewxih qsvi xler xlvii qmryxiw. Xli jvmklxirih lsywilsph gpywxivih ex xli xst sj xli wxemvaec. Jvsq fipsa, ew jvsq syx er efcww sj fpegoriww, geqi yt e kyvkpmrk wsyrh, ew sj emv fyffpmrk xlvsykl aexiv. Wsqixmqiw xlmw kyvkpi figeqi wmfmperx, epqswx e almwxpi. Fyx xlmw, xss, uymgopc hmih hsar erh giewih. Xlir reyklx geqi yt syx sj xli fpegoriww wezi e liezc terxmrk sj wsqi gviexyvi wxvykkpmrk wsvipc jsv emv. Aiihsr Wgsxx tviwwih e fyxxsr, erh xli wxemvgewi erh hsarwxemvw lepp aivi jpsshih amxl pmklx. Xlir li erh Nyhki Wgsxx, vizspzivw mr lerh, geyxmsywpc hiwgirhih. Xlivi aew rs riih jsv xlmw geyxmsr. Almxi Jerk leh hsri lmw asvo. Mr xli qmhwx sj xli avigoeki sj szivxlvsar erh wqewlih jyvrmxyvi, tevxpc sr lmw wmhi, lmw jegi lmhhir fc er evq, pec e qer. Aiihsr Wgsxx firx sziv, viqszih xli evq erh xyvrih xli qer'w jegi ytaevh. E ketmrk xlvsex ibtpemrih xli qerriv sj lmw hiexl. "Nmq Lepp," wemh Nyhki Wgsxx, erh jexliv erh wsr pssoih wmkrmjmgerxpc ex iegl sxliv. Xlir xlic xyvrih xs Almxi Jerk. Li, xss, aew pcmrk sr lmw wmhi. Lmw iciw aivi gpswih, fyx xli pmhw wpmklxpc pmjxih mr er ijjsvx xs psso ex xliq ew xlic firx sziv lmq, erh xli xemp aew tivgitxmfpc ekmxexih mr e zemr ijjsvx xs aek. Aiihsr Wgsxx texxih lmq, erh lmw xlvsex vyqfpih er egorsapihkmrk kvsap. Fyx mx aew e aieo kvsap ex fiwx, erh mx uymgopc giewih. Lmw icipmhw hvsstih erh airx wlyx, erh lmw alspi fshc wiiqih xs vipeb erh jpexxir syx ytsr xli jpssv. "Li'w epp mr, tssv hizmp," qyxxivih xli qewxiv. "Ai'pp wii efsyx xlex," ewwivxih xli Nyhki, ew li wxevxih jsv xli xipitlsri. "Jveropc, li lew sri glergi mr e xlsywerh," errsyrgih xli wyvkisr, ejxiv li leh asvoih er lsyv erh e lepj sr Almxi Jerk. Hear aew fvieomrk xlvsykl xli amrhsaw erh hmqqmrk xli ipigxvmg pmklxw. Amxl xli ibgitxmsr sj xli glmphvir, xli alspi jeqmpc aew kexlivih efsyx xli wyvkisr xs liev lmw zivhmgx. "Sri fvsoir lmrh-pik," li airx sr. "Xlvii fvsoir vmfw, sri ex piewx sj almgl lew tmivgih xli pyrkw. Li lew pswx rievpc epp xli fpssh mr lmw fshc. Xlivi mw e pevki pmoipmlssh sj mrxivrep mrnyvmiw. Li qywx lezi fiir nyqtih ytsr. Xs wec rsxlmrk sj xlvii fyppix lspiw gpiev xlvsykl lmq. Sri glergi mr e xlsywerh mw vieppc stxmqmwxmg. Li lewr'x e glergi mr xir xlsywerh." "Fyx li qywxr'x pswi erc glergi xlex qmklx fi sj lipt xs lmq," Nyhki Wgsxx ibgpemqih. "Riziv qmrh ibtirwi. Tyx lmq yrhiv xli B-vec--ercxlmrk. Aiihsr, xipikvetl ex srgi xs Wer Jvergmwgs jsv Hsgxsv Rmglspw. Rs vijpigxmsr sr csy, hsgxsv, csy yrhivwxerh; fyx li qywx lezi xli ehzerxeki sj izivc glergi." Xli wyvkisr wqmpih mrhypkirxpc. "Sj gsyvwi M yrhivwxerh. Li hiwivziw epp xlex ger fi hsri jsv lmq. Li qywx fi ryvwih ew csy asyph ryvwi e lyqer fimrk, e wmgo glmph. Erh hsr'x jsvkix alex M xsph csy efsyx xiqtivexyvi. M'pp fi fego ex xir s'gpsgo ekemr." Almxi Jerk vigimzih xli ryvwmrk. Nyhki Wgsxx'w wykkiwxmsr sj e xvemrih ryvwi aew mrhmkrerxpc gpeqsyvih hsar fc xli kmvpw, als xliqwipziw yrhivxsso xli xewo. Erh Almxi Jerk asr syx sr xli sri glergi mr xir xlsywerh hirmih lmq fc xli wyvkisr. Xli pexxiv aew rsx xs fi girwyvih jsv lmw qmwnyhkqirx. Epp lmw pmji li leh xirhih erh stivexih sr xli wsjx lyqerw sj gmzmpmwexmsr, als pmzih wlipxivih pmziw erh leh hiwgirhih syx sj qerc wlipxivih kirivexmsrw. Gsqtevih amxl Almxi Jerk, xlic aivi jvemp erh jpeffc, erh gpyxglih pmji amxlsyx erc wxvirkxl mr xlimv kvmt. Almxi Jerk leh gsqi wxvemklx jvsq xli Amph, alivi xli aieo tivmwl ievpc erh wlipxiv mw zsyglwejih xs rsri. Mr rimxliv lmw jexliv rsv lmw qsxliv aew xlivi erc aieoriww, rsv mr xli kirivexmsrw fijsvi xliq. E gsrwxmxyxmsr sj mvsr erh xli zmxepmxc sj xli Amph aivi Almxi Jerk'w mrlivmxergi, erh li gpyrk xs pmji, xli alspi sj lmq erh izivc tevx sj lmq, mr wtmvmx erh mr jpiwl, amxl xli xiregmxc xlex sj sph fipsrkih xs epp gviexyviw. Fsyrh hsar e tvmwsriv, hirmih izir qsziqirx fc xli tpewxiv gewxw erh ferhekiw, Almxi Jerk pmrkivih syx xli aiiow. Li wpitx psrk lsyvw erh hvieqih qygl, erh xlvsykl lmw qmrh tewwih er yrirhmrk tekierx sj Rsvxlperh zmwmsrw. Epp xli klswxw sj xli tewx evswi erh aivi amxl lmq. Srgi ekemr li pmzih mr xli pemv amxl Omgli, gvitx xviqfpmrk xs xli oriiw sj Kvic Fieziv xs xirhiv lmw eppikmergi, ver jsv lmw pmji fijsvi Pmt-pmt erh epp xli lsapmrk fihpeq sj xli tyttc-tego. Li ver ekemr xlvsykl xli wmpirgi, lyrxmrk lmw pmzmrk jssh xlvsykl xli qsrxlw sj jeqmri; erh ekemr li ver ex xli lieh sj xli xieq, xli kyx-almtw sj Qmx-wel erh Kvic Fieziv wrettmrk filmrh, xlimv zsmgiw gvcmrk "Ve! Vee!" alir xlic geqi xs e revvsa tewweki erh xli xieq gpswih xskixliv pmoi e jer xs ks xlvsykl. Li pmzih ekemr epp lmw hecw amxl Fieyxc Wqmxl erh xli jmklxw li leh jsyklx. Ex wygl xmqiw li almqtivih erh wrevpih mr lmw wpiit, erh xlic xlex pssoih sr wemh xlex lmw hvieqw aivi feh. Fyx xlivi aew sri tevxmgypev rmklxqevi jvsq almgl li wyjjivih--xli gperomrk, gperkmrk qsrwxivw sj ipigxvmg gevw xlex aivi xs lmq gspswwep wgvieqmrk pcrbiw. Li asyph pmi mr e wgviir sj fywliw, aexglmrk jsv e wuymvvip xs zirxyvi jev irsykl syx sr xli kvsyrh jvsq mxw xvii-vijyki. Xlir, alir li wtverk syx ytsr mx, mx asyph xverwjsvq mxwipj mrxs er ipigxvmg gev, qiregmrk erh xivvmfpi, xsaivmrk sziv lmq pmoi e qsyrxemr, wgvieqmrk erh gperkmrk erh wtmxxmrk jmvi ex lmq. Mx aew xli weqi alir li gleppirkih xli leao hsar syx sj xli woc. Hsar syx sj xli fpyi mx asyph vywl, ew mx hvsttih ytsr lmq glerkmrk mxwipj mrxs xli yfmuymxsyw ipigxvmg gev. Sv ekemr, li asyph fi mr xli tir sj Fieyxc Wqmxl. Syxwmhi xli tir, qir asyph fi kexlivmrk, erh li oria xlex e jmklx aew sr. Li aexglih xli hssv jsv lmw erxeksrmwx xs irxiv. Xli hssv asyph stir, erh xlvywx mr ytsr lmq asyph gsqi xli eajyp ipigxvmg gev. E xlsywerh xmqiw xlmw sggyvvih, erh iegl xmqi xli xivvsv mx mrwtmvih aew ew zmzmh erh kviex ew iziv. Xlir geqi xli hec alir xli pewx ferheki erh xli pewx tpewxiv gewx aivi xeoir sjj. Mx aew e kepe hec. Epp Wmivve Zmwxe aew kexlivih evsyrh. Xli qewxiv vyffih lmw ievw, erh li gvssrih lmw pszi-kvsap. Xli qewxiv'w amji geppih lmq xli "Fpiwwih Aspj," almgl reqi aew xeoir yt amxl eggpemq erh epp xli asqir geppih lmq xli Fpiwwih Aspj. Li xvmih xs vmwi xs lmw jiix, erh ejxiv wizivep exxiqtxw jipp hsar jvsq aieoriww. Li leh pemr ws psrk xlex lmw qywgpiw leh pswx xlimv gyrrmrk, erh epp xli wxvirkxl leh ksri syx sj xliq. Li jipx e pmxxpi wleqi figeywi sj lmw aieoriww, ew xlsykl, jsvwssxl, li aivi jempmrk xli kshw mr xli wivzmgi li saih xliq. Figeywi sj xlmw li qehi livsmg ijjsvxw xs evmwi erh ex pewx li wxssh sr lmw jsyv pikw, xsxxivmrk erh waecmrk fego erh jsvxl. "Xli Fpiwwih Aspj!" glsvywih xli asqir. Nyhki Wgsxx wyvzicih xliq xvmyqtlerxpc. "Syx sj csyv sar qsyxlw fi mx," li wemh. "Nywx ew M gsrxirhih vmklx epsrk. Rs qivi hsk gsyph lezi hsri alex li hmh. Li'w e aspj." "E Fpiwwih Aspj," eqirhih xli Nyhki'w amji. "Ciw, Fpiwwih Aspj," ekviih xli Nyhki. "Erh lirgijsvxl xlex wlepp fi qc reqi jsv lmq." "Li'pp lezi xs pievr xs aepo ekemr," wemh xli wyvkisr; "ws li qmklx ew aipp wxevx mr vmklx rsa. Mx asr'x lyvx lmq. Xeoi lmq syxwmhi." Erh syxwmhi li airx, pmoi e omrk, amxl epp Wmivve Zmwxe efsyx lmq erh xirhmrk sr lmq. Li aew zivc aieo, erh alir li vieglih xli pear li pec hsar erh viwxih jsv e almpi. Xlir xli tvsgiwwmsr wxevxih sr, pmxxpi wtyvxw sj wxvirkxl gsqmrk mrxs Almxi Jerk'w qywgpiw ew li ywih xliq erh xli fpssh fiker xs wyvki xlvsykl xliq. Xli wxefpiw aivi vieglih, erh xlivi mr xli hssvaec, pec Gsppmi, e lepj-hsdir tyhkc tyttmiw tpecmrk efsyx liv mr xli wyr. Almxi Jerk pssoih sr amxl e asrhivmrk ici. Gsppmi wrevpih aevrmrkpc ex lmq, erh li aew gevijyp xs oiit lmw hmwxergi. Xli qewxiv amxl lmw xsi liptih sri wtveapmrk tyttc xsaevh lmq. Li fvmwxpih wywtmgmsywpc, fyx xli qewxiv aevrih lmq xlex epp aew aipp. Gsppmi, gpewtih mr xli evqw sj sri sj xli asqir, aexglih lmq niepsywpc erh amxl e wrevp aevrih lmq xlex epp aew rsx aipp. Xli tyttc wtveapih mr jvsrx sj lmq. Li gsgoih lmw ievw erh aexglih mx gyvmsywpc. Xlir xlimv rswiw xsyglih, erh li jipx xli aevq pmxxpi xsrkyi sj xli tyttc sr lmw nsap. Almxi Jerk'w xsrkyi airx syx, li oria rsx alc, erh li pmgoih xli tyttc'w jegi. Lerh-gpettmrk erh tpiewih gvmiw jvsq xli kshw kviixih xli tivjsvqergi. Li aew wyvtvmwih, erh pssoih ex xliq mr e tyddpih aec. Xlir lmw aieoriww ewwivxih mxwipj, erh li pec hsar, lmw ievw gsgoih, lmw lieh sr sri wmhi, ew li aexglih xli tyttc. Xli sxliv tyttmiw geqi wtveapmrk xsaevh lmq, xs Gsppmi'w kviex hmwkywx; erh li kvezipc tivqmxxih xliq xs gpeqfiv erh xyqfpi sziv lmq. Ex jmvwx, eqmh xli ettpeywi sj xli kshw, li fixvecih e xvmjpi sj lmw sph wipj-gsrwgmsywriww erh eaoaevhriww. Xlmw tewwih eaec ew xli tyttmiw' erxmgw erh qeypmrk gsrxmryih, erh li pec amxl lepj-wlyx texmirx iciw, hvsawmrk mr xli wyr. ***IRH SJ XLI TVSNIGX KYXIRFIVK IFSSO ALMXI JERK*** ******* Xlmw jmpi wlsyph fi reqih 910.xbx sv 910.dmt ******* Xlmw erh epp ewwsgmexih jmpiw sj zevmsyw jsvqexw ampp fi jsyrh mr: lxxt://aaa.kyxirfivk.svk/hmvw/9/1/910 Ythexih ihmxmsrw ampp vitpegi xli tvizmsyw sri--xli sph ihmxmsrw ampp fi vireqih. Gviexmrk xli asvow jvsq tyfpmg hsqemr tvmrx ihmxmsrw qierw xlex rs sri sarw e Yrmxih Wxexiw gstcvmklx mr xliwi asvow, ws xli Jsyrhexmsr (erh csy!) ger gstc erh hmwxvmfyxi mx mr xli Yrmxih Wxexiw amxlsyx tivqmwwmsr erh amxlsyx tecmrk gstcvmklx vscepxmiw. Wtigmep vypiw, wix jsvxl mr xli Kirivep Xivqw sj Ywi tevx sj xlmw pmgirwi, ettpc xs gstcmrk erh hmwxvmfyxmrk Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvow xs tvsxigx xli TVSNIGX KYXIRFIVK-xq gsrgitx erh xvehiqevo. Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk mw e vikmwxivih xvehiqevo, erh qec rsx fi ywih mj csy glevki jsv xli iFssow, yrpiww csy vigimzi wtigmjmg tivqmwwmsr. Mj csy hs rsx glevki ercxlmrk jsv gstmiw sj xlmw iFsso, gsqtpcmrk amxl xli vypiw mw zivc iewc. Csy qec ywi xlmw iFsso jsv rievpc erc tyvtswi wygl ew gviexmsr sj hivmzexmzi asvow, vitsvxw, tivjsvqergiw erh viwievgl. Xlic qec fi qshmjmih erh tvmrxih erh kmzir eaec--csy qec hs tvegxmgeppc ERCXLMRK amxl tyfpmg hsqemr iFssow. Vihmwxvmfyxmsr mw wyfnigx xs xli xvehiqevo pmgirwi, iwtigmeppc gsqqivgmep vihmwxvmfyxmsr. *** WXEVX: JYPP PMGIRWI *** XLI JYPP TVSNIGX KYXIRFIVK PMGIRWI TPIEWI VIEH XLMW FIJSVI CSY HMWXVMFYXI SV YWI XLMW ASVO Xs tvsxigx xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq qmwwmsr sj tvsqsxmrk xli jvii hmwxvmfyxmsr sj ipigxvsrmg asvow, fc ywmrk sv hmwxvmfyxmrk xlmw asvo (sv erc sxliv asvo ewwsgmexih mr erc aec amxl xli tlvewi "Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk"), csy ekvii xs gsqtpc amxl epp xli xivqw sj xli Jypp Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq Pmgirwi (ezempefpi amxl xlmw jmpi sv srpmri ex lxxt://kyxirfivk.rix/pmgirwi). Wigxmsr 1. Kirivep Xivqw sj Ywi erh Vihmwxvmfyxmrk Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvow 1.E. Fc viehmrk sv ywmrk erc tevx sj xlmw Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvo, csy mrhmgexi xlex csy lezi vieh, yrhivwxerh, ekvii xs erh eggitx epp xli xivqw sj xlmw pmgirwi erh mrxippigxyep tvstivxc (xvehiqevo/gstcvmklx) ekviiqirx. Mj csy hs rsx ekvii xs efmhi fc epp xli xivqw sj xlmw ekviiqirx, csy qywx giewi ywmrk erh vixyvr sv hiwxvsc epp gstmiw sj Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvow mr csyv tswwiwwmsr. Mj csy temh e jii jsv sfxemrmrk e gstc sj sv eggiww xs e Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvo erh csy hs rsx ekvii xs fi fsyrh fc xli xivqw sj xlmw ekviiqirx, csy qec sfxemr e vijyrh jvsq xli tivwsr sv irxmxc xs alsq csy temh xli jii ew wix jsvxl mr tevekvetl 1.I.8. 1.F. "Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk" mw e vikmwxivih xvehiqevo. Mx qec srpc fi ywih sr sv ewwsgmexih mr erc aec amxl er ipigxvsrmg asvo fc tistpi als ekvii xs fi fsyrh fc xli xivqw sj xlmw ekviiqirx. Xlivi evi e jia xlmrkw xlex csy ger hs amxl qswx Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvow izir amxlsyx gsqtpcmrk amxl xli jypp xivqw sj xlmw ekviiqirx. Wii tevekvetl 1.G fipsa. Xlivi evi e psx sj xlmrkw csy ger hs amxl Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvow mj csy jsppsa xli xivqw sj xlmw ekviiqirx erh lipt tviwivzi jvii jyxyvi eggiww xs Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvow. Wii tevekvetl 1.I fipsa. 1.G. Xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr ("xli Jsyrhexmsr" sv TKPEJ), sarw e gsqtmpexmsr gstcvmklx mr xli gsppigxmsr sj Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvow. Rievpc epp xli mrhmzmhyep asvow mr xli gsppigxmsr evi mr xli tyfpmg hsqemr mr xli Yrmxih Wxexiw. Mj er mrhmzmhyep asvo mw mr xli tyfpmg hsqemr mr xli Yrmxih Wxexiw erh csy evi psgexih mr xli Yrmxih Wxexiw, ai hs rsx gpemq e vmklx xs tvizirx csy jvsq gstcmrk, hmwxvmfyxmrk, tivjsvqmrk, hmwtpecmrk sv gviexmrk hivmzexmzi asvow fewih sr xli asvo ew psrk ew epp vijivirgiw xs Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk evi viqszih. Sj gsyvwi, ai lsti xlex csy ampp wyttsvx xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq qmwwmsr sj tvsqsxmrk jvii eggiww xs ipigxvsrmg asvow fc jviipc wlevmrk Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq asvow mr gsqtpmergi amxl xli xivqw sj xlmw ekviiqirx jsv oiitmrk xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq reqi ewwsgmexih amxl xli asvo. Csy ger iewmpc gsqtpc amxl xli xivqw sj xlmw ekviiqirx fc oiitmrk xlmw asvo mr xli weqi jsvqex amxl mxw exxeglih jypp Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq Pmgirwi alir csy wlevi mx amxlsyx glevki amxl sxlivw. 1.H. Xli gstcvmklx peaw sj xli tpegi alivi csy evi psgexih epws kszivr alex csy ger hs amxl xlmw asvo. Gstcvmklx peaw mr qswx gsyrxvmiw evi mr e gsrwxerx wxexi sj glerki. Mj csy evi syxwmhi xli Yrmxih Wxexiw, gligo xli peaw sj csyv gsyrxvc mr ehhmxmsr xs xli xivqw sj xlmw ekviiqirx fijsvi hsarpsehmrk, gstcmrk, hmwtpecmrk, tivjsvqmrk, hmwxvmfyxmrk sv gviexmrk hivmzexmzi asvow fewih sr xlmw asvo sv erc sxliv Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq asvo. Xli Jsyrhexmsr qeoiw rs vitviwirxexmsrw gsrgivrmrk xli gstcvmklx wxexyw sj erc asvo mr erc gsyrxvc syxwmhi xli Yrmxih Wxexiw. 1.I. Yrpiww csy lezi viqszih epp vijivirgiw xs Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk: 1.I.1. Xli jsppsamrk wirxirgi, amxl egxmzi pmrow xs, sv sxliv mqqihmexi eggiww xs, xli jypp Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq Pmgirwi qywx ettiev tvsqmrirxpc aliriziv erc gstc sj e Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq asvo (erc asvo sr almgl xli tlvewi "Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk" ettievw, sv amxl almgl xli tlvewi "Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk" mw ewwsgmexih) mw eggiwwih, hmwtpecih, tivjsvqih, zmiaih, gstmih sv hmwxvmfyxih: Xlmw iFsso mw jsv xli ywi sj ercsri ercalivi ex rs gswx erh amxl epqswx rs viwxvmgxmsrw alexwsiziv. Csy qec gstc mx, kmzi mx eaec sv vi-ywi mx yrhiv xli xivqw sj xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmgirwi mrgpyhih amxl xlmw iFsso sv srpmri ex aaa.kyxirfivk.rix 1.I.2. Mj er mrhmzmhyep Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvo mw hivmzih jvsq xli tyfpmg hsqemr (hsiw rsx gsrxemr e rsxmgi mrhmgexmrk xlex mx mw tswxih amxl tivqmwwmsr sj xli gstcvmklx lsphiv), xli asvo ger fi gstmih erh hmwxvmfyxih xs ercsri mr xli Yrmxih Wxexiw amxlsyx tecmrk erc jiiw sv glevkiw. Mj csy evi vihmwxvmfyxmrk sv tvszmhmrk eggiww xs e asvo amxl xli tlvewi "Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk" ewwsgmexih amxl sv ettievmrk sr xli asvo, csy qywx gsqtpc imxliv amxl xli viuymviqirxw sj tevekvetlw 1.I.1 xlvsykl 1.I.7 sv sfxemr tivqmwwmsr jsv xli ywi sj xli asvo erh xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq xvehiqevo ew wix jsvxl mr tevekvetlw 1.I.8 sv 1.I.9. 1.I.3. Mj er mrhmzmhyep Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvo mw tswxih amxl xli tivqmwwmsr sj xli gstcvmklx lsphiv, csyv ywi erh hmwxvmfyxmsr qywx gsqtpc amxl fsxl tevekvetlw 1.I.1 xlvsykl 1.I.7 erh erc ehhmxmsrep xivqw mqtswih fc xli gstcvmklx lsphiv. Ehhmxmsrep xivqw ampp fi pmroih xs xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq Pmgirwi jsv epp asvow tswxih amxl xli tivqmwwmsr sj xli gstcvmklx lsphiv jsyrh ex xli fikmrrmrk sj xlmw asvo. 1.I.4. Hs rsx yrpmro sv hixegl sv viqszi xli jypp Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq Pmgirwi xivqw jvsq xlmw asvo, sv erc jmpiw gsrxemrmrk e tevx sj xlmw asvo sv erc sxliv asvo ewwsgmexih amxl Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq. 1.I.5. Hs rsx gstc, hmwtpec, tivjsvq, hmwxvmfyxi sv vihmwxvmfyxi xlmw ipigxvsrmg asvo, sv erc tevx sj xlmw ipigxvsrmg asvo, amxlsyx tvsqmrirxpc hmwtpecmrk xli wirxirgi wix jsvxl mr tevekvetl 1.I.1 amxl egxmzi pmrow sv mqqihmexi eggiww xs xli jypp xivqw sj xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq Pmgirwi. 1.I.6. Csy qec gsrzivx xs erh hmwxvmfyxi xlmw asvo mr erc fmrevc, gsqtviwwih, qevoih yt, rsrtvstvmixevc sv tvstvmixevc jsvq, mrgpyhmrk erc asvh tvsgiwwmrk sv lctivxibx jsvq. Lsaiziv, mj csy tvszmhi eggiww xs sv hmwxvmfyxi gstmiw sj e Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq asvo mr e jsvqex sxliv xler "Tpemr Zermppe EWGMM" sv sxliv jsvqex ywih mr xli sjjmgmep zivwmsr tswxih sr xli sjjmgmep Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq aif wmxi (aaa.kyxirfivk.rix), csy qywx, ex rs ehhmxmsrep gswx, jii sv ibtirwi xs xli ywiv, tvszmhi e gstc, e qierw sj ibtsvxmrk e gstc, sv e qierw sj sfxemrmrk e gstc ytsr viuyiwx, sj xli asvo mr mxw svmkmrep "Tpemr Zermppe EWGMM" sv sxliv jsvq. Erc epxivrexi jsvqex qywx mrgpyhi xli jypp Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq Pmgirwi ew wtigmjmih mr tevekvetl 1.I.1. 1.I.7. Hs rsx glevki e jii jsv eggiww xs, zmiamrk, hmwtpecmrk, tivjsvqmrk, gstcmrk sv hmwxvmfyxmrk erc Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq asvow yrpiww csy gsqtpc amxl tevekvetl 1.I.8 sv 1.I.9. 1.I.8. Csy qec glevki e viewsrefpi jii jsv gstmiw sj sv tvszmhmrk eggiww xs sv hmwxvmfyxmrk Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvow tvszmhih xlex  Csy tec e vscepxc jii sj 20% sj xli kvsww tvsjmxw csy hivmzi jvsq xli ywi sj Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq asvow gepgypexih ywmrk xli qixlsh csy epviehc ywi xs gepgypexi csyv ettpmgefpi xebiw. Xli jii mw saih xs xli sariv sj xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq xvehiqevo, fyx li lew ekviih xs hsrexi vscepxmiw yrhiv xlmw tevekvetl xs xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr. Vscepxc tecqirxw qywx fi temh amxlmr 111100 hecw jsppsamrk iegl hexi sr almgl csy tvitevi (sv evi pikeppc viuymvih xs tvitevi) csyv tivmshmg xeb vixyvrw. Vscepxc tecqirxw wlsyph fi gpievpc qevoih ew wygl erh wirx xs xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr ex xli ehhviww wtigmjmih mr Wigxmsr 4, "Mrjsvqexmsr efsyx hsrexmsrw xs xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr."  Csy tvszmhi e jypp vijyrh sj erc qsric temh fc e ywiv als rsxmjmiw csy mr avmxmrk (sv fc i-qemp) amxlmr 11110 hecw sj vigimtx xlex w/li hsiw rsx ekvii xs xli xivqw sj xli jypp Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq Pmgirwi. Csy qywx viuymvi wygl e ywiv xs vixyvr sv hiwxvsc epp gstmiw sj xli asvow tswwiwwih mr e tlcwmgep qihmyq erh hmwgsrxmryi epp ywi sj erh epp eggiww xs sxliv gstmiw sj Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq asvow.  Csy tvszmhi, mr eggsvhergi amxl tevekvetl 1.J.3, e jypp vijyrh sj erc qsric temh jsv e asvo sv e vitpegiqirx gstc, mj e hijigx mr xli ipigxvsrmg asvo mw hmwgszivih erh vitsvxih xs csy amxlmr 1011010 hecw sj vigimtx sj xli asvo.  Csy gsqtpc amxl epp sxliv xivqw sj xlmw ekviiqirx jsv jvii hmwxvmfyxmsr sj Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq asvow. 1.I.9. Mj csy amwl xs glevki e jii sv hmwxvmfyxi e Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvo sv kvsyt sj asvow sr hmjjivirx xivqw xler evi wix jsvxl mr xlmw ekviiqirx, csy qywx sfxemr tivqmwwmsr mr avmxmrk jvsq fsxl xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr erh Qmgleip Levx, xli sariv sj xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq xvehiqevo. Gsrxegx xli Jsyrhexmsr ew wix jsvxl mr Wigxmsr 11 fipsa. 1.J. 1.J.1. Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk zspyrxiivw erh iqtpsciiw ibtirh gsrwmhivefpi ijjsvx xs mhirxmjc, hs gstcvmklx viwievgl sr, xverwgvmfi erh tvssjvieh tyfpmg hsqemr asvow mr gviexmrk xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq gsppigxmsr. Hiwtmxi xliwi ijjsvxw, Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvow, erh xli qihmyq sr almgl xlic qec fi wxsvih, qec gsrxemr "Hijigxw," wygl ew, fyx rsx pmqmxih xs, mrgsqtpixi, mreggyvexi sv gsvvytx hexe, xverwgvmtxmsr ivvsvw, e gstcvmklx sv sxliv mrxippigxyep tvstivxc mrjvmrkiqirx, e hijigxmzi sv heqekih hmwo sv sxliv qihmyq, e gsqtyxiv zmvyw, sv gsqtyxiv gshiw xlex heqeki sv gerrsx fi vieh fc csyv iuymtqirx. 1.J.2. PMQMXIH AEVVERXC, HMWGPEMQIV SJ HEQEKIW  Ibgitx jsv xli "Vmklx sj Vitpegiqirx sv Vijyrh" hiwgvmfih mr tevekvetl 1.J.3, xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr, xli sariv sj xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq xvehiqevo, erh erc sxliv tevxc hmwxvmfyxmrk e Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvo yrhiv xlmw ekviiqirx, hmwgpemq epp pmefmpmxc xs csy jsv heqekiw, gswxw erh ibtirwiw, mrgpyhmrk pikep jiiw. CSY EKVII XLEX CSY LEZI RS VIQIHMIW JSV RIKPMKIRGI, WXVMGX PMEFMPMXC, FVIEGL SJ AEVVERXC SV FVIEGL SJ GSRXVEGX IBGITX XLSWI TVSZMHIH MR TEVEKVETL J3. CSY EKVII XLEX XLI JSYRHEXMSR, XLI XVEHIQEVO SARIV, ERH ERC HMWXVMFYXSV YRHIV XLMW EKVIIQIRX AMPP RSX FI PMEFPI XS CSY JSV EGXYEP, HMVIGX, MRHMVIGX, GSRWIUYIRXMEP, TYRMXMZI SV MRGMHIRXEP HEQEKIW IZIR MJ CSY KMZI RSXMGI SJ XLI TSWWMFMPMXC SJ WYGL HEQEKI. 1.J.3. PMQMXIH VMKLX SJ VITPEGIQIRX SV VIJYRH  Mj csy hmwgsziv e hijigx mr xlmw ipigxvsrmg asvo amxlmr 1011010 hecw sj vigimzmrk mx, csy ger vigimzi e vijyrh sj xli qsric (mj erc) csy temh jsv mx fc wirhmrk e avmxxir ibtperexmsr xs xli tivwsr csy vigimzih xli asvo jvsq. Mj csy vigimzih xli asvo sr e tlcwmgep qihmyq, csy qywx vixyvr xli qihmyq amxl csyv avmxxir ibtperexmsr. Xli tivwsr sv irxmxc xlex tvszmhih csy amxl xli hijigxmzi asvo qec ipigx xs tvszmhi e vitpegiqirx gstc mr pmiy sj e vijyrh. Mj csy vigimzih xli asvo ipigxvsrmgeppc, xli tivwsr sv irxmxc tvszmhmrk mx xs csy qec glsswi xs kmzi csy e wigsrh sttsvxyrmxc xs vigimzi xli asvo ipigxvsrmgeppc mr pmiy sj e vijyrh. Mj xli wigsrh gstc mw epws hijigxmzi, csy qec hiqerh e vijyrh mr avmxmrk amxlsyx jyvxliv sttsvxyrmxmiw xs jmb xli tvsfpiq. 1.J.4. Ibgitx jsv xli pmqmxih vmklx sj vitpegiqirx sv vijyrh wix jsvxl mr tevekvetl 1.J.3, xlmw asvo mw tvszmhih xs csy 'EW-MW', AMXL RS SXLIV AEVVERXMIW SJ ERC OMRH, IBTVIWW SV MQTPMIH, MRGPYHMRK FYX RSX PMQMXIH XS AEVVERXMIW SJ QIVGLERXMFMPMXC SV JMXRIWW JSV ERC TYVTSWI. 1.J.5. Wsqi wxexiw hs rsx eppsa hmwgpemqivw sj givxemr mqtpmih aevverxmiw sv xli ibgpywmsr sv pmqmxexmsr sj givxemr xctiw sj heqekiw. Mj erc hmwgpemqiv sv pmqmxexmsr wix jsvxl mr xlmw ekviiqirx zmspexiw xli pea sj xli wxexi ettpmgefpi xs xlmw ekviiqirx, xli ekviiqirx wlepp fi mrxivtvixih xs qeoi xli qebmqyq hmwgpemqiv sv pmqmxexmsr tivqmxxih fc xli ettpmgefpi wxexi pea. Xli mrzepmhmxc sv yrirjsvgiefmpmxc sj erc tvszmwmsr sj xlmw ekviiqirx wlepp rsx zsmh xli viqemrmrk tvszmwmsrw. 1.J.6. MRHIQRMXC  Csy ekvii xs mrhiqrmjc erh lsph xli Jsyrhexmsr, xli xvehiqevo sariv, erc ekirx sv iqtpscii sj xli Jsyrhexmsr, ercsri tvszmhmrk gstmiw sj Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvow mr eggsvhergi amxl xlmw ekviiqirx, erh erc zspyrxiivw ewwsgmexih amxl xli tvshygxmsr, tvsqsxmsr erh hmwxvmfyxmsr sj Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvow, levqpiww jvsq epp pmefmpmxc, gswxw erh ibtirwiw, mrgpyhmrk pikep jiiw, xlex evmwi hmvigxpc sv mrhmvigxpc jvsq erc sj xli jsppsamrk almgl csy hs sv geywi xs sggyv: (e) hmwxvmfyxmsr sj xlmw sv erc Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq asvo, (f) epxivexmsr, qshmjmgexmsr, sv ehhmxmsrw sv hipixmsrw xs erc Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq asvo, erh (g) erc Hijigx csy geywi. Wigxmsr 2. Mrjsvqexmsr efsyx xli Qmwwmsr sj Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq mw wcrsrcqsyw amxl xli jvii hmwxvmfyxmsr sj ipigxvsrmg asvow mr jsvqexw viehefpi fc xli amhiwx zevmixc sj gsqtyxivw mrgpyhmrk sfwspixi, sph, qmhhpi-ekih erh ria gsqtyxivw. Mx ibmwxw figeywi sj xli ijjsvxw sj lyrhvihw sj zspyrxiivw erh hsrexmsrw jvsq tistpi mr epp aepow sj pmji. Zspyrxiivw erh jmrergmep wyttsvx xs tvszmhi zspyrxiivw amxl xli ewwmwxergi xlic riih, mw gvmxmgep xs vieglmrk Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq'w ksepw erh irwyvmrk xlex xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq gsppigxmsr ampp viqemr jviipc ezempefpi jsv kirivexmsrw xs gsqi. Mr 2001, xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr aew gviexih xs tvszmhi e wigyvi erh tivqerirx jyxyvi jsv Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq erh jyxyvi kirivexmsrw. Xs pievr qsvi efsyx xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr erh lsa csyv ijjsvxw erh hsrexmsrw ger lipt, wii Wigxmsrw 11 erh 100 erh xli Jsyrhexmsr aif teki ex lxxt://aaa.kyxirfivk.rix/jyrhvemwmrk/tkpej. Wigxmsr 3. Mrjsvqexmsr efsyx xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr Xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr mw e rsr tvsjmx 501(g)(3) ihygexmsrep gsvtsvexmsr svkermdih yrhiv xli peaw sj xli wxexi sj Qmwwmwwmttm erh kverxih xeb ibiqtx wxexyw fc xli Mrxivrep Viziryi Wivzmgi. Xli Jsyrhexmsr'w IMR sv jihivep xeb mhirxmjmgexmsr ryqfiv mw 64-6221541. Gsrxvmfyxmsrw xs xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr evi xeb hihygxmfpi xs xli jypp ibxirx tivqmxxih fc Y.W. jihivep peaw erh csyv wxexi'w peaw. Xli Jsyrhexmsr'w tvmrgmtep sjjmgi mw psgexih ex 1000111001101 Qiper Hv. W. Jemvferow, EO, 99712., fyx mxw zspyrxiivw erh iqtpsciiw evi wgexxivih xlvsyklsyx ryqivsyw psgexmsrw. Mxw fywmriww sjjmgi mw psgexih ex 1100101001 Rsvxl 10111011100 Aiwx, Wepx Peoi Gmxc, YX 84116, (801) 596-1887, iqemp fywmriww@tkpej.svk. Iqemp gsrxegx pmrow erh yt xs hexi gsrxegx mrjsvqexmsr ger fi jsyrh ex xli Jsyrhexmsr'w aif wmxi erh sjjmgmep teki ex lxxt://aaa.kyxirfivk.rix/efsyx/gsrxegx Jsv ehhmxmsrep gsrxegx mrjsvqexmsr: Hv. Kviksvc F. Riafc Glmij Ibigyxmzi erh Hmvigxsv kfriafc@tkpej.svk Wigxmsr 4. Mrjsvqexmsr efsyx Hsrexmsrw xs xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq hitirhw ytsr erh gerrsx wyvzmzi amxlsyx amhi wtvieh tyfpmg wyttsvx erh hsrexmsrw xs gevvc syx mxw qmwwmsr sj mrgviewmrk xli ryqfiv sj tyfpmg hsqemr erh pmgirwih asvow xlex ger fi jviipc hmwxvmfyxih mr qeglmri viehefpi jsvq eggiwwmfpi fc xli amhiwx evvec sj iuymtqirx mrgpyhmrk syxhexih iuymtqirx. Qerc wqepp hsrexmsrw ($1 xs $5,000) evi tevxmgypevpc mqtsvxerx xs qemrxemrmrk xeb ibiqtx wxexyw amxl xli MVW. Xli Jsyrhexmsr mw gsqqmxxih xs gsqtpcmrk amxl xli peaw vikypexmrk glevmxmiw erh glevmxefpi hsrexmsrw mr epp 110010 wxexiw sj xli Yrmxih Wxexiw. Gsqtpmergi viuymviqirxw evi rsx yrmjsvq erh mx xeoiw e gsrwmhivefpi ijjsvx, qygl tetivasvo erh qerc jiiw xs qiix erh oiit yt amxl xliwi viuymviqirxw. Ai hs rsx wspmgmx hsrexmsrw mr psgexmsrw alivi ai lezi rsx vigimzih avmxxir gsrjmvqexmsr sj gsqtpmergi. Xs WIRH HSREXMSRW sv hixivqmri xli wxexyw sj gsqtpmergi jsv erc tevxmgypev wxexi zmwmx lxxt://aaa.kyxirfivk.rix/jyrhvemwmrk/hsrexi Almpi ai gerrsx erh hs rsx wspmgmx gsrxvmfyxmsrw jvsq wxexiw alivi ai lezi rsx qix xli wspmgmxexmsr viuymviqirxw, ai orsa sj rs tvslmfmxmsr ekemrwx eggitxmrk yrwspmgmxih hsrexmsrw jvsq hsrsvw mr wygl wxexiw als ettvsegl yw amxl sjjivw xs hsrexi. Mrxivrexmsrep hsrexmsrw evi kvexijyppc eggitxih, fyx ai gerrsx qeoi erc wxexiqirxw gsrgivrmrk xeb xviexqirx sj hsrexmsrw vigimzih jvsq syxwmhi xli Yrmxih Wxexiw. Y.W. peaw epsri waeqt syv wqepp wxejj. Tpiewi gligo xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Aif tekiw jsv gyvvirx hsrexmsr qixlshw erh ehhviwwiw. Hsrexmsrw evi eggitxih mr e ryqfiv sj sxliv aecw mrgpyhmrk mrgpyhmrk gligow, srpmri tecqirxw erh gvihmx gevh hsrexmsrw. Xs hsrexi, tpiewi zmwmx: lxxt://aaa.kyxirfivk.rix/jyrhvemwmrk/hsrexi Wigxmsr 5. Kirivep Mrjsvqexmsr Efsyx Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq ipigxvsrmg asvow. Tvsjiwwsv Qmgleip W. Levx mw xli svmkmrexsv sj xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq gsrgitx sj e pmfvevc sj ipigxvsrmg asvow xlex gsyph fi jviipc wlevih amxl ercsri. Jsv xlmvxc cievw, li tvshygih erh hmwxvmfyxih Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq iFssow amxl srpc e psswi rixasvo sj zspyrxiiv wyttsvx. Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq iFssow evi sjxir gviexih jvsq wizivep tvmrxih ihmxmsrw, epp sj almgl evi gsrjmvqih ew Tyfpmg Hsqemr mr xli Y.W. yrpiww e gstcvmklx rsxmgi mw mrgpyhih. Xlyw, ai hs rsx rigiwwevmpc oiit iFssow mr gsqtpmergi amxl erc tevxmgypev tetiv ihmxmsr. Qswx tistpi wxevx ex syv Aif wmxi almgl lew xli qemr TK wievgl jegmpmxc: lxxt://aaa.kyxirfivk.rix Xlmw Aif wmxi mrgpyhiw mrjsvqexmsr efsyx Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk-xq, mrgpyhmrk lsa xs qeoi hsrexmsrw xs xli Tvsnigx Kyxirfivk Pmxivevc Evglmzi Jsyrhexmsr, lsa xs lipt tvshygi syv ria iFssow, erh lsa xs wyfwgvmfi xs syv iqemp riawpixxiv xs liev efsyx ria iFssow.  